>Lowering your steaming mug onto the wooden desk, that now familiar sense of melancholy and apathy crept its way back in as you sat onto your chair once again, the glow of the computer screen reflecting in your pupils.
>Notifications and more notifications, endless chatting in one window, the occasional PING from another, people coming and going, online and offline, all in the blink of an eye.
>With summer gone, the seasonal spike of jobs in your bumblefuck nowhere dried up harder than beef jerky in a crematorium, leaving everyone not lucky enough to slave away at offices or their cushty gigs to figure out their own lives and survive till the next wave.
>You gained a pretty penny while at it, sure, but the lack of employment came with some thorns as you adapted to the following months.
>You thought that some “vacations”, just relaxing away and waiting for someone to answer your resume would be great, paradise even.
>After dealing with tourists and snooty fucks almost every day, it felt amazing to feel that peace and quiet of a warm, comfortable home.
>Sleeping late, rising even later, binging on food and drinks, watching the new show people couldn’t quit gushing about, the new hours of the day let you appreciate it all the more.
>Yet, after a while, you felt it all just became…
>Dull.
>Painfully dull.
>You couldn’t tell which day of the week it was, you slept whenever you felt like and woke up feeling halfway between rested and exhausted, while all those shows you binge watched seemed to lose their magic.
>You barely left your home, the wonders of technology allowing some poor underpaid employee to deliver the goods without you even having to walk out the front door.
>For some, this would be heaven itself.
>Right now, it felt like utter hell.
>You barely even noticed as your hand reached for your temples, rubbing them as if to soothe that dormant headache from the previous night, boosted by the loud music of your neighbours and their stomping around.
>The endless PINGs you heard coming from the speakers weren’t doing you any favours either, each one triggering some latent pain in your brain.
>You took one good look at your screen and shifted your head to the left, towards the window.
>A bright sunny day, not a single cloud in sight.
>That warm, warm sunshine, coming through, and the faint sound of the autumn breeze…
>No more.
>Turning your monitor off, you pushed yourself off the chair and headed into the bathroom, splashing some water into your face and staring into the mirror, the silence ringing in your ears as droplets rained below.
>The sag on your skin, the red veins dotting your eyes like a coil of serpents, the tired look you couldn’t wash off, no matter how hard you tried.
>And tried you did, splashing yourself with that cool water again and again to no effect, your poor reflection slowly shifting into a scowl.
>Enough.
>With one final rinse, you scrubbed away the remains with your towel, heading towards the door.
>Swiping your jacket and keys from the bedroom as you went, you headed out down the stairs, feeling the stale wooden air all around you, the moody yellow lights glowing as you moved past their sensor, getting lower step by step.
>Turning the handle on the final glass door to the outside, the chill breeze coursed through your bare neck, the feeling of freshness washing over you as the sun shone from above.
>The unmistakable sounds of the city passed by you, the endless rev of some engine, far away, the distant beeping of a random car stuck just a bit too long in traffic and the loud chatter of housewives around the corner.
>God, you missed this.
>More than you might have wanted to admit.


>Wandering, aimless, you took in the sights and the smells of your home, strolling around the cracked concrete pavement, your body soaking in everything it could.
>The unmistakable smell of roasted chestnuts and the smoke that followed it, the bored salesmen eyeing the streets for paying customers, idly chatting about whatever teams lost and won last night with accountant like precision.
>The modest and the daring walking side by side, phones shoved in their ears and faces, the odd ones out staring daggers at the floor, places to be, things to do, rushing out a healthy distance away from any group.
>The occasional child or three, running together with their big puffy coats and scarves, giggling and, of course, screaming, chasing after one another in glee.
>But something else managed to catch your eyes and nose, even if not by that order.
>The distinctive smell of peaches in the air, from a corner you didn’t look yet.
>And the sight of grey fur, encased in a plain white t-shirt and jeans, lacking any shoes to speak of.
>A young grey wolf, barely reaching your chest height, lightly stammering as she tried to offer pamphlets to the walking people, ignored altogether, a small blue backpack by her feet, furthering the bizarre picture. 
>You had to pinch yourself to check if you weren’t still in bed, snoring like a rock, but no, there she was, standing proud if not tall.
>Anthros were known to exist, sure, they had their communities, customs and all, basic schooling, but in a city?
>Throughout all your years, you saw maybe three at best, and like hell they were dressed in jeans and white tees, handling out pamphlets to random people, more of a leather clothes and tribal garb than pamphlet pushers. 
>Passer-by’s barely seemed to care however, glancing out of their phones for just a moment to snap a picture or barely even noticing she was there, seemingly ignoring her out of habit.
>You couldn’t blame them really, it was second nature to ignore people giving away pamphlets or men asking you to sign petitions you barely cared about.
>You didn’t have a reason to go to her but at the same time, you didn’t have any reason not to check it out.
>Not like getting a pamphlet and a speech would take more than a minute or two, right?
>Walking up near her, you saw her brown eyes focus on you, a brief moment of surprise before stammering a smiling greeting.
>”Oh, hello! Would you be interested in knowing about the Mt. Yamato project?”
>”Uh, sure. What’s it about?”
>Standing tall, you could hear the pride as she spoke, the tone of someone who rehearsed her role down to a science.
>”It’s a brand new initiative, in order to expand anthro-human interaction! A trip to the titular mountain, all gear and needs paid for by outside investors, in order for both sides to remove the stigma and bond closer together, interacting with the local anthro community there!”
>Blinking twice, she half opened her mouth, shaking her head and speaking again.
>“Oh, and you also get a city sponsored certificate for it. Something about ‘soft skills’? Sorry, I’m not really versed in more, erm, human terms.”
>As she handed out the pamphlet to you, her hands travelled behind her back, tail swooshing lightly as she stared at your reaction.
>She must have figured out your suspicion, your tired eyes focusing in on her, a tone of doubt in your voice, tail stopping dead on the spot as you spoke.
>”What’s the catch?”
>”Huh?”
>”I asked what the catch is. An all-expense paid travel trip to a mountain and an easy diploma? Mingling with anthros for free and getting stuff out of it? You do know how suspicious that sounds, right?
>“Not… really?”
>You were half ready to blast all your cynicism at her, tired as you were, but you were taken aback by her seemingly innocent denial.
>”Wait, what do you mean not really? Don’t you see how free stuff like that is sketchy?”
>”No? Aren’t we meant to help each other to grow stronger and live together? We do it all the time back home. Someone has an issue, we try and fix it.”
>All you could do was blink, baffled by the answer.
>Giving a quick glance at the pamphlet, you see a variety of logos, local and commercial, even the crest of your local governance, all lined up as sponsors and supporters.
>Either a very well done photo editing work or somehow she wasn’t bullshitting you.
>All she gave you was a shrug and a half smile as you looked back at her, trying to keep herself peppy.
>“I guess it might sound suspicious but really, we just want to bring people together. You can look it up, they made a big deal out of promoting us. Good reputation from it, I guess?”
>Pocketing the flier, you try and change the subject, shrugging to yourself.
>”Alright then, I’ll give it a look. Doesn’t seem like you’ve gotten a lot of people stop and listen to you anyways.”
>”You got that right. Snouts- uh, faces stuck in those little pocket things or just pretending I don’t exist, giving me the bug eye. Don’t really get what’s so fun about staring at glass but hey, you guys do you.”
>”… You really aren’t from around here, huh?”
>A full blown smirk showed on her face, rolling her eyes.
>”Gee mister, what gave it away? Culture shock, the ears or my face?”
>”The unending optimism, for one. Waggling your tail got my eyebrows raised too.”
>”Man, are all humans this snarky? You look like you could a vacation. A breath of fresh mountain air, some nice exercise and some company. Hint hint?”
>As much as you didn’t want to admit it, it did sound appealing.
>It’s not like you were even doing much and the idea of spending another month in that apartment wasn’t exactly making you jump for joy and wanting to sing the kumbaya.
>Still, you weren’t even sure if it was legitimate.
>If it was a trap, you’d probably lose at least one kidney.
>If it wasn’t, then someone up above really liked you.
>”Alright, alright, I’ll think about it. I just got a question, if you wouldn’t mind.”
>“Hmm?
>”What’s with the peach perfume, just an attention tactic? I could smell it a mile away.” 
>You weren’t expecting the twitch of her ears and her following chuckle, but stretching her… paw at you, she nodded.
>”You got a good nose, for a human. Tell you what, come to the gathering and I’ll let you in on the little secret. Deal?”
>You felt as if the last thing you should be doing was making vague promises of attendance on likely to be kidney harvesters with fur and claws.
>And yet, your hand just seemed to glide across the air without you thinking about it, your fingers slinking between her pads, feeling at her fur, speaking without thinking.
>So soft…
>”Alright, deal. Still, you don’t mind if I check you guys out, right? I’d like to keep my internal organs in me, not in a cold box.”
>”Go ahead, I don’t blame you. The way most people looked at me in the past half hour, I’m almost afraid of ending in a cold box too. Might be time to switch places a little before they get a hairdresser here. Or animal control.”
>Looking around for a few seconds, she lifts up her backpack to her shoulders, giving you a small wave before heading out amongst the crowd.
>”Don’t forget your promise anon. Back luck to break a deal.”
>Giving a faint wave back, you begin walking back into your apartment, giving only a glance back at the crowd, no wolves in sight.
>She was gone.
>And soon enough, so were you, walking straight back with a pamphlet in hand.


>Back home, you leaned back into your chair, eyes shut, a solitary hand rubbing at your temples.
>It was real.
>More than that, everything checked out to a tee.
>The dates for it matched with the least rainy and warmer weeks of the season, just to make it more bearable for those not used to camping in the outdoors.
>The sponsors were all legal, big and you hardly had to search for their endorsement with how much they plastered it online, front page of every website you checked.
>Even your local government confirmed it when you called, offering their bus to pick you up at your goddamn doorstep.
>You knew of schools that had to fundraise like hell, just because the local mayor refused to loan any busses, and there they were, offering to pick you up just to join the event.
>How the nine circles of hell did you of all people get a pickup but not a bunch of kids?
>Even the mountain itself was known for having an actual anthro populace, isolated from the rest of the world as a whole, even if the page had barely any details beyond it.
>It all matched up perfectly.
>Why the hell did this scam out of a tv infomercial have to be real?
>Why did you promise you’d go on such a whim?
>And why did you feel like going so much anyways?
>The last question was the one that burnt the most as you huffed into the air, grumbling to yourself as you worked into writing an email to the organizers.
>You were a man of your word, sometimes a cynical idiot, sometimes a prick, sure.
>But you refused to break a promise over just a sore ego. 
>Finishing the last few touches on the email, you hovered your mouse over the send button, damn near forcing your hand to click it as you leaned back, switching your view to the outside.
>The sun still shone, less so now, but it was still one of those days you felt like it’d have been a sin to miss.
>It had been a while since you felt this refreshed and could sling some banter back and forth.
>Shit, even just talking to someone else without it being the ‘Hello!’, ‘Good Morning.’ and ‘Thank you very much!’ spiel you had drilled into your mind felt-
>Well, amazing was a bit too much, but it felt genuine.
>Something as simple as going out like the good times, seeing new people?
>You were ashamed to say it almost felt alien to you.
>Hearing that distinct *DING*, you turned your eyes into the monitor again, a notification popping up.
>Either they were very quick or you spent more time than you’d rather admit staring out a window.
>Likely a mix of both.
>”Dear mister Anon,” skip, “we inform you of-” yeah, she talked about that, “and your stay is-” wait, what do you mean “between a few days and a few weeks”?
>Quickly shooting them a new email, you stared into the response, reading it again and again.
>Maximum of a few weeks stay, minimum of three days if you stayed at all, wherein the bus could bring you home if you had cold feet.
>Leaning back once more into your chair, you stared into the screen, your mind focusing in on the expedition.
>Would you even lose anything from going there?
>You had everything paid by them, or at least most of it, assuming they didn’t lie.
>It was supported by the big shots and they would lose their shit if someone lost a limb or organ there, bad PR to haunt them forever.
>Unlikely it was a doomsday cult or anything, that was Jehovah Witness territory, not mountaineering nerds.
>Like she said, fresh air, exercise and good company, even a certificate to boot.
>With a bunch of anthros, sure, but it’s not like you had a lot to do or a will to stick around this place much.
>Hell, you didn’t have a will to stay here at all.
>Reading the rest of the email, you spot the event date, two weeks from now.
>You huff one final time, sending in a confirmation email and opening a new tab in your browser, queuing up a few camping videos and guides.
>If you were going, it’d probably help if you knew what you were doing.


>To your surprise, the two weeks passed rather quickly.
>Maybe it was the goal you set for yourself.
>Maybe it was the feeling of having something worth getting up for.
>Maybe you were actually looking up to going to the mountain and walking the trails.
>Either way, you opened your eyes to the dark of your room, covered in thick blankets, blinking at nothing in particular.
>Sighing out, you prepared yourself as usual, raising your fist into the air and bracing yourself for the sound.
>”One… Two… Three.”
>At the first screech of your alarm, you thump the infernal machine, silencing it in an instant, the time showed clear on its red LED display.
>04:30 of the morning, just like you set it up to be.
>Steadying yourself, you get up from the bed, fondling the wall for the light switch, dressing yourself as the light burned a nice new hole in your retinas.
>Heading to the kitchen, you brewed yourself a mug of the good stuff, flipping on the TV and checking the news channel for the time, sipping all the while.
>4:50 already somehow, your eyes glazing over the tv as you sipped your coffee away.
>Nothing good came around, just the same old tired people relegated to the dead hours, barely even trying to be professional as they recycled the same old of yesterday.
>Someone got robbed, someone got killed, a kitten got rescued and a new study found tardigrades could be the new Panacea (they aren’t).
>Gulping down the rest of your brew, you turned off the tv, double checked your clothes and keys and slung on your prepped backpack, heading out the door.
>Down the same old dusty stairwell, the smell of stale air and wood, the soft yellow light bathing you in it as the motion sensor spotted you once again.
>Opening the final door to the outside, you brace yourself for the cold morning breeze, the dew still clinging on to the glass and metal railings, the street lights illuminating the cracked concrete path, your bus stop just a few meters ahead.
>One of the few perks of living in your complex was the complimentary public transportation spots, in about as pristine a condition as a city bus stop could be, only a few cracks to the side glass display.
>Standing beside the bench, not wishing to get your ass wet like you did many, many times before, you barely have the time to turn on your phone, the unmistakable high power motor revving and the hiss of pneumatics signalling the pickup bus turning itself towards you from the corner street, stopping and opening its doors with a mechanical whine.
>Bright orange letters on display above the driver, spelling out just two bold, static words.
>[YAGATO MOUNTAIN]
>The bored driver gave you a quick nod as you boarded inside, the bus halfway filled, mostly men, the occasional woman or teenager contrasting to the napping slobs aboard.
>Taking in a seat midway along the bus, you leaned back and prepared to take a nap, your backpack by your lap and a lotta sleepiness to heal off.
>The sound of a crackling microphone quickly ruined that thought however.
>”Motherfuck-“
>”May I have your attention please? C’mon lads, don’t go limp on me this early in the morning!”
>Trying your damn best to avoid death glaring the origin point, you focused on the large man in the front, wielding the instrument of your sleep deprivation with a smile on his face.
>Well built, clearly not city bound, wearing a pair of brown shorts and a white t-shirt, he seemed oddly relaxed, energetic even, despite it being five of the god forsaken morning.
>”Now now, I understand, everyone needs their beauty sleep but come now lads. What matters is the heart, right? Heh, but on a more serious note, listen up before you go asking again, cause I’m not repeating.”
>Clearing his throat, he continues.
>”We got maybe two hours before we hit the Mountain, so if you want some shuteye, do it now before Sheila skins you alive for looking dead. We all gather at 7:30 in the marked spot, meet our new pals and get buddy buddy from there on. Breakfast at 8 and everyone heads out with their new friends. Any questions?”
>A unanimously groaned “No” echoes across the bus with everyone settling into their seats, regardless of actual doubts or not, the rumble of the motor rising as the bus continued on its way.
>Nearly about to shut your eyes for good, you heard the sound of footsteps come closer and closer, silencing themselves are they stopped besides your seat.
>Please no.
>”Hey mate, you mind if I sit down?”
>Fuck.
>“Hmm, yeah, go on ahead.”
>Plopping himself down on the seat, he stretched his hand towards yours, nodding with a smile.
>”Guessing you must be Anon, huh? I’m Jack, head of the show.”
>You shake his hand, nearly wincing at the strength he gave it, nodding back.
>”Yeah, that’s me. How did you know?”
>”Ah, I know almost everyone here personally and nobody here looks half as prepared as you do. Figured you were the one emailing us so much. Also last one to pick up, so, y’know, names on the list mate.”
>”Are you sure about being prepared? I’ve never even been to something like this in my life, I feel underprepared if anything.”
>Rolling his eyes, he laughs, his hand motioning to the rest of the bus.
>”Anon, you actually bothered to ask stuff. Do you know how many yokels came around, then complained when they didn’t get stuck on a cushty motel room with air conditioning, gossiping while drinking fine wine and munching chocolate?”
>”Too many?”
>”Too damn many. You got a backpack, the clothes for the trip and that pack isn’t empty. Believe in me, I’ve had people faint on us when they left the bus, you aren’t the worst.”
>”Wait, why did they faint?”
>A small frown shows on his face, shrugging his shoulders and leaning into the seat, arms crossed behind his head. 
>”A spider clinging to the bus door, seeing anthros for the first time, a “sudden” bout of indigestion, go ahead and pick an excuse, they sure made a lot of ‘em. The amount of people in last years who left without even stepping off almost made me quit.”
>”Must be hard to organize this entire thing and seeing people just give up without trying, huh?”
>Nodding, he pulls out a golden locket from his pocket, smirking all the while.
>”It is. But it’s always worth it when you got something worth trying for, lad.”
>Flicking it open, you can clearly see the picture of a smiling kangaroo girl, standing right beside him, leaning into his arms.
>Putting one and two together, you decide to ask, shifting back into your seat.
>”Sheila, I’m guessing?”
>“Yeah. Seeing her smile like that makes it all worthwhile. Have to deal with a lot of wankers to get to that, but hey, I have to deal with wankers anyways, so what’s a few more for the road?”
>Feeling much more at ease, you let out a small laugh and take another peek at the locket, feeling comfortable enough to ask.
>”Gotta say, didn’t figure you were one of those, Jack, at least in the open. Don’t people try and give you shit for it? I think I’d be hanged alive back home if I said anything like that.”
>Almost as if he rehearsed it, you see him chuckle, shrugging with a shit eating smirk on his face.
>”Yeah, but it ain’t my fault some suit is jealous I got a better girl than he ever will.”
>”Jealous?”
>”Have you seen the girls most of the whiners get? Bones and skin, some more vapid than vapour, nothing to them. My girl can kick my ass, sprint for miles and squat my record, if that ain’t perfection, I don’t know what is.”
>Closing the locket, he pockets it again and closes his eyes, leaning into the seat to relax.
>”Besides, what’s the point of caring about what those pooftas think? If they can’t appreciate thighs like that, they ain’t worth listening to.”
>Restraining yourself to a brief laugh, you give a quick look out your window, the light posts zooming by as the bus hit the highway, choosing to slide the cheap curtain over your view space.
>”I can respect that. Not here for anything like that, mind you, but I can respect that.”
>Smirking, he stretches his legs, small cracking noises being heard as he shifted into his seat, settling into a more comfortable position.
>”Well, do as you want Anon. We still got at least an hour and a half, so I’d get some shut eye if I were you. I can’t protect you from Sheila if she sees you yawning, made that mistake too many times.”
>Nodding, you leaned back into the chair yourself, gently rocked by the hydraulics of the bus, the window cloth blurring the passing yellow lights, the dull sound of the motor lulling you to a shallow sleep.


>Feeling the slight bump of the bus brakes slinging you forwards, you opened your eyes, your brain slowly trying to reboot itself as Jack leapt off the seat and grabbed the mic, with you left rubbing at your poor, tired eyes.
>Damn coffee hadn’t even hit you yet and there he was, proudly huffing his chest, failing to hide his smile as he brought the mic to his lips, gripping it with joy.
>You covered your ears to the best of your ability, expecting complete hell.
>”RIIIIIIIISE AND SHINE, PEOPLE! It’s a WONDERFULL NEW DAY, filled with GREAT OPORTUNITIES, NEW FRIENDSHIPS TO BE FOUND, AND MOST OF ALL, BREAKFAST TO BE HAD! So, CHOP CHOP, AND LOOK ALIVE! Otherwise Sheila will kill you dead!”
>… Yep, still heard it loud and clear.
>Pinching yourself to wake up quicker, you rose from the seat and slung your pack behind you, walking down the small steps to the cold outside, the icy breeze slapping you across the face for daring to nod off in this weather, the rest of the bus sluggishly following behind.
>Looking upwards, you could see the mountain proper in the early morning light, several hills and tracks upwards across its height, and far, far above, past the walls of jagged rock, a small spike unto the sky, covered with a small pinch of snow.
>Looking down at the base, you see several small tents set up around a long, white one, stretching out farther than you’d ever expect it to, a faint yellow light emanating from within, giving you a soft sense of comfort.
>How perfect.
>The electronic crackle of a megaphone however wasn’t quite so lovely.
>”Alright now, fresh and old meat alike! Welcome to Yagato Mountain!”
>Turning to one of the side tents, you see a brunette kangaroo strutting off towards your group, megaphone in hand, loudly blaring her speech, no doubt prepared.
>”Welcome everyone, to the third running year of the excursion! I know you are all tired because you look like shit, but hey, good news! Central tent has a warm cup of joe for ya, breakfast, on the house, and the people you are about to meet are coming soon around the biscuit tray! So chop chop and get to it! Don’t keep your new buddies waiting!”
>No wonder her and Jack got along.
>”C’mon now, don’t just stand there! Get a move on!”
>The rest of the group rushed to get their munchies and coffee as you lagged behind, turning around to check if anyone stayed back at the bus.
>A woman or two snoozing by the windows, but only one guy seemed to be having second doubts.
>Turning back around, you see as Sheila lowers her megaphone, only to glance at the bus as well, her eyes focusing on you.
>“OI. You there!”
>Ah shit.
>”Need anything, Miss Sheila?”
>”Don’t you missy Miss me, I know you are the freshest meat out of this sardine can, swear I can almost smell it. Just gotta introduce you to the rules and send you on your way, alright?”
>”Fine by me, go on ahead.”
>”Right then.”
>Fishing a small notebook off her pockets, she flips a few pages, eyeing you up and down all the while.
>“The rules are fairly simple, so please, try not to fuck up like some other guys have, we wanna get people together, not to put grudges between groups or start horror stories to bring back home on both sides.”
>Sighing, she begins.
>”People here live mostly simple lives. Don’t mock that. Don’t mock their beliefs, don’t go around and ask questions you really, *really* shouldn’t ask anybody and try and remain civil with everyone. I mean it.”
>Sighing deeply, she eyes you, eyebrow raised.
>”If I have to gut-punch another wannabe tough guy who starts a fight over inane shit, I’m aiming lower. There is no referee here to kick me out, so don’t even try to test me.”
>Nodding along, you sneak a peek into the main tent, small shadows appearing on its cloth, then back at Sheila.
>”So, is that all? When you said rules, I was expecting a lot more, honestly.”
>Snapping her notebook shut, she shoves it in her pocket once more, notching an eyebrow upwards.
>”You expecting me to hand you a constitution on how to behave on get together event? C’mon, basic rules of courtesy, don’t need to tell you not to chew with your mouth open, do I?”
>”Hey, could be something they find odd or awkward I don’t know about. Always good to ask before I make the record scratch and get the stares, right?”
>Scratching her head, she reluctantly nods.
>”Fine, fine. Like I said, most live simple lives, they don’t have any smartphones or whatever around here or really, even books for the most part, so keep the talk to a simple level. They had to learn English, so don’t consider ‘em stupid or talk like they are lower, they ain’t, just… don’t go debating the laws of physics, yeah? We have enough pseudo intellectuals back home, don’t need one here, debating goddamn quantum theory with a fisherman or hunter.”
>“Sounds fine by me. Anything else?”
>Notably calmer, she breathes a sigh of relief, eyeing the tent before settling on you.
>”Have fun. And don’t eat all the biscuits on the tray or I’ll search this entire mountain just to drop kick you.”
>Chuckling along, you mock salute her and head out to the tent, hearing the crackle of the megaphone activate again, her bellowing voice booming out.
>”OI! I know for a FACT the bus seats are NOT that bloody COMFY! Wake up you pack of bums!”
>Yep. Custom made for Jack.

>Opening the flaps to the tent, the alluring scent of coffee hit you like a truck, the faint aroma of biscuits and bread following right after, giving you enough energy to check out the “room”.
>A large, wooden table, stretched across the long tents length, covered with a white plastic sheet, plates of triangle sandwiches, parsley decorated biscuits and other snack foods all across it, a few orange bulbs hanging across the fabric ceiling, dusty but serviceable.
>A few odd salad bowls scattered across, but mostly just light foods, a few sparing slices of grilled meat right next to an inviting pile of bread and a sharp, serrated knife, begging to be used.
>Most of your expedition’s man and womanpower stayed near the coffee table, an old but reliable filter brewer, its halfway filled container heralding the sweet and bitter juice of your salvation, the buzz of mild conversation filling the room.
>Snagging yourself a clear plastic cup, you head to the edge of the tent, seeing a familiar face enter as you poured the steaming caffeine, alongside Jack and Sheila.
>The same wolf from before, now giving you a small wave and a smile instead of a pamphlet, elbow nudging Jack all the while.
>He in turn nodded, clearing his throat and addressing the room, a more formal, less relaxed tone.
>At least, formal for a guy like him.
>“Alright people, here is the deal. In about three minutes, Sheila is coming back with the group that will be accompanying us, or more aptly, accompanying those trekking the mountain. Once they get here, I expect everyone in their damn best behaviour and cordial with them and between yourselves.”, his eyes traveling across the tent, left to right.
>A slight delay before he spoke again, a mild tone of melancholy to his voice.
>”I came here, to try and do my best to unite people, to give everyone a chance, and found nothing but happiness here. I hope you can all experience the same as I have this year, and that we can all have a good time, make some friends and forge one hell of a memory.” 
>A few raised cups of Joe afterwards and a stray “Yeah yeah, we get it Jack, you love your wives thighs” lightened the mood quick, allowing you to sip the miracle elixir at your leisure, noting the wolfy tail whapping you at the leg, the familiar scent of peaches mixing with the cheap columbian in your hand.
>”So then mister Anon, I guess I have my charms, don’t I? Or was it just superstition that brought you in?”
>”Ehh, fifty fifty I guess. Don’t like breaking promises.”
>”Aaannnd?”
>”The peach perfume smelled nice. That also helped. Something else scratched my mind however.”
>”And what would that be, razor wit?”
>”Curiosity, tail whacker. You never did tell me about them. The perfumes.”
>Watching her eyelids droop, you almost feared she forgot, that fear quickly removed as she snapped her fingers, a coy smile in her face.
>”Damn, almost forgot who it was I told that to! You guys invented “curiosity killed the cat” but you aren’t that far off from the kitten, huh?”
>Shrugging, you shovel down the rest of your caffeine, crunching the plastic and chucking it at the trash.
>”Guess so. You still haven’t told me the big secret, and I’m sure Jack would still let me go home, y’know?”
>Whacking you even harder with her tail, she trails her eyes off into the tents flaps, seemingly looking at something beyond it.
>”Oh please, after his little moment there? You aren’t that heartless.”
>”Well, maybe not. You are a great question evader though, you know that?”
>She flicks her ears, nodding as she smiled, turning back to look at you.
>”Hmm. I like to think myself more as a setup artist.”
>”Oh really? Why’s that?”
>”Because I kept you waiting here, just long enough for you to get your answer.”
>Giving you a pat on the back, she slinks off, a cold breeze blowing by your face as the tent flaps opened, first Sheila, then the rest.


>Hearing the odd mix of footsteps and clacking, everyone turned around to check what was coming.
>A small group, maybe fifteen, all behind her, walking into the tent, a mix of all kinds of breeds.
>Big and bulky, slender and lithe, wolves, foxes, a moose or two, and a few others you couldn’t see behind the group, their clothes simple, a mix of leather and cloth, brown and white, all worn like a kind of jumpsuit or dress.
>Practical, but surprisingly well made, fitting for their frames as well.
>The sudden silence was awkward to say the least, all the buzz and small talk in the room vanishing with nothing to replace it with, leaving the newcomers to gaze at your little expedition, both groups staring at one another, waiting for the other to speak up and initiate.
>With a groan, you see Sheila step up, grabbing the arm of a sheep from the back and pulling her to the front of the group, berating them as she went along.
>”Here I bloody go, organizing all of THIS, and then it’s like a group of love struck teenagers, too awkward to talk to each other! C’mon, weren’t you the one blabbering so much about meeting ‘em? Rest of you too, all this ladeedaaa and now you pussy out!”
>Already embarrassed, the sheep striked up a convo with the closest person they could, the rest following soon, too scared of being publicly shamed under the Kangaroo’s scowling stare, Jack smiling like an idiot on the side.
>It was kind of adorable, seeing her cross her arms, Jack hugging her from behind, his chin planted above her head as she scowled, hatred directed at whoever dared laugh at the two.
>Seeing the anthros go, one by one, you started hearing their odd names as they introduced themselves, your mind struggling to make some sense out of it.
>Lhâhn, Ckornos, Louh-bu and a few others seemed normal enough, the rest were either too faint to hear or too strange to register in your brain as words, ending up as gibberish instead.
>Shrugging, you kept to your corner, nabbing yourself a biscuit before trying to mingle, noticing someone behind you, staring at the group with an absentminded smile, her hazel eyes shifting to you.
>Someone who snuck behind and did not want to be seen.
>Someone who was sizing you up to boot.
>What first caught your eyes were her antlers, branching almost out like a tree aimed to the sky, dangling bits of moss and a simple pair of purple harebells decorating them precariously, threatening to fall off with every step she took. 
>Her clothing was simple but elegant, a silken robe of white, decorated with green embroidery on its folds, extending from the knee above, a sturdy rope belt on her waist, tying it all together, her cleavage tastefully hidden in it folds, hand like “paws” interlocked at her stomach.
>A deer.
>A female one, but a deer regardless.
>Giving you a quick smile as she nabbed another biscuit from the tray, she stood beside you, her height matching yours, an oddly regal tone to her voice and stance, a soft fragrance of strawberries emanating from her.
>”A bumpy start but they seem to be alright. I assume you are waiting for your turn?”
>”Eh, nobody has good chat on an empty stomach. Besides, I already got someone right next to me. Didn’t even have to move.”
>”The path of least resistance carries the most people. I am not so sure it would be the best for you however.”
>You take a bite out of your biscuit, nodding.
>”Mnh, maybe. Wouldn’t have picked it for you either but guess you did too, what with sneaking around and choosing the sidelines.”
>She didn’t seem to react, picking out the parsley from her biscuit and eating it, giving a quick look to the crowd.
>”It is my duty to make sure they stay safe and sound. I would be a terrible protector otherwise.”
>”Was about to ask. Guessing you are a kind of priestess, huh?”
>”If you want to use your language, I suppose it is close enough. I prefer our terms, or at least Guardian, if I have to use yours.”
>”Don’t move an inch and you get to meet the local tribe’s Guardian. So much for bashing inactivity, hmm?”
>A light elbow nudge to her arm was enough to break just a bit of her mask, earning a nudge in return, her tone softening just slightly.
>”I did say I was not sure if it was the best. Nobody is perfect, mister…?”
>”Anon. You?”
>”Best to call me something more human like. Maria will do.”
>”Maria, huh? Some kind of Guardian Angel then?”
>”Your words, mister Anon, not mine. It is only courtesy to indulge a guest.”
>”Guest already? I thought we were just going to talk and walk a little?”
>”Mountain hospitality, if you will. Marskta told me about one particularly annoying human she managed to convince to come. I was expecting him to be much, much worse, but he seems rather tame. Enjoyable even.”
>Munching on your poor ignored biscuit, you shrug, deciding to play along.
>”Well, humans tend to be more cordial when they feel comfortable and safe. Probably what happened to him, I’m guessing.”
>Raising an eyebrow, she looks at you, then at the mingling mix, her brow furrowing.
>”Why would a human feel more comfortable here, rather than at his home, next to his kin?”
>”Lady, you really, really haven’t met a lot of us, have you?”
>”… I suppose not. Guardians do not tend to descend down to the mountain base too much, they would rather observe from above. I suppose your kind associates my position with Angels, yes? Watchers from the skies?”
>Munching the last bit of your snack, you clean the crumbs from your shirt, checking the time on your phone.
>”No offense, but I usually picture my guardian angels with a bit more skin and wings, bit less hooves and horns. Also as burning wheels with eyes, but that might just be the nightmares, really.”
>She chuckles, giving you a sideways glance, the corners of her mouth twitching for a moment, a sarcastic tone to her voice.
>”Sorry I cannot meet expectations, but I am afraid I would not last very long on fire. Besides, I think I look fine as is, would you not say so?” 
>”As a guest, I plead the fifth.”
>”And as a person?”
>”I plead the fifth harder.”
>”My, are you afraid of me, Sir Anon?”
>You smile, taking another biscuit and feigning ignorance, nibbling it slowly, your answer purposefully delayed.
>”Absolutely terrified, Miss Maria.”
>A huff of air is all you heard from the woman, her stare aimed at the group once more, this time staying by it.
>”There is nothing wrong with confessing to a Guardian. It is quite a liberating experience, I have heard. Helps to lighten ones burden.”
>”And here I thought I came around for a hike with new people, see new sights? Was this all a con just to get me in a booth to spill my guts for the juicy human drama?”
>She seems to pause for a second, shrugging shortly after.
>”Perhaps. We can still do the first, but I am always open to the latter.”
>”Well then, guess that’s that. You also joining us or just watching from the back?”
>”I was planning on being a more passive observer, but the wind carried me something interesting enough to change my mind a little. Assuming you would not mind being under the wings of an Angel?”
>Something interesting enough, huh?
>Deciding to push it just a little, you straighten your back, deciding to poke her for a reaction.
>”Rather lofty talk, coming from someone who only beats my height by cheating.”
>”Rather lowly of you Anon, considering you have been the only one to last this long.”
>”Nobody else could match up, huh?”
>Silence.
>”Nobody else dared, rather. You are probably the only person in over a decade to talk to me like that, Mr Anon.”
>”Is that a bad thing or a good thing?”
>”Depends on who you ask, I suppose.”
>”Don’t think I’ve asked anyone else yet, have I?”
>All you hear is a proud huff, a deep breath and the faintest hint of a chuckle before she speaks again.
>”I am… having fun. I do not often get to say that and mean it, so I think it is a good thing. I am a biased source, so take that as you will.”
>”Does that mean I get to be under the Guardian Angel’s wings?”
>A smile. 
>An odd, miniscule smile, but you managed to crack just a bit of the noblewoman shell and get your prize, as fleeting as it was.
>”It does. I will not be accompanying them directly, more so behind at a… safe distance. I would not blame you if you wished to go with someone else. Wind knows I am not very used to being accompanied.”
>”I’m fine lagging behind. I just have a question on my mind I’ve been meaning to ask for over a week.”
>Pausing for a moment, her interest seemingly peaked, her ears rising, eyes focused on you alone.
>”Hmm? What would that be, to wait over a week to ask?”
>You stare at the others, man and beast alike, chatting, ignoring you two watchers from the sidelines, and can’t help but crack a smile, faking a noble accent.
>No reason not to tease a bit more, right?
>”You will know soon enough. No sense in ruining the surprise, is there?”


>Wasting the time away as you stood in the sidelines, the buzz of conversation slowly softened from its excited politeness to a calmer, almost homely drone, the odd laugh or bark breaking the mellow as someone cracked a joke.
>Maria left shortly after you teased her again, excusing herself on preparations, with you knowing full well she did not expect to be accompanied across the path.
>With it being too late to regret your choice, most groups having already formed their own little allegiances and pacts, resigned yourself to double checking your phone, backpack and your clothes.
>The battery was good enough to last a while, even if the reception was predictably awful.
>Your backpack was crammed down to cover the basics you needed and all the ones you didn’t, storing a special trick for the inevitable task you were expecting come nightfall.
>The only thing you really feared were your clothes.
>It wasn’t that you were a cheapskate, but you might have simply underdressed for the hike.
>The realization you would likely be sleeping very close to the ground on a cold autumn’s night, with nothing but what you had on you and maybe a woollen beanie you might have forgotten to pack?
>For a couple of days at the very least?
>Not the most comforting of thoughts, you had to admit.
>Picking yourself up from your public introspection, you hear the familiar crackle of a megaphone, the semi miffed feminine voice behind it trying its best not to sound angry, failing at it rather stupendously.
>”C’mon now! We ain’t got all bloody morning to get this moving, you blabbermouths! Out of the tent and into the cold, we got a hike to start!”
>The sparse laugh from inside the tent became sparser as people and beast alike left, one after another, letting in the cold breeze and leaving you there to stare at the sudden absence of its homely feel.
>Well, almost absence.
>You still had the coffee machine in one corner and some food left, so it wasn’t all bad.
>Almost as importantly, Maria returned, now sporting a simple leather satchel on her side, and a new, if slightly weighty pack on her back, lessening her soft and regal steps just enough you could notice, the bulky contents of which seemingly bulged out.
>Almost as if she crammed it all in a hurry.
>”My sincerest apologies, my sudden request was… delayed. We should be good to proceed now.”
>”Hard time getting what you needed?”
>”Surprise, not opposition. Just a few complications in finding it all on time, is all.”
>You nod, both of you leaving the tent behind, the howling wind hitting you both, her stance unchanging, yours a little shaken.
>By now, everyone else had seemingly gone ahead, leaving only a small contingent of people near the rest of the area.
>Jack stood with a map in his hand, a walkie-talkie in the other, the occasional crackle and his smile shattering his focused gaze on the paper, seemingly giving directions to the group when the damn thing stood still and didn’t try to fly with the breeze.
>The wolfess that recruited you stood beside him, giving him an aid in locating the wandering band of people, directing them to the right path, her eyes rolling every time Jack tried to sweet talk the kangaroo on the other side.
>A few others wandered around, carrying boxes or packs, cleaning and organizing the small encampment to the best of their abilities.
>”Anon? Shall we go?”
>Snapping out of it, you nod, giving a small wave to the duo left behind, letting Maria set the pace as you walked beside her, your footsteps synching with her slower, now heavier pace.
>You weren’t yet used to the hoof like sounds of her walking, but you’d adapt soon enough, you figured.
>”You mind if we talk along the way? Might as well spend the time actually learning a thing or two from each other.”
>”By all means, go on ahead. I am curious as to what you will ask.”
>”Well, I’m dull as a rock, so don’t get your expectations too high.”
>”I have heard that plenty before. I am sure you shall not be dull to be around, Sir Anon.”
>All you could give was a short shrug and a quick glance, eyes aimed at the dirt path and morning sky.
>”If you say so. No need to be formal neither, I’m just a guy, not a diplomat.”
>”Being another man does not stop you from being an interesting one, or someone not worthy of respect Anon. There is value in almost everyone.”
>She pauses, nodding to herself.
>”Besides, I would not have picked a dull companion to begin with. Or would have been picked by one regardless.”
>”Which ones happened here then, eh?”
>Without missing a beat, she smiled, shifting the weight of her backpack.
>”Whichever you truly believe is likely the one to be true. I believe it to be both, that the Wind has carried me something new, a breath of fresh air.”
>Almost stunned by the answer and her seeming sincerity, you give her a small smile and a nod, acknowledging her words.
>”Way you say it, almost seems like I was sent by someone here.”
>”The Wind carries us all, Anon. The softest and freshest of breezes, to soothe one’s heat and cool down the heart. The harshest of gales, to destroy one’s home, and bring it all to not.”
>”A force of nature, for better and worse?”
>The twinkle in her eyes barely seemed to match the passion in her voice, letting loose her words.
>”Something you cannot control. Something you are at the mercy of, but at the same time, trust. A struggle, between trying to be akin to it and knowing you never will be as free as it is. A “paradox”, as your kind call it, that we live, every day.”
>”So that’s what you are a priestess to? The Wind itself?”
>She nods, the passion in her voice forcefully contained now, trying to calm herself to a more dignified tone.
>”It has no shape, nor face. No body or glory, no “soul” or disgrace. It is pure, simple, an element of Nature and the Wild, something you cannot reject. Something tied to one’s core, to every single one of us, to the way we live.”
>She paused, nodding as she glanced your way.
>”I realize it must sound silly for you, but for us, it is part of who we ar-”
>”No, I get it.”
>It was her turn to be surprised, giving you a puzzled look, the words flowing out of your mouth without a filter or a hint of doubt.
>”We don’t really think ourselves part of Nature, sure. We don’t see ourselves trusting the Wind or giving it a face, yeah, but we still have things we can’t part with, like...”
>You smile, out of habit, out of reflex, shaking your head, your thoughts filled with nostalgia and old stories.
>”Shit, like how every guy can try and act tough but still listens to love songs and cries after a breakup. How when you get a guy or a gal drunk enough they’ll spout out what’s really bothering them, even if they would never wanna look weak in front of you. How you always can feel at home with your family and friends but still be a stranger amongst your own city, filled with your kind.”
>A shrug is all you can offer, leaving just a second or two of silence before speaking again.
>”That’s being human, I guess. Longing for what never even was, feeling melancholy for what you miss, living every day hoping tomorrow wont suck. And living, even if it does.”
>Her stare lasted just a few seconds too long to avoid being awkward, her previously passionate face softening into something new.
>Curiosity, with a hint of something else.
>”You thought yourself dull and uninteresting? Truly?”
>”I’m my best and worst critic. Sometimes I say something decent, other times I say garbage. Guess luck was with me now?”
>”You do not say something interesting with luck, I am afraid. Were that true, I would likely be much less bored.”
>”Rest of the tribe not up to snuff?”
>”I suppose you can say it that way. I prefer to think we are all different in our own ways.”
>”Is that just the polite way to say they are just dumb or do you actually mean it?”
>Her sigh threatened to become a chuckle, but is restrained in time, her voice mellowing, just barely.
>”The truth?”
>”The truth, the whole truth, and nothing but the truth Maria, so help you the Wind.”
>She merely shook her head, the familiar sound of huffed air accompanied by a small, but present smile.
>”Yes. Yes they may be “dumb”. Some far too much, some just a little. But a hunter needs only know his trade to be a good hunter. A builder needs only know how to build and to repair. A clothier to know the cloth and to sew. Nothing else is asked of them, nor should it.”
>”What about the Guardians, eh? What’s asked of them?”
>”Everything.”
>You stop walking, rising an eyebrow at her.
>”Everything?”
>With only the backpacks weight to diminish the grace, she stops as well, the present smile threatening to widen as she spoke.
>”So help me the Wind, anon. So help me the Wind”.
>”Hunting?”
>”A sling will do fine for the smaller game, and aiding in tracking isn’t too difficult. It never hurts to supply yourself and one’s Sisters when times are less favourable.”
>”Sewing?”
>”Many a cub tears their cloth and leather when prancing amidst the bushes, when they do wear it. You get a good grasp for the basics with the amount of requests given.”
>”Building?”
>She shrugs, clenching and relaxing her hands by instinct.
>”Sometimes stone, when there is some to use. Other times, wattle, and everything it entails. The cubs like to bring in clay and love to gather the materials, at least as far as they are allowed. Weave the frame, spread the material, and day by day, little by little, you make a home.”
>She pauses, her eyes aiming upwards towards the mountains.
>”The materials aren’t the most pleasant to work with. My hands hurt at the end of the day, so much so I can barely feel them, but you make a home. The start of something new, fit for a family or a couple. I believe it is worth it, in the end.”
>You just stay silent, now quite sure what to say.
>You weren’t ashamed to admit you weren’t expecting her answer, but this wasn’t the time for jokes or snark, instead prodding just a bit deeper.
>”How long have you been doing this?”
>”You call them years yet we prefer to count in winters. Fifteen, give or take just a few.”
>”And how long have you been around? Alive?”
>”Twenty three, twenty five?”
>She squints her eyes slightly, a hint of sadness to them.
>”Sometimes you just wake up and time seems to have disappeared. Sometimes a season, sometimes two. Sometimes all four. Then you wake up one day and you notice you are older, and so is everyone else.”
>Without thinking, you nod, eyeing the camp behind you, the bus barely visible now, a blur of colour amidst the brown, donning a look of melancholy, with a tinge of anger to taint it.
>”Yeah, happens to us too. You get so used to the everyday life that time just… slips on by. Nothing seems to change, does it? Every day you wake up, you eat the same things, do the same tasks, and back to bed, tired every night.”
>You grin, your chuckle half forced.
>”I once “skipped out” an entire semester of school, y’know? Just woke up like you said. The daily grind was so, so dull, I just shut down and my brain took charge. I only noticed it when the bell started ringing one day and I look up to my phone, then, bam. Months, half a year almost, just gone, but to tell you the truth?”
>She eyes you up, waiting for you to speak.
>…only for you to shake your head and aim it to the sky, shrugging your shoulders.
>”I don’t think I remember a single thing while I was out. Not one. So much for the wonders of the educational system, huh?”
>You didn’t have to force it now.
>The laugh coming from you was sincere, hearty even, true enough you couldn’t help but smile off your little confession, even as the cold autumn breeze undid your hair, your fingers quickly trying their best to undo the damage.
>As your eyes wander from the sky to her, you see something else entirely.
>Her hand buried in her brow, head tilted downwards, a small row of teeth shown without hesitation, then another, the soft, rumbling noise getting louder and louder from something she was desperately trying to hide, but couldn’t.
>A smile.
>A laugh.
>A moment, where she broke her mask and showed herself without fear or any dignity of a priestess, over you being a dumbass.
>As she huffed, the air forming a small cloud in front of her, the remains of a smile stayed on her lips, her hand slowly hovering out of her brow, eyes put on you.
>”You truly cannot take anything seriously for long, can you?”
>”Well, we still have a ways to go, right? You’ll find out soon enough.”
>”Hopefully so. Maybe then I will be able to find out what it is you wished to ask of me as well.”
>”And maybe you’ll answer it?”
>”Maybe. Maybe I will.”

>The trek onwards was pleasant, if long.
>After your little heart to heart, you didn’t really feel like tainting the good note it ended on, choosing to go in silence with Maria, the sound of her walk setting the pace for the both of you, hoofed feet thumping into the ground with every step.
>Mixed with your own sound of crunching dirt, it formed the little rhythm you two took across the path, never straying far from its tempo.
>It was… peaceful, really.
>No cars, no people, no distant honking or yelling over the most mundane or silly thing, only a few crickets and birds to break the silence of the morning woods.
>The air felt fresh, cold even, but pure, carrying the scents of pines and moist earth, the dew clinging stubbornly to the small greenery as you passed, the slowly rising run evaporating it as the minutes passed on to hours, the skies filling with those warm, warm colours you loved to see, yet rarely did.
>The one big downside to living in the city.
>And of being a lazy ass that woke up too damn late.
>You couldn’t help but smile at the sun, the shining orange sky masked within the greenery as you came to an incline, its exposed edge sporting a crude but functional wooden railing, digging itself deep into the earth.
>You didn’t even notice yourself stopping and leaning into it, letting the warmth of the light shine on your face, just staring at the horizon, blue, pink and orange, the cloudy sky letting the rays shine across its gaps like a picture from the heavens themselves.
>Beautiful.
>”Anon?”
>Her voice broke you out of your daydreaming, her face a mix of confusion, worry and fascination.
>”Is anything the matter? Do you wish to rest?”
>”Oh, nah, not that. Just, you don’t get to see a lot of these back where I live, y’know? Waking up too late, other stuff blocking the view, pick and choose I guess, you just don’t see ‘em often.”
>You offer her a shrug, realizing how silly you must look.
>”Guess it’s a little weird to you guys. Bet you watch ‘em every day, huh?”
>Shifting besides you, she lays her arms on the rail as well, taking in the sights.
>”Not all of us watch them. I enjoy it, but if I am to be honest?”
>Her ears fall flat on her head, a grimace on her lips.
>”It is one of the few worthwhile things of waking up every day. It is not pleasant to get up so early, to know its cold outside and that you could stay in, rest more, to be comfortable. Wind knows that I want to stay, but I know I have to go. Still…”
>She nods, her ears straightening, a much less hidden smile on her lips.
>”… it is good to know someone else can also appreciate them. Even if they admit they sleep in late in your stead and make other excuses.”
>”Hey now, true excuses!”
>”But excuses all the same, Anon. Mind you, I do not blame you. I have feigned several times that I required more rest just to sleep more. Nothing to be ashamed of, in the grand scheme of things.”
>”What’s with the teasing then, eh?”
>She just seems to shrug it off, content in watching the rising sun in your company.
>”Might as well have some fun. I cannot let you hoard all the wit, seeing as you lack the brevity.”
>Putting on your most fake indignant voice, you retort with a smile.
>”Y’know, I was told most folks here wouldn’t be literary and such, and yet here I am, with a priestess quoting William Shakespeare just to roast my ass. That’s just not fair, Miss Maria, truly not fair.”
>Not missing a beat, she flashes her smile, face aimed up high, words spoken with grace.
>”All is fair in love and war, Anon.”
>”Now you are just showing off, aren’t you?”
>Her head lowers down, still wearing that smile, eyes aimed towards you.
>”Maybe. It is just rare to enjoy these kinds of things with worthwhile company, so I cherish these moments.”
>You leaned in further to the railing, your left elbow and hand supporting your dumb smiling face
>”No other priestesses to enjoy it with? I mean, Guardians.”
>She waved a hand to the air, dismissing the thought.
>”They are just as used to it as I am. Besides, Wind forbid me from ever speaking to a fellow “priestess” like this. I think they would mount my antlers as a trophy if I ever tried.”
>You tried, and failed, to stifle a laugh, staring in disbelief.
>”Wow, really? I expected the “Sisterhood” to be more caring to each other, not to set up the trophy rack so quick over friendly chatting.”
>”As I said before, you are one of the few to ever speak to me like this for many, many winters. Rather refreshing, I will not lie.”
>”Guess that makes me a little gust from the Wind itself, huh?”
>A rather warm smile and a nod is all you can notice from her before her stance slouches just a bit, leaning more into the rail.
>”It can bring you all kinds of breezes and gusts. Winds of hope, of change, embers and ash, dew and rain. I *suppose* I can include a rather mouthy human as someone sent to me as an extraordinary case.”
>Donning a shit eating smirk, you eye her up and down, lightly nudging her with your elbow.
>”My oh my, is that flattery I’m hearing? From the lovely Guardian of the mountains herself, Maria?”
>She nudges you back, that faint rumbling laugh surfacing from her once more.
>”Oh, hush. I am allowed to be nice and relaxed from time to time, am I not?”
>”Not complaining, I dig the flattery. Almost makes me want to ask the question I was meaning to ask ya, a damn shame you didn’t go further…”
>”An interesting tactic. You do know that if you do not ask, I cannot tell, right?”
>”And if I do, you will?”
>”Ask nicely. And maybe.”
>”Hmmm, tempting. I think I’ll wait till we camp out, sounds fair?”
>”Well, you bothered to ask nicely. I will allow it.”
>She was the one to nudge you now, her slump degrading into a much more comfortable arch as she leaned into the railing, hazel eyes reflecting the light of the rising sun without a care in the world.
>Eyeing the rest of the track, she lays her gaze there for a few moments, then back to you.
>”You know we cannot stay here forever Anon. I respect the appreciation of beauty, I do, but we cannot stay too behind the rest of the group.”
>”I know. Just… give me a minute, would you?”
>Her nod doesn’t even register into your head as you force yourself to inhale the cold morning air, the feeling of frost traveling across your nose and throat, even your lungs, held in just long enough to breathe out and to see the cloud of vapour form in the air, your own little dragons breath.
>You always did this in winter.
>The air cold enough to shock, not to harm, yet just enough to border the painful frost of a winter’s air flow, waking you up like a bucket of water flung at your face.
>Clarity was hard to come by in almost every season, but whenever it was cold enough, you did this little ritual of your own.
>To think.
>To appreciate.
>To have the moment last.
>Watching your cloud dissipate into nothingness, you looked beyond it, the mishmash of colours across the skies, the occasional grey splotch mixing in with the scene, seeming to add and not taint it, and yet you couldn’t look away.
>You breathe in again, savouring the frost on your lungs, skin and lips, enjoying the moment to the fullest, your eyes glazed at the sight as you felt the familiar spasm and trembling, before the water ran across your face again.
>You close your eyes and breathe, as deep as you can, and you can feel her gaze on you, her worry, the soft sound of fabric shifting, your instinct telling you of a hand raising to softly touch you, no harm in its caress.
>You smile, and open your eyes again, your gut feeling proven right as her hand sinks into your shoulder, gripping it gently, yet no words coming out from her.
>You can smell it again, that scent of strawberries in the air.
>The warmth of her hand and the softness of her grip.
>Your own hands leave the railing, giving only a side glance to the sun before your eyes met Maria once more.
>”I’m alright, don’t worry. Dunno know what got over me, but I’m fine now.”
>”Are you sure?”
>"Yeah. C’mon, we can’t stay here forever, yeah?”
>”… Yeah.”
>Her grip on you loosens and you can’t help but smile once more.
>You can’t tell why, but you feel like it doesn’t matter, giving her a quick nod.
>”Now, as much I like to appreciate beauty, I can’t stare at you all day long neither. Are we walking or just worrying?”
>The look on her face shattered like a glass window, teeth half lined up in a smile, half lined up in a bitten lip, a miserable attempt at keeping on her composure, hands covering her forehead and eyes, the familiar rumble threatening to turn into a laughing fit.
>”Porlamo Venk, forskarr Humanski! Here I was, worried you were going to cry or to remember pain, and instead you flirt with me!? Truly?” 
>”You like a pretty sun and a pretty face. I do too, but it was you who said we had to move, right?”
>”He does it again! You… you are smiling, aren’t you?”
>”Of course. You think I’m not going to call a mountain Guardian pretty if I can? This is a once in a lifetime opportunity!”
>She lost it completely, one hand gripping the rail for support, the other elbowing it as she bends over, howling in laughter, eyes closed, absorbed in the moment.
>It takes her longer than you’d expect to calm down, but she lifts herself up a little, still supported by her elbow, wiping a tear from her eye.
>Still smiling like an idiot.
>”Oh Venk mead’j, I am already regretting calling you an extraordinary case. I give you an inch, an INCH, and you attempt to court me!” 
>”I dunno, you don’t seem that mad to me Maria. Are you trying to say your face ain’t pretty or that I have a shot?”
>She sighs, elbowing you in return, shaking her head with that dumb looking smile you know nobody can hide.
>”Time and a place for everything Anon. I like this, but come now, we have to keep moving, otherwise we might just miss them.”
>”I thought you knew the mountain tracks well enough not to get lost?”
>She loosened her grip on the railing, raising herself to a more proper stance.
>”I do Anon. Jack does not, and Sheila only has a vague idea, one she can misremember. I still have a duty as a Guardian, and while I enjoy this time, I cannot abandon them for you. It would not be right.”
>You raise up your hands in defeat, shrugging.
>”Alright, alright, made your point. I’m good to go when you are. I was running out of pick-up lines anyways.”
>”Rather terrible ones, if I am to be honest Anon.”
>”Wouldn’t be pick-up lines if they weren’t, Maria.”
>Rolling her eyes, she nudges your shoulder, starting to walk once again.
>You give one last look to the blue and pink sky and ditch the railing, walking beside her again, both your paces livelier than when you stopped, even if neither of you could tell why.



>Time passed by surprisingly quick, the hours turning into minutes with both of you having some fun along the way as the sun rose up above.
>With so much to walk, and her insistence on keeping the backline for the group, you also had plenty to talk, especially now that the sun shined up above.
>You started off with family, naming off your brothers, a few cousins and aunts, your mother and father and whoever else you could, detailing a few stories you still remembered out of heart.
>Like the time your aunt tried, and failed, to steal a centrepiece off the table, with it becoming such a riot within the dining room, you just chilled with the cousins and drank up sodas while playing racing games all night long to the sound of muffled yelling.
>The one time your younger brother used lighter fluid to ignite papers and threw ‘em off the fifth floor, just to see them flutter away to the streets and light someone’s wool beanie on fire, getting his ass whooped for it.
>Shit, even the good old time your older big brother almost beat your ass over you teasing his daughter so he got removed from the house, only for everyone inside to laugh and joke about him for years on end.
>Fucker never even called mom and apologised, just kept his angsty phase well into his thirties, becoming the joke of the household, even after you sprouted your wings and flew away.
>You explain to the best of your ability what everything meant, knowing she was from such a different place, yet only the latter story really seemed to land its mark, with you letting her share as much as she wanted in turn.
>She revealed she was a single child, saying that she didn’t really remember any aunts or uncles, rather treating everyone within their little tribe as a sort of family, her Sisterhood much closer to a traditional one, having been raised there with them instead, not knowing her parents.
>There were other, older deer couples within the tribe and on the outskirts, but she seemingly never truly bothered to ask or to search if they were the ones, finding her duties and her friends within her group more important than answering a question she never cared for.
>For stories, she was reluctant at first, making you swear an oath to never reveal these to anyone, less the confessionary trust put upon her vanish.
>A quick fist thump to your heart and a declaration you were no snitch eased her worries, a flurry of random, yet passionately told stories flowing out.
>The time one of the cubs came along for confession, bawling their eyes off over taking too many cookies from the baking batch, begging for them not to tell their mother, the only time her stoicism nearly cracked like pottery.
>The time they caught a fox with something private stuck inside something not meant for it, the awkward tugging and following silence that came after aiding them, their name left purposefully hidden.
>Even the time she found an abandoned cell phone and kept it a secret, to attempt to study it further…
>…only for it to ring in the early morning, a concerned Sister coming around and seeing her holding it, frantically tapping the glass to stop the morning tunes in vain.
>You couldn’t help but chuckle, forewarning her your own might ring, flashing it to her.
>She merely rolled her eyes, saying she wouldn’t fall for the same trick twice.
>It was tempting to set up an alarm a minute from now, but your sense of self-preservation warded you from provoking an irate woman with thorny spears on her head, instead trying to head the discussion to something else.
>You asked her of how life was back home, earning you a modest shrug and a short, almost too short answer.
>A bit of hunting when they had or wanted to, listening to the issues of her people, reading what books they managed to get monthly to try and improve their homes, and that was about it.
>No embellishing flourish, no greater purpose in the prose, just living the grind, one day at a time, it seemed.
>She was quick to add that it wasn’t all that bad, when she looked at it as a whole.
>The agreement they had with the outside let them get a certain level of comfort they didn’t quite have before, while remaining true to their traditions and customs.
>Better ways to weave the wattle, better techniques to preserve food with what they had, better ways to cultivate their gardens, even some cooking tips to aid the rather bland foodstuffs they cooked.
>Mountaineering herbs only did so much to add to the flavour, and the age old friends of the culinary arts, salt and pepper, were sadly absent up here.
>Just as she was about to speak of her work on confessions, the two of you arrived on one of the meeting places, a mostly plain, flat area, littered with wooden tables and chairs, a small clearing made for setting up tents and the like.
>The sky was darker than what you would like now, not yet night, but it was dark enough to notice on the later afternoon, and was sure to get darker as time passed.
>Still a good resting stop, even if now it had a few too many plastic wrappers littering the ground.
>You hear a faint groan from Maria before she bent down and started picking up the trash, with you quickly dumping your backpack on a bench and helping.
>Thankfully it wasn’t a full on pigsty after the group left, but the disapproving look she gave the area still held in that tinge of disappointment, thought you couldn’t tell if it was for her kinds lack of effort or the guests lack of courtesy.
>Whatever it was, after the last piece of trash was dumped, she waddled on to the same bench you left your things at and dropped her own backpack, a soft thud and a relieved sigh, one after the other before she spoke to you.
>”This is as far as we shall go today. They should all be by the next stop and with their tents set up already, so no use in going further.”
>”Huh. Are they just gonna stay there for the rest of the day?”
>”They should be as a group, assuming Jack and Sheila did not misdirect them. Nothing stopping each individual from wandering however, to each their own whims, wherever the Wind may lead them.”
>You decide to sit for a bit, massaging your poor, untrained legs as you talked.
>”Hopefully not a ditch. So, what was your plan for wasting time before I barged in and swept you away from your people and peace?”
>She sat down as well, laying her hands upon her lap, back and ears straight, eyes serene and calm, the picture of perfect composure.
>”Well, I was thinking of reading a book I put in my satchel, enjoying the quiet of this place, but I am sure you and I can figure something out to pass the time, yes?”
>You took pride in being one of the thickest men to ever walk the earth and overlook a hint, but even you noticed it.
>She was testing you.
>You could see past that posing, too perfect to be natural.
>You could feel the intent in the words, the way she spoke them, the hidden meaning behind them, and you definitely couldn’t miss that hard to hide smile surfacing on her face.
>You flash her a grin, letting your leg go and eyeing her up and down, your brain buzzing with thoughts, settling on a dangerous one.
>"I do have -one- idea, but I’m not sure you’ll like it. Or even tolerate it.”
>“Test me then.”
>”You sure?”
>”You know better than to suggest something stupid enough to get you injured or to have me leave, so yes, I am quite sure.”
>”Fair point.”
>You pull out a small coin off of your wallet and place it on the table between you two, tapping it with your index and staring at her eyes.
>”Back in my place, we have this little game called Truth or Dare. A great game to play with someone else or a group, leads to all kinds of fun, real simple to play. You pick someone to start, then they pick someone else, and that someone else has to say the truth to a question or… they do a dare to not say, see?”
>You pinch the coin between the tips of your fingers, gesturing it towards her.
>”Usually, you pick it with a spinning bottle for who is next, but since it’s just you and me, I’ll let you flip the coin to pick. Heads or Tails?”
>She cautiously grabs the coin, weighing it in her palm, her eyes searing with curiosity.
>”I can ask whatever it is I wish? Truly?”
>”Go on ahead, I’m an open book to read. Probably more interesting than any you stashed in your pack anyways.”
>”And why would that be, mister Anon?”
>”C’mon, think for a bit. The ink in the pages will be there forever, and it’ll stay the way it is forever. Now, me, I’m a random human passing by, and you get to ask whatever you wish out of me. Well, with a price…”
>”You get to know me too, correct?”
>”Bingo. Once in a lifetime opportunity for us both, and you get to ask whatever it is you want outta me. Course, I don’t have any shame in me, not here, not with you. But it’ll be fun for us both, I’m sure.”
>She moves her eyes to you for a moment, gripping the coin in her palm.
>”And of the dares? What would they entail? How far should one go, what would they be?”
>”Basic stuff, just follow the golden rule.”
>”Which is..?”
>You almost raise an eyebrow, but you realize it’s harshly unfair to expect her to know it by this name, shrugging instead.
>”Do unto others as you would have them do unto you. Also known as the “don’t make me eat dirt if you wouldn’t want me to dare you to eat dirt” treaty. Simple, really.”
>A nod is all you get before she throws the coin in the air, landing on her palm and pressed downwards into the wooden table, obscured from you both.
>”Tails. Wouldn’t feel right to pick anything else, considering my kind.”
>”Heads for me then. Show ‘em.”
>Breathing in, she slowly lifts her hand from the table, her breath cut short with a barely whispered “Yes!”.
>Tails.
>A smile just a bit too wicked to be normal is shown as she gently tapped her fingers on the table, scrying your slightly alarmed face.
>”So! Truth or Dare?”
>”Truth. Give me your best shot.”
>”Very well. Why did you come here? To this place, this journey, this walk?”
>You should have seen that one coming, in all truth, but it still hit you a little.
>Settling into your seat, you nod, asking only once.
>”The truth?”
>”The truth, the whole truth, and nothing but the truth Anon, so help you the Wind.”
>Only fair she got to do that one to you too you suppose, sighing and getting more comfortable in your seat as you began to talk.
>”So, back at my place, assuming you worked long enough and in the right place, you can just kind of… vegetate with what you earn. Not enough jobs for everyone, so if you were lucky, you saved up for “winter” and that kind of leads to you living the same day of doing pretty much fucking nothing, see?”
>You pause for a moment, thinking of the best way to convey your thoughts and deciding to wing it.
>”Life here is different from back home. I can meet everyone I ever knew and never met inside my room, talk to them without a worry in the world, get food, stay warm and I don’t have to move an inch. That kind of leads you to just… not doing anything, and the one day I do go out, sick of that ease, I meet one of your own. They get me a pamphlet, we banter back and forth, they say they’ll tell a secret if I come and well, here I am, still wishing to get to know but happy I came anyways.”
>She seems taken aback for a bit, with you cracking a smile, letting the information seep in as you clap your hands together. 
>”Speaking of secrets… Truth or Dare?”
>”After that speech? I would be a cruel woman not to say Truth.”
>You give her a good look up and down, building in the tension just enough to send a message, ending it swiftly.
>”What’s your name?”
>“You already know-“
>You shake your head in silence, a small pout in your lips.
>”No, I know the human one you gave to me. I don’t know *your* name. Your real name.”
>She hesitates for a moment, giving in with a sigh.
>”Arovska. My name is Arovska, given to me by the ones that raised me. And yes, that is my full name, nothing else.”
>She pauses for a moment, bringing a hand to her chin and giving you an odd look.
>”Why would you even ask me such a thing?”
>”I like to know who I’m with as much as I can, especially if I’m gonna share a tent with ‘em. Better question would be why you think asking for your real name is weird, honestly.”
>You just shrug slightly, adding in quickly.
>”Oh, and say Truth or Dare next time, c’mon, don’t derail the game so soon. Truth?”
>She furrows her brow slightly, tapping her fingers into the wood for a few seconds, stopping and staring you down, her expression lessening as she spoke.
>”Truth. I gave you that name because I felt like that was all you needed, something more humanlike to speak with ease, and it is rare for me to say my personal one. I did not know that you would have preferred my true one at the time, but I apologise all the same. Now, truth or dare?”
>”Truth. Make it spicy, will ya?”
>A wide smile covers her face, smug and fulfilled, cocky and hearty, a nobler than usual tone to her words.
>”Very well. What it is that you wished to ask me before? I have promised I would tell you, but curiosity has been eating away at me for long enough I cannot ignore it for longer.”
>”Really? That’s your spicy? I was bracing myself to reveal some long forgotten memories of pain and suffering for your enjoyment, and you wanna indulge me quicker?”
>”Beauty lays in the eye of the beholder Anon. Besides, something hidden is something sure to be worthwhile to uncover, especially from an open book that declares he has long since left his shame behind. Would you not agree?”
>The aura of smugness from her was almost overwhelming, her chin laying on her hands, elbows upon the table, with that rumbling laugh only someone that caught you red handed in the cookie jar can rightfully do.
>It was cute, in a way.
>Just how much she broke down her “dignity” to get something she really wanted. 
>You try your best to remain as stone faced as humanly possible, coughing to deter any premature laughing and giving her a simple nod.
>”Well… remember how I told you I met one of your own? Got a pamphlet and all?”
>”Yes?”
>”Well, I smelled her first, before I even saw her. Now, I don’t know about you, but humans don’t tend to do that sort of thing, ever, so I asked her, what was the deal with the perfume? She told me to come around, I wait a week or two, get inside the tent and well… the rest is history, isn’t it?”
>You gesture to her now, her face shifting from smugness to a look of surprise and something else harder to tell, creeping in as the seconds flew and your words settled in.
>Was it satisfaction?
>No, her smile was too contained to be that, too simple.
>Glee?
>Couldn’t be, no humming or giggling, instead a drawn out “Aaaah”, complete with a closed eyed nod.
>The kind that you only do when you know you are, without a doubt, right. 
>Pride.
>”Tell me. What did she smell of?”
>”Peaches, apricots, something like that. Why?”
>”You were looking for something, were you not? When you went out and met her? Be honest.”
>You quirk an eyebrow but decide to indulge her, even if just to let her have her moment.
>”I was fed up and needed a breath of fresh air, in both ways, something else rather than the mind numbing routine. So I guess I was, yeah.”
>”So they do work. Or at least, that one did.”
>”Alright, you had your fun, spit it out.”
>She rolls her eyes at you, grabbing a couple of small herb pouches from her satchel, and laying them across the table.
>”When you live in a place like this, you often have time. Some of it you can waste with others, some of it you sleep off, but everyone at least tries to make their own thing once. I dabbled into a practice that had been done before, and wanted to see if I could have it work for more than its… intended purpose.”
>”Alright, lemme rephrase it. Spit it out in a way that doesn’t make me bring out the dusty decoding machines and my cereal box spy hardware.”
>She doesn’t even hide her new smirk, revealing a smaller leather waterskin, this one filled with something liquid inside, sloshing around as she placed it on the table.
>”I enjoy making perfumes. I find it relaxing, I find it fun, and I find that with the right ingredients, and a secret or two, I can make them do more than just smell like I want them to.”
>”More than smell, huh? Like what?”
>She pauses for a moment, letting her eyes settle on you.
>”Like having a scent to bring in the Winds blessings and the persons will. Like to have it so that some pull people away, and pull some closer. And some, to lead to what they seek. It would seem you have found the latter.”
>”C’mon, you telling me you make fate weaving perfume that smells of peaches? You can’t expect me to believe that Arovska.”
>She shrugs, giving you only a lazy glance before splashing some clear liquid into her hand, rubbing it into her neck with a cocky smile.
>”Truth does not care if you believe in it Anon. It simply is. And you know I am above lying in a game.”
>”Do I really?”
>”Yes. Yes you do.”
>You concede defeat in the hands of her smugness, holding out your hands up on the air, playing it up as much as you could for fun.
>It wasn’t that you really believed her, you still had a few brain cells to your head, but a question started to shape itself, and the more you realized it, the more potential it had.
>Elbowing the table, you point an accusatory finger at her, raising your voice just enough to make a point.
>”Alright, guess I have a fate weaver with a penchant for perfume in front of me. HOWEVER! Last I remember, you were the last one to ask truth or dare, so I get to go now, right?”
>Her ears perk up, eyes aimed upwards as she tries to remember, closing them slightly and nodding afterwards, letting her head rest on her hand, elbow on the table.
>”I believe so, yes. No need to ask, I will say the truth.”
>You hold that finger in the air, squinting your eyes slightly, letting that feeling sink in as she just stares at you, unflinching.
>Smiling.
>This was the glory of truth or dare.
>Sometimes, the real treasure wasn’t the question you wanted to ask at first.
>It was the questions you asked afterwards.
>And the answers that you got from them, crucial, compromising, delicious.
>Breathing in, you ask, calmly, pointing your finger to her neck.
>”If peach perfume brought me in here, to this place… what’s the strawberry one doing for you?”


>It was almost impressive how silent the table became.
>Like a deer in the headlights, her face went from casual mockery and smugness to actual shock, ears pinned up high, her body stiffening like a plank.
>You even saw the little lip bite she tried so hard to hide but couldn’t, a rumbled groan being all you could hear as your finger aimed forward slightly, just to taunt her to react.
>You almost regretted asking by the way her back arched forwards, a reluctant sigh being all you heard before she spoke again, barely a whisper.
>”Forskarr. Well played. Dare.”
>”Damn. You sure?”
>She smiles, just slightly, before relaxing once more.
>”I bit off more than I could eat. I admit, that was a good enough question to injure my pride a little. And right after I had my little moment of glory too…”
>”All good things come to an end Arovska. Or is it Maria?”
>She offers you a weak shrug, pointing a finger at you.
>”I can go by either. Now, since you were denied your secret, what else would you want from me?”
>”Magical fate weaving perfume recipes would be nice and handy...”
>”Anon.”
>”Kidding, kidding. Well, usually you ask someone to do something embarrassing for kicks, but you got two pointy instruments in your head to shank me with. Speaking of-”
>”You want to touch them, don’t you?”
>You don’t even try to hide the laugh, shaking your head with a grin.
>”Guessing the kids ask that a lot?”
>”Correct. I suppose you are a cub as well?”
>”In heart and soul Arovska, in heart and soul. So?”
>”Usually, I would give them better uses but-“
>Rolling her eyes, she tilts her head forwards, giving you a curious look as the moss dangled from her antlers, the harebells almost falling off completely, closing her eyes with a smirk.
>”Oh just get it over with, you child. I cannot believe I’m actually allowing you, a grown man, to do this. Do you truly have no shame?”
>”Not over here I don’t. Ready to get grabbed?”
>”Shush it, or I am pulling them back Anon.”
>You silence yourself to a small giggle, cautiously reaching in with your fingers, letting them slide across the bone.
>It was odd, to say the least.
>You weren’t expecting feeling velvet underneath your fingers, for starters, but the warmth was something else entirely, almost like you were sliding your fingertips across a fuzzy blanket cover.
>It was bone underneath, sure, a soft grab was all you needed to confirm it, but it still felt different from anything you had ever touched before.
>Without even noticing, you find yourself stroking it gently all across its length, letting your fingers trace it all the way from the moss covered end to the thicker base, your fingertips brushing against her fur coat in the end.
>Arovska remained almost deathly quiet throughout, but the second your fingers brushed against her skull, she lifted her head, huffing and crossing her arms.
>”Limits Anon! To how much you dare, and to how much you are allowed.”
>”Sorry, just got a bit carried away. Not every day you get close to one of yours and well, I didn’t exactly expect to touch fuzzy antlers. Hands kind of moved on their own.”
>”At least you were… gentle. I have had cubs yank them and even try to ride my back whilst grabbing them to steer me. Rather painful, so I have to commend you for being respectful, even if you did take a rather long time to touch them.”
>”Once in a lifetime opportunity. I wouldn’t blame you for ruffling my hair, can you blame me for touching your antlers?”
>She coughs slightly, biting her lip and avoiding your eyes.
>”The way you did? Yes, I can blame you. But thankfully, it is my turn to play.”
>You eye her up, crossing your arms in anticipation.
>”Truth, so hit me with something good, will ya? Make it hurt.”
>”Very well.”
>It was hard to describe, but something felt off.
>Anthros still looked human like, sure, but beneath the fur, it was rather hard to really read them, and the only other thing you could go off on was their ears or tails when they didn’t smile or laugh, occasional eyebrow waggle aside.
>Yet she stood almost eerily still, only the faintest twitches of facial expression showing themselves, without you being able to read any of them, only her eyes really showing anything.
>And the look she gave you was almost predatory.
>After a few seconds too many, she asks once more, monotone and quiet.
>”Have you ever loved someone before?”
>You blink, half stunned by the question, the other half burning with curiosity.
>”I’m an open book, but you open that page? Really?”
>”We do not tend to be open about these kinds of things here. Besides, I am curious about you in particular. Do the questions matter if in the end you get to ask as well?”
>”I guess not. You really sure you wanna know?”
>”Absolutely. Surprise me.”
>You sigh, giving one last look at her before straightening your back, laying your elbows on the table.
>”So, back at our place, we have this thing to teach people as they grow up, from around 6 “winters” to about 18 or so. Hundreds of us in one spot but sometimes you get a few that go with you from year to year, some go to different groups and places, but you just keep running into some people as time goes on. And sometimes, young old you decided that one girl looked real pretty, sometimes another girl found you really cute, and it made a bit of a mess, yeah?”
>You sigh again, shrugging as she looked at you more intently, your eyes dropping down to the table.
>”Sometimes you fell for that one tan girl and never had the guts to ask her out. Sometimes the other cute girl really liked you but you were really, really thick in the head and never noticed until your mother told you, years after, and that might have happened more than once. Sometimes it was more than one girl liking you but then their confessions comes out of nowhere, and since you never really felt anything for them, you had to turn them down as gently as you could, but you knew least one cried…”
>You nod, mostly to yourself, feeling her eyes focus in on you as you paused for a few seconds, smacking your lips.
>”Sometimes, and just sometimes, she went with the years with you. She somehow liked you for ages, without you ever noticing. Sometimes you liked her, and she liked you back, enough so that even your thick headed ass knows she does, she practically rubs herself on you, and you even say she is cute. And you don’t go for it.”
>She blinks, eyes widening and ears propping upright.
>”Why would you not, when you knew she liked you back? It sounds like nothing short of the winds of fate behind your back!”
>You rub your temples, breathing in and clearing your throat.
>“I know it does, but let me make you a better question. You mind?”
>”Usually I would say I do, but you have proven to deserve the exception. “Hit me”, I suppose.”
>”Alright, think with me. You know this one guy is really into you, yeah? But you at most only care for like a night or two and what’s between and behind his loincloth. What kind of person would you be to crush his heart later on, just to get a one night lay with him? What kind of person would you be to just get what you wanted and not give back what they wanted?”
>She paused for a moment, the seconds passing by in silence, her once stern stare lessening into one of melancholic understanding, a solemn nod being all she gave you before she spoke again.
>“I would be a terrible person indeed.”
>A weak smile is all you can give, gesturing your hand towards her.
>”Well, there you go. Now, you gonna open a page of your own or am I gonna need a replacement for the one I can’t read?”
>”Ask, and you shall receive.”
>”You sure you ain’t gonna flake like last time?”
>Her hands motion towards the hanging moss in her antlers, giving the dangling pieces a quick flick, the green curtains swinging back and forth like a pendulum.
>”Can anyone truly be certain of anything?”
>”Arovska.”
>”Oh fine, I will try. Not my fault that you had to hit where I was most vulnerable.”
>”True, that was entirely my fault. I’m proud of that one, not gonna lie.”
>”Hmph, your fault it was. Still, I can see why your kind likes this game. Either you get to know something you should not or you get something out of it either way. Clever, if you get the right person to play.”
>”Clever, huh? You thought we were stupid, eh?”
>”Consider it a less flattering mindset, caused by some of your predecessors, now broken by your newer companions. Also you, of course.”
>Those last words hit you just a bit harder than they should, the smile on your face coming out of nowhere, nodding.
>”Fair enough, flattery accepted. Now, I’m just wondering, what the hell do I ask you? Perfume aside, you don’t seem like that closed of a book, just a nice smelling one. No offense, I think?”
>She waves a hand in the air, eyeing the air for a few seconds in thought.
>”I am biased, but something I would be more inclined to answer would be good. Less antler fondling would be appreciated.”
>Your veins freeze.
>Your throat clenches.
>Time itself seems to slow down, the phantasmal sounds of glass shattering echoing through your mind, your hands curling into a ball as your voice yells out, unrestrained by the works of your brain.
>”Wait a fucking second, fondling?”
>She freezes, coughing and nodding with a bitten lip, avoiding your eyes as much as possible.
>”Mizertcor d’Venk et Corp, said too much already, I suppo-“
>The words escaped you mouth sooner than you could think them, slamming your hand into the table with the same smug smile she gave you earlier, your finger lifting itself, aimed straight at her face.
>”Hold it! Truth or Dare?”
>You couldn’t tell what was worse.
>The fact you were pointing your finger at her with the strength of a retarded bull over something as stupid as a word slip.
>Or the fact she was eyeing you with equal strength and a growing growl, one you could only guess was embarrassed anger, repressed under a thin layer of outrage.
>You squint your eyes, earning a squint in return, both of you elbowing the table, the wood bending in slightly as you two stubbornly refused to budge, inching closer and close to one another, faces mere inches apart.
>”I asked ya Arovska. Truth or Dare?”
>”That you did, yet I am considering taking out the dagger to answer you!”
>”Truth or Dare, Arovska!”
>”Anon, I will hurt you, I SWEAR!”
>”YOU CANT HIDE MY BODY, AND YOU CANT HIDE FROM THE TRUTH!”
>”ARE YOU SURE ABOUT THAT?”
>”NOT REALLY, BUT IF IM GONNA DIE, FUCK IT, IM DYING FOR THIS!”
>”YOU ARE ONE STUBORN FILSK-D’BASK, YOU KNOW THAT?”
>”IF THAT MEANS SON OF A BITCH, I AM VERY AWARE!”
>She grits her teeth, and you bare yours, both your faces inching in together, unwilling to bend or break, her voice practically growled instead of spoken, eyes flaring.
>”You are the most stubborn, provocative human I think I have ever met.”
>”If that’s a compliment, I will gladly take it. If it’s an insult, doubly so.”
>”Why is it that you provoke me so? Human spirit like your kind before, or something else?
>”Tell you what, I’ll make you a deal! If you answer me with the truth, I’ll tell you why.”
>”Only if you tell me and I have the final question afterwards! No negotiation!”
>You throw out your hands in the air, palms towards her and slump back to your seat, tilting your head to the side.
>”Fair enough, deal is a deal! But I still want to read this page of yours Arovska, and you aren’t an oath breaker, are you?”
>She bit her lip again, the distinct sound of a sharp inhale in the air, her eyes closed, mouth pouting, yet calmer than before.
>”No. If nothing else, I do not break my oaths. Truth it is.”
>”So?”
>She tentatively opened her eyes, staring straight at you, not a hint of subtlety or shame.
>”They are sensitive. These are things I am not supposed to have, and none of the males told me anything about having them. I can forgive a child, and I can forgive you for not knowing, despite your thorough handling, but what it was, was.”
>You feel your throat clench tight, a tinge of guilt bubbling up your gut.
>”Shit, I really didn’t know. Sorry.”
>”I know you did not, I just was not expect you to be so… curious. Guess I should have, all things considered, so I suppose I am at fault.”
>If there seemed to be any coldness or anger in her voice, it seemingly melted away, showing a casual shrug to nobody in particular, with you being just a bit too suspicious to hide it.
>”So, no hard feelings?”
>She shakes her head, fingers gestured to the above, returning to a dangling hand.
>”The wind brought you near me Anon. I know it is hard to comprehend this certainty, but I just feel it, it was not by accident this breath of fresh air came unto my door, so how could I truly resent it for doing what it did?”
>”I’ve seen people I thought reasonable throw bitchfits over less, so hey, never hurts to ask, right?”
>”Indeed, it never does hurt. And now I get to ask twice.”
>”Still waiting on the good questions Arovska.”
>”You already know what I am going to ask Anon.”
>”Why, right?”
>”Correct.”
>”Fair enough. Well, how do I put this… you mind if I go on a tangent?”
>”I suppose not. Go on ahead.”
>”So, I got brothers and sisters, right? They are a pain in the ass most of the time, goodness knows that sometimes I wanted to punt them off a window, and they often ate my good food and drank my good drinks when I claimed them before. But even after I got pissed off at them, give it like an hour and everything is back to normal. They are family, the good kind, but if there is one thing I actually am scared of, it’s the picture perfect family.”
>She seems taken a bit aback, raising her right hand slightly in the air, head tilted to the side.
>“I am not really familiar with human families. Could you, “y’know”, explain a bit more?”
>”Fair, kinda forgot you didn’t really go out much into our place, if at all. Usual father and mother, whatever else pops from the latter is their kids. Kids live with ‘em for 18 or more years, parents feed ‘em, send ‘em to be taught while also teaching ‘em, they try and look after ‘em, but naturally you got some kids who think they know better than their parents, you got parents that don’t know what the fuck they are doing while being parents, you got mixes of the two. Guessing that also happens here?”
>”More than what you could ever imagine or believe, but continue, please.”
>”Right. But then we have “those” families, those that on the outside, don’t ever seem to disagree with each other, never seem to fight. The kind of families that feel wrong, and I’ve seen ‘em up close Arovska. People pretending to be nice to one another just to then snap one day and cause an all-out blood feud. I prefer a different kind of style.”
>”… One where you annoy someone to the breaking point?”
>”Close, but no. One where I know that sometimes I do that, but that it’s fine if it happens on either side. I admit, sometimes I’m a downright ass, sometimes my brother is a downright ass, but even if we get mad at each other, we know it ain’t because we are being pricks on purpose, sometimes we just wake up grumpy. Even if we get mad at each other, we don’t take it personally, because we know there ain’t real malice behind us two.”
>”So, a system where getting angry does not mean you are truly angry?”
>”More like it’s forgiven. You can only pile up so much on someone till they explode like a tree struck by lightning, so if, or when it happens, better nobody takes it personally than to have a 10 year grudge match with your tribe, I’d say. Never had people burst out here?”
>”A few, yes, and I suppose you have a point, but what does that have to do with what I asked? Why do it here, now?”
>You can’t help but smile, gesturing towards her.
>”Easy. Even if I don’t really meet you for long, as much of a shame as that’s gonna be, I’d rather be that kinda person with you. What better kind of way to get to know and push each other than this little game?”
>She merely raises an eyebrow at you, chuckling quietly.
>”Your idea of being yourself includes… complimenting a Guardian when you meet her, flirting with her after she gets worried for you and lowers her guard, then playing a game to get to know her, while… also trying to get her mad at you but not actually angry. Is that right?”
>”I didn’t really plan it, I kind of just went with the flow, but yeah, guess you can say so. You like it?”
>For a few seconds, she stood silent.
>Her eyes were glued to yours, almost as if expecting the jokes delivery, yet as the time passed, the corners of her mouth widened, the familiar rumble of a chuckle rising up, louder than it should be, her elbows resting on the table, chin upon one of her hands. 
>”Yes. Yes I do.”
>”Wait, really?”
>” Of course. You were not lying when you said this was more interesting than the book anon. I can read that anytime, but I suppose it *is* like you said. Once in a lifetime opportunities should be taken and, if nothing else, I learned a “fun” game to play with my Sisters.”
>”Also learned why I came in here, confirmation your perfumes worked, the current tragic state of my love life…”
>”Yes, yes, that too. But you also got to know my real name and you got to touch my antlers. That is a fair trade Anon, you cannot deny it.”
>”True, you do have some soft antlers. So, final question?”
>”Still thinking of what to ask, truth be told? I’m tempted to keep the question and ask later, if you wouldn’t mind.”
>”Just like the good old sword of Damocles! Only I’m not the one in power and now I get to stress over being asked something embarrassing at any moment.”
>”You can just say no Anon.”
>”You kidding me? You’ve been giving me all these easy questions, it’s about time I fear you! Go ahead, I need the scare.”
>All you get is an eye roll before she lifted herself from the table, staring into the now much darker sky.
>”Very well. It would be best if we make a campfire and assemble a tent before it’s too late. I assume you can light the fire?”
>”Yep, I got my own tricks. Want me to make the tent while you get the wood?”
>”If you would not mind. I placed the parts in my pack, should be simple enough to assemble.”


>Either she lied to you, or you really were just an unlucky man.
>Small plastic pieces, placed either in mystery pockets or seemingly invisible creases in the pack, said pack being more crammed than even your hastily shoved bag of polyester, not even mentioning the puzzling instructions, half crumbled or just MyKea levels of convoluted nothing inside.
>At least it was a spacious tent, assuming the paper wasn’t wrong or outright lying, big enough to stand in even.
>Eventually you managed to fish out all the parts and prep the base for it, making a small pebble free clearing to set up, flattening out the tarp on the floor, muttering to yourself how to bloody assemble this thing, humming the steps you memorized before.
>Get the long poles, slap ‘em all together, shove ‘em across the outer sleeves, shove the bottom clip into the rod, do it again.
>Get the ground stakes, get a corner and stab the fucker like it’s gonna suck your blood out, repeat 3 more times so tent doesn’t fly out in the night with you two in it.
>Rain tarp up, secure it, stretch it fine and let the realization that you are gonna have to do this all over again seep in.
>A muffled groan is all you get to grumble before she returns, her sleeves pulled back and carrying a rather large mound of dry tinder and sticks, a rather pleased nod at the tent.
>”I admit, I was expecting to return to something a bit less spacious. Or finished, for that matter.”
>”Man, I didn’t know you trusted me that little Arovska, kinda hurts!”
>She passes by you, dumping the wood nearby and giving you a pat on the shoulder, admiring the sight.
>”Oh, not like that. Sheila and Jack had it so that a few months before this, me and a few others got taught things like English and tent building, for socializing and being able to help. The language classes went okay as far as I know, the tent making, not so much.”
>”Alright, how bad?”
>She smirks, shaking her head to nobody in particular.
>”I believe they somehow broke the metal bars more than once, something Sheila was rather upset about, but also deeply impressed. Ursk clawed the covers to shreds if I remember correctly, and at least a few just kind of used branches and whatever else with the tents as bed and blanket.”
>”Damn. Kinda lazy, but effective I guess.”
>”Indeed. Humans have a saying for it, right? Take a goat to water, but you cannot make it drink?”
>”Horses, but yeah, close enough. So, want me to get the fire going?”
>”If you would not mind. I am curious to see the human method, Jack and Sheila never did show us how your people did it, and I would like to compare it to our own.”
>”Human method, eh? Alright, I’ll show you.”
>You head over to your pack to fetch your materials, a wide grin on your face.
>It’s not like you didn’t try to learn the proper way, really, but sometimes, things just weren’t meant to be.
>Sometimes you just didn’t want to get kicked out of your building for lighting a fire in the living room and having the fire department bust into your place.
>Sometimes scratching sparkrods together just felt lame.
>So, you did what humans did best. 
>You adapted and overcame.
>You dug into your backpack, bringing out the two ingredients to your success.
>Lighter fluid was a tempting third element, but you were trying to light a fire, not the whole fucking forest, choosing instead the 6th grader locker room special.
>A can of deodorant and the humble zippo lighter, a quick shake of former proving it was still good to go, with you gesturing towards the pile.
>”Is there fine or do you want it elsewhere?”
>She gives you a puzzled look, her eyes scanning the holy symbols of pubescent pyromania in your hands with nothing but trusting confusion as you came close to the pile.
>”Should be fine, I suppose. Go on ahead, the more we wait the colder it will get, and it tends to take a while for us to get the flames going.”
>You crouch down besides the pile, flicking open the zippo with that unmistakable, crisp *CLINK*, a small red flame fluttering out, shimmering in with the breeze.
>”We do it a lot faster. Fair warning, you might wanna step back a little.”
>Before you get any confirmation, you aim your gas sprayer and smirk, pulling the trigger and unleashing the scented gas, the familiar FWOOOOM echoing across the woods as it passes the lighter, a full on cone of fire aimed straight at the tinder, igniting it instantly.
>You let the gas run for just a few seconds more, sating your inner caveman and releasing your finger off the trigger, the echoing sound of the fire sprayer slowly dimming out, with you flipping the zippo closed, only a small, timid *clunk* as the wood started to crackle.
>You look back, only to find her mouth slightly open, her eyes shimmering with light, and the biggest expression of disbelief you think you ever saw.
>Your smirk was even stronger now, giving her a thumbs up, aiming to stir her a bit more.
>She stammers for a few seconds, coughing and staring at the fire you just made, eyes shifting between you and your improvised flamethrower tools.
>”I… I did not know what I expected, to be honest. That is one way to do things, I suppose? I just-”
>”Hey, relax a little, we got a fire now, right? C’mon, sit down, it’s getting warmer already.”
>”Yes, but HOW did you do that? That isn’t how every human sets up a fire, right? Should I be worried for the other group setting themselves ablaze?”
>”No to the latter, they don’t unless they are like me aaand I can show you how to do it if you want. I have a few spare cans, real easy to do, I learned this at school actually.”
>”They teach this at your schools!?”
>You can’t help but laugh a little, shaking your head and standing up, flicking and closing the lighter by pure habit.
>”Well, the teachers don’t. Mix boredom, humans, add in a pinch of youth filled rebellion and you get stuff like this. Honestly, if you haven’t been caught on fire at least once as a human on a locker room growing up, then you went to some boring schools. Still, offer is up if you want, would make a good story for the Sisterhood, yeah?”
>You gesture the zippo lighter towards her, shaking the can on your other hand, making sure it still had enough juice for another go.
>She was hesitant at first, but curiosity seemed to get the best of her, hands reaching out to grasp the lighter, inspecting it closely as her fingers glided across the featureless grey metal, humming as she managed to open it, cradling it in her hands.
>”Are you sure this is safe?”
>You merely roll your eyes, flipping the deodorant bottle in the air.
>”Do you really think I’d teach you this if I thought you’d set something serious on fire? C’mon, have some faith in me.”
>”Anon, you just said that you got set on fire at “school” from this, did you not?”
>”That’s because I was in an enclosed space with a bunch of other kids, while also being one. Lot more risk if you have several children doing it a small locker room. Now, still wanna learn from the best or not?”
>She seemed to contemplate the lighter a few more seconds, giving another quick look to the fire and nodding.
>”Well, once in a lifetime opportunity, as you would say. Teach me then.”
>”Alright, but I’m doing it my way. Stay still.”
>She seemed a bit puzzled by what you said but she stood still enough, with you walking up behind her and looking over her shoulder, her hands both still holding the zippo.
>”Alright, I’ll guide you. First thing you wanna do is make sure the lighter is on your weaker hand. Guessing it’s your left?”
>”I think so, yes?”
>”Alright then. Bear with me for a bit.”
>You line up your left hand with hers, gripping it gently and bringing it upwards just a bit, feeling her warm coat as you lead her hand, her thumb flicking it open, resting on the spark wheel.
>Again with the strawberry smell…
>”Alright, flick your thumb down quickly while gripping the wheel. Don’t worry if it doesn’t go first time, just give it your best.”
>She breathes in, flicking it a few times, hearing only a muted metalic *shlick* but no flame coming out.
>She huffs, pouting slightly, trying again and again to no real success.
>Maybe her fingers weren’t dextrous enough, you didn’t know exactly what but she eventually stops, staring at it with leering eyes.
>It was kind of cute, but you were being a fairly awful teacher.
>Breathing out, you gently place her thumb above the wheel, your own thumb above hers, giving it a gentle press down, but not yet enough to move it.
>”It’s tricky, I know. Was a bitch for me at first too, but you gotta do it juuust like… so.”
>Pushing her thumb down with yours, the unmistakeable sound of the wheels grinding out comes along, only now with a small, fluttering ember, the faint smell of methane in the air along with it.
>”It worked! Venk m’vitte, this is fascinating!”
>Now that was really cute, seeing her face brighten up like that over something so simple as a lighter.
>You felt her hand moving get closer to her face, giving her just a small bit of resistance to keep the flame from coming too close, with you giving her a gentle squeeze once more.
>”Hey now, humans aren’t really flammable but we also don’t have a fur coat. Don’t play with fire, even if it’s a portable ember, I don’t want my lovely apprentice burnt to a crisp.”
>You feel a playful jab at your ribs as she chuckles, still staring at the flame, fully entranced by it, moving the lighter around and seeing the ember dance as she moved it, the occasional chilly breeze threatening to put it out.
>You let her have her moment, sliding a can to her right hand, her eyes darting towards it as you closed her hand around it, placing your own thumb above the trigger as a precaution, her thumb slowly itching besides it.
 >”Now, you just bring in the can close to the flame behind it, and press the trigger. Want me to let go?”
>She seems to stop for a moment, shaking her head and lifting both her arms upwards, hazel eyes still glimmering with the light of the fire.
>”Ready when you are Anon. Just give me the order.”
>You smile and lift your thumb off the can, leading her hands properly, eyes staring at the sky.
>”Alright then Arovska. Fire!”
>She leans back into you, letting her finger finally press the cans trigger, the gas spraying out and hitting the flame, bursting out once more into a cone of fire aimed to the heavens, the noise echoing out as the light fluttered all around you two.
>You kept your hands gripping hers to make sure they didn’t move somewhere they shouldn’t, keeping them steady as they kept the fire upwards and away from the tent or yourselves.
>Her rising laugh proved infectious enough to make even you crack a wide smile, both of you just standing there together, her back pushing against you, feeling her lean in more and more as you gripped and steered her towards the right path.
>She stopped after a few seconds, her heart beating like a drum, her breath heavy yet shallow, a wide eyed grim plastered all over her face as her hands clasp together at her chest, your own around her out of caution and habit.
>You were kind of afraid she was about to call you out for hugging a Guardian from behind, but instead she just laughs, leaning her head back into your shoulder, breathing in the crisp cold air.
>Well, cold enough, considering all the fire you two just made.
>”That… was fun! Can I do it again? Please?”
>”I do have two or three extra cans… sure, why not. Gotta say, didn’t take you for a priestess of flame, should I be worried and hide the rest of my stash?”
>She chuckled, leaning in more towards you, her breath still heavy, slowing down as she looked upwards, the soft thumping of her heart being felt on your chest. 
>”Oh hush, let a girl have her moments. It is not every day a Guardian gets to do this kind of thing, I just… need a moment to breathe in, settle down...”
>”… And then keep blasting flames unto the air?”
>She just nods, raising her lighter and staring at it once again, a lazy smile covering her lips.
>”That is my plan, yes. Do you like it?”
>”Long as you don’t set the tent on fire? Yep, I do.”
>”Really? You do not mind?”
>”Nah, wouldn’t be right to steal your moment. Want me to let go?”
>”Just soften the grip a little. I want to do something, if you will let me?”
>You nod and let your grasp loosen, leaving only your fingertips to hover over her hands, your forearms accompanying her motions.
>She seemed to stop for a moment, contemplating what she wanted to truly do, slowly shifting her arms back and forth, your own being carried along in the pendulum motion, following along with whatever she had in mind, the poor lighters flame hanging on by a mere inch, if that.
>Without warning, she pulls her arms upwards as she slid to the left, arching above you two, creating a halo of fire as she shuffled to the right, leaving her to draw shapes upon the air.
>They were simple at first, things like a circle, a child-like outline of a house or a tree, but soon it was stars, shapes of people and what you assumed to be glyphs or letters, finishing with a simple line of fire downwards unto the ground, giggling all the way throughout.
>It was almost like a dance, in a sense. 
>The way she moved back and forth, left and right, with you shadowing her every step, right behind her, mere inches away, following the rhythm.
>Almost reminded you of those boring salon dance lessons your mother once put you through, only with a pyromaniac priestess added in.
>A lot more fun this way, you had to admit.
>Inevitably, the can ran out of precious scented juice, leaving her to press the poor button until it had nothing left to give, a disappointed frown on her face as she stared at it, mimicking the shake you did, a whole lot of silence as a result.
>It was hard to stifle your laughter, seeing her act like this, even more for condoning it so thoroughly, but she seemed to take it like a champ, laughing along with you as well.
>You let go of her to grab another can, more reluctantly than you expected, getting your sleeve grabbed instead as you tried to move away, her face scrunching into something you couldn’t quite make out in this light, breathing in sharply.
>”I… thank you, Anon. Truly.”
>”Hmm? For what?”
>”Come now, for teaching me this! For the laughter. For… making this *fun*. It has been a while since I really had this kind of peace, this kind of journey, and all thanks to you.”
>”Nah, you got it backwards.”
>”Huh?”
>You slung your arm up just enough to let your thumb point itself back, towards to the path you came out of, making a point to look at it before aiming your gaze at her.
>”You were the one who picked me back there, weren’t you? You could have gotten any other guy or gal, but it was you who picked up this big idiot here. You only got yourself to thank at best, not me.”
>”Maybe so, but I do not believe that any other person would have done what you did, would they?”
>”True, not everyone teaches a pries-, khmn, a Guardian how to shoot fire like a locker room ninja. Not everyone plays Truth or Dare with them but in the end, it’s up for the Guardian to pick ‘em up amongst the crowd, right?”
>”You seemed to pick me more than anything, when we met at the tent.”
>”Even if that were so Arovska, if what you say is true-”
>”Which it always is, Anon.”
>”-then I came in by your hand, didn’t I? Peach perfume and all lead me here and you picked me afterwards. Or did you lie about that?”
>”…”
>”Well?”
>A proud, face raised huff is all you can see, the cloud of vapour condensing in the air, followed by a long, drawn out breath.
>”I swear, you humans. I try and compliment you, and you flip it on me. I praise your skills and you say I picked you right. I try and comfort you once, thinking you were hurt and you flirt with me! I show curiosity, and you make me play with fire like a child!”
>You can’t help but chuckle at those thing, shrugging it off.
>”And you had fun with all of those, didn’t ya?”
>”Yes, yes I did! Yet if I ask, I fear you won’t answer as to why you do such things, will you? That is what confuses me the most.”
>”Honest answer?”
>”I would say the Truth, but I have a better question to ask later, I suppose.”
>”Ominous, I like it! But we are just kind of like this, I guess. I can’t really answer why I teach pretty deer girls how to do locker room tricks, I guess I just do.”
>Your compliment seemed to land well enough, earning you an eye rolling smile.
>”Come now, be serious for a moment. Do you have no explanation at all?”
>All you can really do is give a half-hearted shrug, eyeing the fire and the night’s sky, settling on the latter.
>”It’s just my nature, I suppose. Grass grows, Wind blows, the Sun will shine another day, we hope, and I’m just me, being myself. Hopefully an entertaining me, yeah?”
>”Indeed. Also a very confusing you, but that is what I get for picking a human, I suppose.”
>”And you picked one of the best. Now…”
>You head out for your pack and bring up another cheap can of gas, shaking it for her.
>”Want some more ammunition or do you wanna call it quits for the night?”
>She seems to consider it for a bit but ends up shaking her head, throwing the empty can towards you and closing the zippo, motioning it forwards.
 >”Let’s consider this the first lesson, yes? I have more to learn from you tomorrow, I am sure.”
>You catch the can and pocket the lighter, chucking the former on the trash and grabbing out a little bag of food from your pack.
>”Don’t butter me up too hard, or I’ll bring out the lighter fluid. Then we might actually set the forest on fire.”
>”Is that a dare or a warning Anon?”
>You look a bit to the side, squinting your eyes to your surroundings.
>”Both, honestly. If this trick lit up the bonfire easy, then the other thing might just light up the tent and any tree branch up above it.”
>”You jest, surely.”
>Your calm blink and slow shake of your head sent the message good enough, leaving her to not only stay silent in slight awe, but grin in seeming anticipation.
>You nonchanlantly dig into your bag, pulling out a sandwich, but one thing was certain.
>You were securing your backpack this night, even if you had to sew it shut with a fishbone and pocket lint.


>Sitting by the fire and leaning back on your backpack, you found yourself an appreciation for the term “survival tv”.
>Maybe it was something genetic from millennia ago, maybe it was your little stunt of introducing a priestess into pyromania, but it was oddly soothing to just stare at the flames, hearing the crackling, feeling the warmth of it on your skin just radiating out.
>You fed it a stick or two every once in a while to keep it going strong, the occasional poof of fire bursting out above, eliciting a giggle or two from your companion as she sat beside you, earning a mild chuckle from you as well.
>You didn’t feel there was any real need to talk, at least not now, letting the both of you rest a little before you hit the hay, to focus your thoughts and whatever else before you snoozed.
>You both needed it, to be honest.
>It was a bit of a trek but the real thing that hit you two seemed to be the culture shock.
>You winged it all, not really knowing how to even try to behave near a self-proclaimed Guardian, but you figured you left a good enough impression all things considered.
>Not a perfect one, mind you, nowhere near close;
>Grabbing her antlers was probably a bit too taboo to consider when sober, not to mention playing Truth or Dare, teaching her how to light a locker room fire, the sudden flirting after something got in your eye back at the sunrise…
>Okay you were very, very far from perfect.
>Still, it seemed to work fairly well with her thanking you for the new experiences and having a blast.
>You figured you either got lucky or she was sincere in tolerating your fuckups, not much you could really do about the past, leaving only the future to strive for.
>Leaning back more into your impromptu pillowpack, you just close your eyes and let yourself relax a bit with the heat, leaving Arovska to do whatever she wanted to do.
>You still had the fire juice locked down under your head after all, so you weren’t particularly worried about a surprise incineration.
>What you didn’t expect was the odd metallic rattling that followed and the soft smell of incense in the air, with you opening an eye to see her fiddling with a small silver censer, the grey smoke rising from within it and blanketing the area as she swung it back and forth, the scent carried with the breeze.
>She was quick to notice you looking, giving you a simple smile.
>”It’s been a long day, so I reasoned we could use something to relax. I made these myself, so nothing to be afraid of.”
>You just wave it off, sinking in deeper into your comfy rest, your arms comfortably laid behind your head.
>”Fine by me, as long as we don’t start tripping.”
>”Tripping? But we sitting Anon, not walking.”
>”Right, wrong word to use, it means something else to us. You know, long as I don’t smell it for a bit and start getting hungry, looking at my hands like they are the most fascinating thing in the world and saying incredibly dumb things like the air tasting purple, I don’t mind.”
>She seemed to stare blankly at you for longer than she should, finally mouthing an “Ah!” as the gears clicked on her head, nodding softly. 
>”Oh, not to worry then, I did not put any kind of mushrooms in these or any others I brought with me.”
>You quirked an eyebrow at that, opening your other eye and shooting her a confused look.
>”Wait a minute… you put “those” kinds of mushrooms on incense? Really?”
>She seemed surprised at your tone, picking up one of the sticks from her satchel, inspecting it thoroughly as she explained.
>”I sometimes get requests for them, yes. The smoke allows for a lighter, less dangerous effect, just have to close the windows and you can simply relax with someone else for the duration.”
>”I gotta say, I didn’t take you for one of those Arovska. Perfume, sure, you smell nice enough, but wouldn’t figure you’d be a drug supplier of all things.”
>”What is so wrong with it? Sometimes you simply need to relax after a failed hunt, or maybe you just want to become friends with someone, so you offer them as a gift. They are harmless enough since I reduce the amount. And often enough a source of laughter.”
>”Aright, you can’t just say that without telling me more, that’s just cruel.”
>”Humans and their insatiable curiosity…”
>”Yep, that’s us. C’mon, story time.”
>A bitter smile covers her face, rolling her eyes and settling down closer besides the fire, staring at the sky.
>”One of our hunters, a wolf, had been in a fey mood, if that is how you say it. Rebuffed by someone he fancied, failing his personal hunts, finding even one of the other tribesmen going across his private property, he was, as Sheila would put it, “right proper pissed off”. So he came unto me, hearing the rumours and requested something to let him forget, to let him calm himself.”
>She gives you a quick glance, continuing.
>”I saw in the state he was, and set to work immediately. I told him to gather me some more ingredients as he went out more than me and to give me a day. He spent said day stuck on his home, throwing a silent temper tantrum at himself, and carving out a small bowl to place the incense sticks on. He didn’t even thank me when I delivered it to him, simply taking it and retreating inside, ready to use it.”
>The bitterness in her smile vanishes, replaced by a deep, almost sadistic chuckle.
>”I was to warn him to not light more than a single stick every day, and to wish him the best. Seeing as to how he was not willing to listen, I was not willing to warn him, and instead he lighted all five I made at once, breathing in the fumes and closing his window to his bed chambers. Ah, the things he said Anon! The marvellously stupid things he said in that stupor…”
>She placed a hand on her chest, another one aimed to the sky, a forced look of grief on her face, almost breaking fully into laughter as she mimicked his voice, so thick with sarcasm you could slice it with a knife and place it on a plate.
>”Oh Wind, how could she reject me so, such a grandiose hunter of the tribe? How could she not like me for my skills, for my strength, for my utter charisma? Doomed shall I be to the mourning winds of Fate, to be nothing but a dredge, an ember snuffed out from the feast’s pyre!”
>She almost breaks down laughing, shaking her head to try and focus, placing a hand upon her censer.
>”This went on for a long time Anon. I sat by that window, listening and laughing, and I did not do so alone. When he came unto my door once more, thanking me, I merely smiled and said he was welcome, and told him that the girl he liked had a fancy for hand-made wine. I’ve heard they had a good time together.”
>All you can really do is laugh along, nodding to nothing in particular, lazily stretching your arms and legs.
>”Damn. I figured you would have misled him or something by the end, sounds like something I’d do.”
>”We all have days like that sometimes. He was not a bad man, just a bit-“
>”Dumb? Stupid? Arrogant?”
>She smiles, nodding along.
>”Yes. Short sighted and shockingly lazy too, with a frankly appalling low strength of Will. Hence the wine.”
>”Hmm? What about it?”
>”Everyone likes wine Anon. Everyone likes gifts. Everyone can tolerate each other for the most part, but it takes something more to consider living with them, to share a bed with them for more than a night. Commitment. Being able to compromise and work together. A show of effort.”
>”… and wine is all three. Effort to make, commitment for it to ferment, and asking others for help, I’m guessing? Clever, real clever.”
>She stammers a bit, slightly impressed you figured it out so quick and not prepared for what you said, nodding as nonchalantly as she could.
>”Thank you. Truth was, she did not even like wine all that much, but she saw it for what it was and gave him a shot. It didn’t work out too well in the end, but they both became better because of it.”
>“Heh, bit of a bittersweet ending, don’t you think?”
>”So many of them here Anon, you would never believe it.”
>”Guessing it goes with the Guardian thing and confessions huh?”
>”Hmmm. You hear the worst and remember it, hear the best and forget it, the rest you barely listen.”
>”Sounds tough.”
>”It is, but they need it. Everyone always needs someone to confide on, to trust, even if it is a stranger they will never meet again or their own flesh and blood.” 
>She closes her eyes, breathing in deeply, her face severe and thoughtful.
>”The Wind will always hear your thoughts, your fears, your wishes, but he will never answer them. He may bring in the winds of purity and refreshment, or aid the fires blaze unto your home as it has before, but it will never speak unto you. To attain such a purity of being, such a nature of liberty is our dream, but, when you can no longer bear the burdens-”
>She opens her eyes once more, a clenched fist moving toward her heart, her face a mix of pride and melancholy. 
>”-you come unto us. You come unto those that vowed to aid you and others. You come and whatever it is you need, we will try and help. For the Wind is never alone, and neither can you be akin to it alone.”
>You could tell this meant something serious to her, straightening your back from your previously lazy ass lean onto your backpack.
>You were given an expectant look, being asked without any questions and heating up your hands before you spoke, giving only a mild cough to clear out your voice and grasping your together in thought.
>”Humans… don’t really have something so defined. There isn’t some fully united ideal to bond us all together across the globe, or just one Wind. For us, there’d be at least five of ‘em, its teachings having a new meaning in every big “tribe” you walked up on, with them being maybe winters of walking distance apart, see? You can have someone like you in those places, but you never really know if they would be a “true” Guardian. Not everyone believes in the Wind, not everyone lives by it, and those that would, all live with different kinds of ‘em. Bit of a mess honestly.”
>She sat there, seemingly absorbing your words but after a few seconds of silence, she blinks at you, asking a simple question.”
>”… How?”
>”How what?”
>”How do you remain united as a whole?”
>You just laugh a little and give her the most honest answer you could, shit eating smirk on your face.
>”Arovska, the day mankind is “united” is the day where the world fucking ends.”
>Her face shifted from confusion to mild suspicion, a flash of frustration and fear of all things, before finally settling on confusion again by the end.
>”… Then how do you even function? If you aren’t united, what even brings you all together?”
>”Short answer? No man is an island. Or a mountain, rather.”
>”And the longer one?”
>”Well, we need each other. Nobody can live, sustain himself or feel good fully alone, even when you aren’t very social, you can have the choice, the need. And you need that choice, people have tried living full on hermit and they mostly just failed.”
>”That is rather odd. Many of us can do so perfectly fine, are you sure you are not exaggerating?”
>”The worst punishment ever found for humans, below death itself or slicing off arms and legs is complete isolation for weeks, Arovska. I’m sure.”
>She seemed to take your words to heart, giving up on her heartfelt stance and flopping back into her pack, with you deciding to do the same.
>Confused, but notably more comfortable, she breathes out a sigh and shrugs off her worries, eyes landing themselves on you.
>”Does your kind even know how they work?”
>”Two thousand years and counting, and the answer is still mostly no. Why?”
>”It seems so odd. Thousands of people in a city and barely anyone truly knows each other? Not being able to live truly alone? It does not sound like it should work.”
>”Works better than what you’d ever expect, honestly. Not perfectly, but you don’t have to deal with food or water shortages, usually have a safe, warm place to sleep in and you can mostly do your thing. You get a lot done when everyone is relatively happy, fed and clean Arovska.”
>”When everything is fine here, our people just tend to sleep.”
>”Eh, a lot of us do it too. We just have enough people that we can afford to have a bunch of lazy asses.”
>”Actually, how many of your kind even are there? I always wished to know but I did not have the chance to ask Sheila or Jack.”
>”Gimme just a second, I’ll check.”
>You fish your phone out of your pocket and turn on your mobile data, and a few seconds later, turn your head to her, a sudden thought coming to you.
>”If you don’t mind me asking, how many humans do you really think there are out there?”
>”Oh, surely a good few tens of thousands. Your kind spreads out far and wide, or so I have heard.”
>”Uhh, I hate to break it to ya, but wrong estimate. We aren’t tens of thousands, we are about-”
>You quickly check your phone again to confirm, nodding at the bright screen.
>”-seven or so billion people. Halfway to eight, actually.”
>”B-billions? Yo-you jest, surely?”
>The tone of mild panic in her voice was worrying, but you just showed her the phone to confirm it, her eyes going wide.
>”Nope. Seven or eight of ‘em, all humans, all around the world.”
>She seemed to mutter to herself in disbelief, trying to comprehend what you just said and proved, settling on grabbing some food from her own pack and nibbling it, her brow still furrowed.
>”Eter et Liva Venk, I knew that there were many of your kind, but not… this. I guess I simply do not understand your kind as whole? Billions of people, yet no true consensus? No unity?”
>”If it’s any consolation, most of us don’t understand ourselves neither and we lived our whole lives as humans. We are just complicated, I guess.”
>She smiles for a second but it seems short lived, her frown deepening again as she bit her lip, a hint of disappointment and anger.
>Not at you, but at herself. 
>”Maybe so, but what you said of your “place”, it still seemed nice. Maybe not peaceful but nice, and if I am to be honest, it shames me to not understand something. It is my duty Anon, and I feel as if I fail if I cannot understand and take the good from the bad, for my people.”
>It hurt to see her like this.
>It hurt even more knowing you knew you were the source of it.
>You didn’t intend for this, not at all, you just wanted to show her some parts of how humans worked, but instead your heart clenched, seeing her like this.
>The pit you felt in your stomach was bigger than you ever thought you’d feel over something as minor as this, your throat clenching to an uncomfortable degree, biting down on any word you didn’t fully commit to.
>You forced down on your ego and risked it, placing a hand on her shoulder and gripping it, trying your best to smile, despite it all.
>”Hey… your place seems a lot simpler, a lot nice nicer and your work ain’t just important to your folks, it’s vital to ‘em, respectable even by our dumb standards. Humanity has almost 8 billion idiots on its team, had over two thousand years head start and still can’t figure itself out. Brighten up, you look way better when you smile.”
>Your words seemed to hit her well enough, a creeping, stifled laugh slowly surfacing out, even as she tried her best to keep her sunken face, giving up her effort after you gripped her once again, smirking as she pushed you backwards towards your bag.
>”Oh fine! A girl like me cannot even have the right to sulk and feel bad near you, does she Anon?”
>”Not this one, not on this trip, not with me. You know that by know, c’mon.”
>A smiling nod is all she could really give you, staring at the fire with an odd, focused stare.
>”That I do, but what I said is still true. Would you mind speaking more tomorrow? I just wish to know more, to understand. It feels wrong to quit trying.”
>”Sure, no problem. I’ll warn you however, we really don’t make a whole lot of sense, so you are gonna have to bear with me and our dumb stuff.”
>”I am sure I can handle it. Listening to inane “dumb stuff” is almost everything I do these days… Better than to build once again, I suppose.”
>She warmed her hands closer to the fire, clenching and releasing by instinct, letting them hover dangerously close to the blazes, almost as if taunting them, speaking once more in a much more solemn tone.
>”Could you speak like you have before? Of solitude amidst your kind, of feeling like a stranger? Of the sweetness of the seemingly cold hearted, how the drunkards will always say their minds in truth? Of living even if it doesn’t mean it will get better?”
>”What’s with the sudden burst of poetry? I mean, I don’t mind, I can talk about it, but what gives?”
>”I am merely saying what you have to me. You spoke something interesting, even if you masked it with cursing and your own little way of speaking. I am merely repeating what was told by you.”
>”You are still prettying it up Arovska, c’mon.”
>”In my eyes, it was already pretty. It just needed a slight touch to be beautiful.”
>You can’t help but roll your eyes, leaning back once more into your backpack, savouring the heat in peace.
>”I ain’t winning this one, am I?”
>”Very unlikely you will.”
>You raise your arms as much as you possibly could, hamming up your fake defeat.
>”So be it! A defeat to a worthy opponent, I’ll reveal the secrets of mankind tomorrow! Deal?” 
>”Deal it is. And maybe I shall refrain from asking your fated question if you speak well.”
>”Ah, so short lived, the curse of Damocles!”
>”I said maybe Anon. We have more days still for me to dangle your damnation on my whim, do we not?”
>”True enough, yeah. Let’s see if I don’t end up doing something stupid like fondle your antlers again, eh?”
>A rumbling, low laugh is all you hear, and you can’t help but laugh as well, the cold wind circling around the fire, an odd sense of peace enveloping you both.
>You throw another stick at the flames and breathe out a sigh of relief, hearing her getting up from her spot, dragging her pack up with her.
>”I am rather tired, so I think I will be heading inside. Please do not take too long, it will get colder soon.” 
>”I’ll head off in just a minute, don’t worry, just gonna fuel this up a lil more. Never hurts to keep a fire going, right?”
>She hums and walks into the tent, closing its entrance with you scrambling out to gather some more sticks and tinder, chucking them inside the burning pile, the notable growth in the flames shining in your eyes.
>Happy enough with the fiery result, you warm yourself once more and grab your stuff before heading inside the tent, the stars shining up above the black sky.



 

>Grasping the cold metal zipper on the outside, you decide to not be hasty and jerk it upwards, lifting it only slightly before speaking up.
>”Hey, mind if I enter now or do you need a minute?
>”Hmm? No, come on in.”
>Lifting the zipped door up, you peer your head in and blink, taking in a few seconds to make sure her incense wasn’t tainted and that you weren’t hallucinating.
>What surprised you wasn’t even the blue couple’s sleeping bag she was sitting on, which raised even more questions than you could possibly comprehend.
>It wasn’t even the fact she was sitting on her legs, atop of said sleeping bag, seemingly fascinated by its texture.
>It was the fact she was very much wearing nothing at all, her robe and belt rope neatly placed by her corner of the tent, not a hint of stress or surprise as you peeked inside, able to see her backside in full view, nothing left to the imagination or out of sight.
>You must have been looking for longer than you thought, her head swivelling back in worry.
>”Is something the matter Anon? You are letting all the cold inside”
>You could feel a flush of red warmth fill up your cheeks, zipping it closed in a flash and standing upright outside, your mouth half opened, struggling to find words, settling for whatever you managed to spit out.
>”Arovska?”
>”Uh… Anon? Is anything wrong?”
>”Explain something to me, would you?”
>”Yes?”
>”Why in BLAZES did you say I could come in?”
>”Because… you can? Is this a human thing?”
>You can’t help but to rub your temples in frustration, the redness in your cheeks refusing to budge down, radiating warmth like a fire, your poor face flushed like a ripe tomato.
>”YES, it IS a human thing! Can’t you see the issue here?”
>”I can see the shape of a man outside that will not come in despite having no reason to, if that is what you are talking about.”
>Your fingers traveled downwards, slowly stretching your face as they did, leaving you to groan a deep, long sigh.
>”Despite having-, oh you have got to be shitting me. Sheila and Jack didn’t tell you guys, did they?”
>”Tell us what? Anon, it’s getting cold, just come insi-“
>”Humans don’t sleep naked with people they don’t know unless they wanna fuck ‘em Arovska! Much less sleep with naked people they just met a day ago!” 
>The awkward, long silence was broken by a simple, defeated “Oh”, the shifting of plastic and the shadow from the inside signalling her retreat into the sleeping bag.
>Your words came out stronger than they should have, but you couldn’t really say them any other way, preferring to be honest than to choke out some half assed excuse she wouldn’t understand.
>Didn’t mean that you weren’t feeling a pang of guilt when you zipped it up again and came inside, finding her not only clothed but hunkered down under the couple’s bag, facing to her own corner of the tent, a grimace on her face.
>”I suppose I should have known. The people who gave me the bed were rather insistent on asking if I was sure about a double bed, but I figured it would be fine…”
>You can’t help but let out another sigh, sitting by your own side of the tent.
>You were frowning, but only really at yourself, dropping down your pack to the ground and digging your own sleeping bag from it, setting it down.
>”We all do dumb things, especially humans. Sorry, for acting like this and not telling you about me bringing my own. It’s just… it’s a big deal for us, y’know? Sharing a bed is something we aren’t used to doing, not with strangers.”
>You might not have been an expert on reading anthros, but you weren’t entirely clueless.
>The look in her eyes and way she shifted upwards gave you a good enough assurance you didn’t offend her, at least not deeply enough to matter.
>”Much less when said strangers are naked and above something meant to be shared by you two, I assume?”
>“Yeah. Yeah, you could say that. I’m honestly surprised that duo never told you about this, figured you and the rest of your folks would know.”
>She pulls herself out of the bag to a sitting position, keeping herself covered as she shrugged to your words.
>”They spoke to us about making the excursion, but we just organized it with them. Besides the English, me and my sisters never participated in the “classes” they put up. Well, besides the tent making that is, but I got told to go there by my sisters.”
>”Huh. Any reason why for the tents?”
>She smiles, a hand raised upwards, fingers flourishing in the air, seeming to dismiss the idea.
>”I told you, did I not? Seeing our little tribe fail to set them up and Sheila’s face was something rather fun. Besides, they liked seeing us be there, and good company is always enjoyed.”
>You nod along, taking off your jacket and dumping it next to your own corner, plopping yourself down on the plastic bedding, letting out a grunt of relief.
>”Yeah, those two are a good pair to be around. Seems like they have a good thing going on too, what with this trip and all. Jack even got all emotional on us too, never took him for the sappy kind.”
>”May I be honest Anon?”
>You raise an eyebrow and stretch your legs, throwing her an odd look.
>”Like you ever needed my permission. Go on ahead, I don’t snitch.”
>She huffs for a moment, leaning back and staring at the “ceiling” of the tent.
>”I always thought this was more of a nuisance than a boon, this trip. Our kind had good things to say, but the hurt egos, the even more hurt faces I had to mend and the issues that came from this had me doubting it all. But now I am actually here?”
>She can’t help but to nod and smile, sighing in what looked to be defeat, hands raising themselves upwards, mimicking yours.
>“I believe I have changed my mind. Even if for it, I paid the price of having one *very* bold, brash but at times entertaining human under my wing. So thank you, sincerely, and apologies “this” has happened.”
>If you had any grudge or irk against her, you probably would have lost it, but it was hard to lose what you never really had to begin with.
>If anything, she was probably the one you slighted the most, but here she was, not only buttering you up but mimicking you too, the lifted hands being a nice touch that warmed your heart up more than you’d ever expect.
>”You never had to thank or apologise to me, and you don’t gotta start now either. If anything you should have been harder on me, you’ve let me get away with too much.”
>”Such as?”
>You bring up your hand, closed to a fist, fingers lightening from your grip as you talked.
>”Well, teaching a priestess to love to blast fire, for a first. Letting me touch your antlers for a second, buttering you up when you got worried for a third, tricking you into truth or dare for a fourth… anything else?”
>”I had fun, learnt or knew you were pure from all those… or at least pure enough, anyways. You are forgiven anon, much like how I hope you forgive this little incident.”
>”Well, little to forgive on my end if you go on and act all gracious like that. C’mon, if you didn’t stay mad after the antlers, how could I be mad for this? I’d be a right cunt, in the likely words of Sheila.”
>Her closed eyed chuckle made clear you were spot on in your mimicry, earning you a slow nod and a lazy eye rub.
>”That you would. I am not truly used to this kind of forgiveness as mistakes here are often… complicated. This is new to me, being fully honest.”
>”Eh, no use complicating the simple, right? C’mon, lets sleep, you look like you need it, yeah?”
>”Yeah… yeah, I do. And Anon?”
>”Hmm?”
>She slinks beneath her sleeping bag, shifting until she was comfortable, turned to the opposite side of the tent.
>”The offer stands. If it gets too cold, you can come right in.”
>You start to empty out your phone and keys to a corner, taking off your jacket and slinging it over your pack.
>”You sure? I mean- I probably won’t, but isn’t that weird for you?”
>”We do not seem have the same issues your kind has over this, so not at all. The robes I wear are mostly to establish my position, little else.”
>”Mostly, huh?”
>”Whoever says they enjoy the cold breeze creeping up their bare privates is a liar anon. But you never heard it from me.”
>You can’t help but to hum in agreement, sliding inside the sleeping bag and letting out a relieved grunt, your back and ass finally laying on something mildly softer than wood or rock, turning to your side of the tent and closing your eyes to sleep.
>”Night, Arovska.”
>”Good night, Anon.”
>You closed your eyes and huffed, trying your best to sleep while the heat of the campfire still warmed up the tent, eager to get some shut eye after a long day.



>You wished you could say you slept a long, comfortable sleep, but try is all you did.
>The bags padding wasn’t terrible. but it really wasn’t anything compared to your good old bed back home, leaving you to shuffle longer than you wished just to get decently comfortable in it.
>Maybe half an hour after you shifted in, the campfire seemed to fizzle out, the once pleasant glow and heat turning into dark and shocking cold, leaving you to find out that the salesman lied through his fucking teeth over how great the bag was for its price, bragging about how you could sleep through all of winter with it.
>All in all, you maybe slept for an hour tops, leaving you to cradle yourself with your arms to conserve heat, your stubbornness and flushed red cheeks all you needed to stay out of the other bag.
>You were a man, sometimes one with principles and standards, and you had to use those dusty things sometimes before you forgot them.
>Sleeping with her? After you mouthed off like that? Sure, she forgave you and all, but warm or not, it was still sleeping with someone likely wearing a birthday suit beneath the plastic.
>Your mind was already conjuring some rather inappropriate imagery, and the last thing you needed was another place getting flushed while your teeth started to rattle, much less sharing a couple’s sleeping bag.
>You never even knew those things existed before you came inside, and while your thoughts wandered about how more padded it was compared your cheap plastic tomb, it still felt… wrong to go there.
>Maybe it was just good old human pride, freshly faded embarrassment or something else entirely, but you said you wouldn’t and that was reason enough for you to weather the hours.
>Speaking of, you reached out in the dark for your phone, pressing the side button and getting a face full of blinding, searing light as your reward, the time clear on the bright screen.
>11:27, ticking into 11:28 sharp. 
>Wasn’t even midnight but you knew the sun started getting up at about six or seven, she would probably sleep in due to the cold, can’t forget extra wakeup time…
>You do the math and end up estimating you’d have to endure about eight, nine hours of uncomfortable, sleepless cold, and they were about to get worse as time went on.
>Joy.
>You turned off your phone, leaving you in the dark again to grit your teeth, closing your eyes to try and wait it out, instead hearing the rustling of plastic behind you, sluggish and slow but sounding like a thunderstorm in the silence of the woods.
>In this quiet, anything sounded loud, and her groggy, sleep addled voice wasn’t an exception.
>”Hard to sleep in the cold, Anon?”
>”Nah, just something on my phone, had to che-“
>She cuts you off, a hint of anger in her worn out voice.
>”I have been hearing your teeth clatter for a while. I do not enjoy being lied to, much less by you.”
>You sigh out, opening your eyes in the dark, caught red handed with no good excuse left to give.
>”Yeah… yeah, it’s hard to sleep in the cold. Guy I got this bag from told me it’d be good enough, but guess I underestimated the cold a little. Or he lied to me through his fucking teeth. Pick one, I guess.”
>She stays quiet for a while, a long drawn out breath cutting the silence, her voice unusually mellow.
>”What I said before stands now. I will not force you Anon, I am too tired to even try, but you can come inside. I will not touch you, just… do what you will. But I would like to sleep without a stubborn human clattering his teeth all night, if that is alright with you.”
>A comforting, even welcoming offer, with just enough of a kick in the ego to nail it home that it was the only real option you had.
>It was easy to forget she was a priestess sometimes with the way she treated you, but she still had that sting to her words that only years of practice could bring.
>You find yourself lacking your previous stalwart strength, stretching your stiff legs and escaping from your bag in the dark, hands scouring the floor in order to guide yourself towards her.
>”Thanks, I owe you one. You on this side or the other one?”
>”Other one. And you owe me nothing Anon.”
>”Truth cares not for what you think, right?”
>She breathes out a muffled huff, shuffling further into her side of the bed.
>”Time and a place. Be witty in the morning instead, would you please?”
>”Alright, will do.”
>Your hands finally griped at the plastic, traveling across the “pillow” and meeting the opening towards the inside, a surprising amount of heat irradiating from within.
>You didn’t waste any more time and slid on inside, your poor, sore back relieved that the padding inside was much thicker than what you expected, softer too.
>Sinking in, you could feel the warmth radiating from within, a sense of comfort washing over you, weighing your body down into a peaceful, slow slumber.
>The sheer amount of heat was frankly impressive compared to what you had in the other sleeping bag, enough to almost make you sweat.
>You could feel it coming from her side, but she seemed to give you a wide berth out of respect, knowing you weren’t entirely comfortable with the idea, even if you were very much comfortable now.
>You closed your eyes and moved to your side, inching just a bit more of distance away to be safe, your strength giving out as you settled in for good.
>Tired as you were, you didn’t even question the dancing shapes and shadows you “saw”, your eyelids shut and never to open again, deciding to clear your mind and simply focus on the warmth and sleep as much as you could.
>You had a long day up ahead...



>…and a longer night, it seemed.
>As your old saying went, Fate was a whore, Destiny was a bitch, and the Future was the brothel owner, ready to wrangle you inside to get screwed.
>You were comfortable now, you weren’t complaining about that.
>Warm? Without a single shred of a doubt, enough so you even stripped off your jacket, leaving only your pants and shirt to cover you.
>She didn’t even snore, the proverbial cheery on top of this luxury cake.
>No, your issue was her shifting.
>Under the silence of the woods, a broken branch was like thunder, and a mishmash of plastic shuffling about was like a waiter dropping a pallet of porcelain, just without the hollering that followed.
>You woke up a few times from the wind raging outside, sure, but those were moments you were expecting, more woken up from the tent shaking than anything else.
>No, what kept you coming back and forth from the limbo was her movement, and more worryingly, how close she had gotten.
>It was just a few things you’d expect at first, really.
>A pull of the cover, scrunching herself down under some more, maybe a leg stretch or twitch, so on, but it got worse.
>Sluggish movements, flipping back and forth deciding if she wanted to sleep on her stomach or back, the occasional grunt or two, and every time, she seemed to inch herself closer, bit by bit.
>Sometimes, you barely left your dreamy haze, the odd pictures and landscapes your brain conjured visible, no matter if your eyes were closed or engulfed in the dark of the night, hearing only the ruffle of plastic behind you, and feeling the ever closer radiating heat.
>It must had been the sixth or seventh time you heard her stir before you felt her right behind you, oddly still, your neck feeling the hot, humid breath coming from her nose, her rhythm irregular enough to confirm what your hazy mind only thought of as a paranoid idea, now given some proof.
>She was awake.
>Maybe not fully, but the way she moved was just too quick to be something she would do on her sleep, her arm slowly nudging your back as she scuttled in close, only the faintest touch before retreating back, her body settling in even closer to you.
>To say you were nervous would be an understatement.
>Your heart was beating hard enough it hurt, and it took every fibre of your being to not flinch when she touched you, your fatigue and doubt adding in to the stress cocktail.
>The usually mild task of pretending to be asleep proved more difficult with every second, your breathing becoming deeper, slower, trying your best to slow down the piston in your chest, to little effect and growing frustration.
>If she knew you were up, she didn’t let it show, inching closer without any fear, little by little, the ever present breath upon your neck slowly shifting to your hair, her face tilting higher and higher as she shuffled once again.
>A sleepy, muffled groan was all you heard before you felt the covers above you shift from your skin.
>Her arm hovered above your waist, hand clumsily settling itself into your stomach, fingers spreading out and pulling you closer, slid beneath your shirt.
>She was gentle with her grip, but you knew what was going to happen.
>She was going straight for the kill.
>Her hand began to creep in higher towards your frantically beating chest, sliding across your skin without any rush, seeming to enjoy its journey, barely reaching halfway to your sternum before you did what, in hindsight, was probably the stupidest move you could ever have done.
>You faked a groan and flipped yourself over to the other side, her arm going limp as it now touched only your back, your own face now halfway buried upon her neck, your arms close to your chest, now feeling an unmistakeable softness press up against them, alongside a surprising amount of warm fur.
>Her chin rested atop your head, seemingly content in laying there, the almost intoxicating scent of strawberries and musk slowly trickling into your nose, a long, drawn out “Kenteiii” being all you could hear from her, likely some sleepy mumbling in her language, even if you couldn’t begin to guess what it meant.
>It hurt to stay still, to try and breathe as normal, to ignore your heart hurting as it beat this fiercely.
>Your brain felt like it was suffering through a thunderstorm, neurons flaring like bolts of lightning, your thoughts turning into a loud mess of incoherent, rapid rambling, loud as thunder itself.
>Yet with every breath, you seemed to drift away from it, a sense of peace washing over you, little by little.
>The scent of someone, personal and forbidden, given freely and with no shame or strings attached, hints of earth, herbs and fur.
>The soothing fragrance of her perfume, faded but still there, its potency renewed as your head buried itself on her fluff, soft and warm… 
>…alongside the rapid beat of a heart behind it, sped up as you huddled close, a smile on your face as an epiphany struck out.
>You were right, but above that, you knew something else now.
>She was awake, yes, yet she was still willing to risk waking you, just to get closer and to hold you, to pull you in and sleep with you in her arms.
>Out of an instinct to protect? A kind of affection? A more primal instinct, taking over?
>You couldn’t tell, but your panic seemed to give way to a gentle, dreamy haze, as either option only seemed to humble you more and more as you considered it.
>Your body began to give out as you breathed in that fragrance, perfume and musk, feeling the softness of her fur, the beating drum of her heart, leaving only the gentle whispers of the wind outside to rattle the tent and lull you to a deep, peaceful sleep.
>Dreamless, but endlessly fulfilling.


>You barely noticed the chirping of birds as your eyelids trembled, hearing instead the unmistakable huff of a proud priestess and feeling her tender grasp, a much more pleasant way to wake compared to what you were used to, a dim light shining through the tent and onto the two of you.
>Her chin still rested atop your head but her hands seemingly crept deeper underneath your shirt, her fingers gliding across your back without a care in the world, gently scouring it at their leisure.
>Your own hands seemed to have slinked around and beneath her, your right arm slowly warming up and feeling the stings of numbness, like an ant mound punishing you for daring to trespass, or more realistically, for daring to hold someone’s weight on it all night long.
>Your left arm was thankfully ant and punishment free, wrapped around her waist and dangling onto her back, low enough to be dangerous, but you figured she wouldn’t mind, not with the way she was holding you.
>Still suffering from that morning haze, you buried your head further into her neck out of instinct, halfway from habit of your sheets, the other half from the sheer guilty pleasure of drowning your face in a sea of warm, strawberry scented fur.
>You’d be lying to her and to yourself if you said it hadn’t been a while since you had something like this, and you’d be damned if you weren’t going to enjoy it while you could.
>Besides, she seemed to like you, right? She wouldn’t be holding on still if she didn’t.
>Or have held you like she did the night before either.
>You still weren’t quite sure how you’d even talk about it, but you figure that you’d get there when the time was right, feeling yourself being pulled in closer, a weakly whimpered “Forskarr, matina est” being all you heard before she let herself go limp, mouthing off another whisper soon after. 
>“Nikke, j’fiq. Kel s’lix.”
>Whatever she said, she seemed firm on it, refusing to move a single inch and seemingly dozing off again, even if more fidgety than you’d expect.
>You figured that moving after that would be bad for the both of you, settling instead on just enjoying the moment for a little while longer, content to just lay there in peace, the soft glow of the early morning light preventing you from snoozing away.
>Kept in that comfortable morning snuggle, you did your best to ignore the growing, annoying numbness in your arm.
>The faint echo of a vibration coming from the corner, and the awfully loud alarm jingle that accompanied it were harder to ignore however.
>You could feel her freeze up in place, tense like a brick, the unmistakable response of someone caught red handed in the deed, with no excuse to give for the deeds they just did.
>You couldn’t fake it either, your instinct to open your eyes and move your head overtaking any kind of manual control you had, especially so early in the morning, your head lifting only to brush up against her, your eyes peeling open to see her brown and white coat in the dim morning light, and you remembered as the morning haze cleared.
>She was still wearing nothing beneath the sleeping bag, after all.
>You both stood there in stunned silence, hearing that alarm ring for over a minute and stopping, leaving an almost eerie silence, broken only by the early morning gusts of wind.
>You swallow both your pride and the spit in your mouth, trying your best to blurt out whatever came to you, settling on a little white lie.
>”Well, shit. Didn’t expect to wake up like this, gotta admit. Guess I told you it’d ring the alarm right?”
>A low rumbling laugh was all you heard for a moment, before the now familiar sound of an exhale filled the tent, an oddly melancholic tone to her voice.
>”That you did. I suppose you want me to let go now, yes?”
>”Honestly?”
>”Preferably, yes. You lied to me once, no need to make it twice.”
>You can’t avoid to chuckle like an idiot, rolling your eyes at her wit as focused back into your thoughts.
>”I’m… kind of okay with this, believe it or not. Being like this is uh, rarer than what I’d like to admit for me. I kind of missed it, really.”
>”So, you do not wish me to let go?”
>”I mean- You realize the way you are saying that is a bit of a trap, right? If I say “Yeah, don’t let go”, you make me look like a sappy idiot that wants to cuddle in the morning. If I say “Yeah, let go”, I kinda sound like a prick.”
>She takes a moment to hum, laying her chin atop your head once more without much of a care.
>”I do not think you are either a “prick” or an “idiot” Anon. You may sound like either to another human, but not to me. What is so wrong with staying warm inside for the morning either way?”
>”Usually, I’d say something about human standards of decency, sleeping naked or whatever, but right now, I can’t be assed. I’m fine here if you are.”
>”I am more than fine then. We still have plenty of time before your fellow humans wake up and get further onto the trail. Might as well enjoy it, yes?”
>”Yeah… and sorry Arovska.”
>”Hmm? For what?”
>”Yesterday’s thing. Y’know, that whole thing.”
>She seems to consider your words for a few seconds, pressing her chin down unto your head and humming an approval.
>”It sounds to me like you already learnt your lesson. I already forgave you Anon, nothing else for me to do. But, if you insist on being sorry, I could use some more of your insight. Some more lessons. Perhaps a confession?”
>”Heh. Fine, I can give you a lesson or two in the flames, and I’ll consider the confession. On one condition.”
>”Oh? State it then.”
>”You gotta spit something out too. Isn’t fair you get a once in a lifetime chance and I don’t, yeah?”
>”Fine enough, I agree. Anything else you would want?”
>”Eh, I’ll think of something else. Lemme just turn off the phone, that bloody thing is so annoying.”
>”That it is Anon. That it is.”



>It took a while for you both to get up from your comfortable snooze, but either by the ever encroaching force of hunger or some sense of duty, the two of you eventually managed to shuffle out of the sleeping bag.
>Dressing up was a bit more awkward than what you’d have expected, what with you having to shuffle to a corner with your eyes closed, trying to avoid seeing her exposed, all the while being laughed at for your “human prudishness”.
>The odd silence in the tent didn’t help much, leaving you two to get dressed without a single word being spoken, only the sounds of sliding fabric in the morning buzz, nothing of note to be said, or at least nothing either of you wanted to say.
>You figured the early morning wasn’t the time to confront her on last night, especially when she seemed to be looking forwards to today, leaving you to awkwardly zip up the tents entrance and wait outside for her to clothe herself, taking in the early morning air.
>Humid, cold, with a hint of pine and something else you couldn’t quite tell, your mind clearing from any lingering thoughts in the tent, ready for a new day, or at least as close to being ready as you’d get.
>You checked your phone for the time, absentmindedly unlocking it, the faint glow in the screen barely showing you the white letters and numbers in the morning light.
>Almost nine of the morning, just a few minutes off, your good old privacy breaching friend informing you of cloudy weather to come within the next days on your area.
>You swear, turning off the GPS locator really didn’t do a thing, it was just a paranoid placebo.
>You sigh out a curse to nobody in particular and lock it again, sliding it into your pocket, with Arovska soon coming out of the tent, two backpacks on her hands, raising an eyebrow at you.
>”You forgot something Anon. Is there such a need for rushing outside? Anything wrong?”
>”I just figured it’d be best to let you dress up alone and not bother you, really.”
>”Why? Why would it bother me?”
>You sigh out in defeat as your attempt at casual dismissal failed by the most obvious, and in hindsight, predictable questions you should have seen coming, berating yourself mentally for being such an idiot.
>”It’s just a human thing, really. We’re weird like that sometimes. Hell, most of the time we’re weird.”
>Her eyes light up with curiosity as she dons her own pack and stretches your own towards you, her ears propping up like a tower.
>”Is that so? What else is so weird about your kind then?”
>You take the hint and the backpack too, giving her a smirk and an eye roll, donning your best theatrical voice to nab her attention.
>”Shit, where do I *even* begin? You ever heard of Christmas?” 
>”Vaguely, some kind of celebration your kind does. Why?”
>”The origin of it was the birth of what some of us think to be the damn Savior of Humankind, right? So, of course, a bunch of people that sold sweet water made some drawings and now, most people make it about a fat jolly man in red robes that flies around in a wooden chair, dropping gifts down people’s chimneys. Also buying stuff for one another sometimes, a big pine tree in your living room and a lot of shiny decorations on said tree.”
>She takes a while to take what you said in, her eyes squinting as she processed everything you said, looking out into the woods somewhere and back at you.
>”You jest, surely. You do not mean to say all your kind celebrate this Christmas for a red man instead of your “Saviour” because of sweet water, right?”
>You can’t help but laugh as and pat her in the shoulder, leaving your hand there and continuing on as if you hadn’t heard.
>”Heh. Once a year we all go out and party until we can’t party anymore with big disguises for the heck of it too and loud music. We also have our day of love come out from a saint that married people in secret and got executed, just to have it made about giving one another cakes, chocolates and getting some “love” if you got someone to do it with. Whenever it’s a new year, a transition of “winters”, we also party because we can, drink like madmen and throw explosive rocks up to the sky to light it up in celebration of being alive for another year. Another winter, rather.”
>She stays silent for a while, her face turning into what even you could tell was utter disbelief, hear ears flattening like a leaf on the ground.
>”You… aren’t kidding, are you?”
>”Remember that Savior? People who worship in him eat what they believe to be his flesh and drink his blood, roughly every week. That’s every 7 days, assuming they don’t skip it out.”
>Her ears shot up like a soldier, any kind of priestly composure gone out the window as she stared at you like a madwoman, her mouth slightly agape.
>”What?! Why!? Why would anyone ever do such a thing? For what possible purpose would one eat their God?”
>You manage to restrain your laughter and pat her shoulder once more, letting go and gesturing out towards the sky, your hand sliding across her view for the sake of theatrics.
>”Something about saving yourself from his noble sacrifice, I shit you not. All I said is true Arovska, when I said we had over two thousand years of history but couldn’t figure ourselves out, I really wasn’t kidding. We just don’t make a lot of sense, but hey, doesn’t stop us much.”
>”More like you simply do not make sense at all! A celebration hardly needs a reason to exist, but eating your Saviour? Sugar water drawings replacing him? That just seems insane.”
>”Kinda is, yeah. So, my point is that, sometimes, we eat the blood and flesh of our Lord, sometimes we rush out of tents to not look at someone being naked. Even when they don’t need the space and privacy.”
>It seemed to take a considerable effort for her to try and comprehend this, but she did her best, face still filled with worry but at least she to hide it away. 
>”Well… okay, good. Good, I prefer you are the latter then, at least it is a harmless human habit.”
>”Well, I miiiight have done the first once or twice too, years ago.”
>She jumps back, clearly in shock, her eyes darting you up and down in search of any sign you were joking, unfortunately finding little, her stance tensing slightly.
>”What!? Why, on Venk’s Will, why would you ever-”
>You roll your eyes and wave it off, dropping your act all together. 
>”Oh relax, it’s all symbolic. Just a ritualized biscuit and some wine, but my mom wanted me to do it since, hey, what mother doesn’t want her kid to get a chance at getting saved? She believed in it, so I indulged her, nothing else.”
>She seemed to relax slightly, her eyes ceasing to scan you, but her stance still betraying some uncertainty.
>”… Nothing else at all?”
>”Hand to my heart, no, I didn’t eat any actual human flesh or drink any human blood from my “Savior”. Or anyone else’s flesh or blood, for that matter. I’m not that weird Arovska, come on now.”
>”I- yes, sorry. I just did not expect your kind to be so… interesting.”
>You nod and motion towards the path, walking at a leisurely pace alongside her.
>”You grow up used to it. What about your own folks, anything odd about your kind?”
>”I do not know what would be construed as “odd” by the standards of your kind, what with everything you have just said. I suppose we differ in beauty?”
>”Oh, now this I gotta hear.”
>”Well, I assume that humans have their own, what is the word… criteria? Yes, criteria for beauty?”
>”We don’t have *a* criteria, more like a couple hundred, but go on.”
>”Seems as if we do have just one or two, apparently. Every male and female of the tribe, each species with their own little thing. Some focus on tail length, maybe some horns. Others appreciate the right amount of fur or the lack thereof in some places. You may find one case of mild difference, but overall, each species seems to like its own one thing, it seems.”
>”Huh, that’s actually kinda interesting. How did you even find this out?”
>She smirks for a moment, raising her face up high in pride towards the sky, an almost mockingly noble tone to her voice. 
>”Remember who you are with Anon. Be it a cub or a grown pup, everyone can speak and has spoken with me. Some speak a bit too much on why they fancy whoever they do when they seek advice, I fear.”
>”Getting to know stuff like that sounds fun, won’t lie. But with that answer, I got me a new question.”
>”Oh?”
“You’ve asked about me, now I get to ask too. What’s yours then, hmm?”
>”Pardon?”
>”Your “criteria”, Arvoska. You said some are into tails or horns, right? What’s your fancy then?”
>You were expecting some kind of embarrassment, but instead, all you found were her ears flattening, a mild pout and her left arm gripping the right one, rubbing it up and down in a slow, gentle manner.
>You still weren’t an expert in reading anthros, not by any margin, but from the dropping eyes, ears and the rubbing on her arm, it wasn’t much of a stretch to figure out she was comforting herself, or at least trying to.
>”I cannot blame you for asking, but it is a delicate question. It is not the fact I am ashamed to answer, not with you, more so that… it is complicated?”
>”Hey, if you don’t wanna talk, its fine, we can just-“
>”It is fine Anon. You just have to understand that, well, males of my kind do not take kindly to females with antlers.”
>”What, do they see you as competition or something?”
>”In a way? I do not understand it, but we tend to be more attuned to a “primal” way of thinking, I suppose. Me and my sisters are a bit of an exception to most of our tribe.”
>”So, what, do they think that you are going to steal their women, is that it?”
>”One did, yes! It was a long while until his woman came unto me to speak in private and truly in private, not having someone along “just in case”. It was a somewhat interesting time Anon, I assure you.”
>”Shit, sorry for bringing it up then. Not a lot of good memories, huh?”
>”Oh no, I laughed well and long about that, make no mistake. It is simply that, when you have an interest in someone, but they see you as competition for their woman, it becomes hard to… like them, I suppose is the term? So I never “appreciated” the antlers so many of my kind do. It is hard to acquire a “criteria” for people that hate how you look and never gave you a chance.”
>”So all of them really just blew you off for that? Sounds to me like they are a bunch of idiots that lost out big time.”
>Her face seemed to soften into a smile from your words, her ears propping up slightly, staying just barely lifted enough from her head to not rest down once more.
>”Thank you. And you are right on them being idiots, as I found out with enough time and talks. Oh, the things I found out later.”
>”Now this has to be good. Gimme an example.”
>Whatever shred of sadness or restraint remained in her seemed to vanish quickly, giving way to an almost wicked smile, her tone shifting unto a royal mockery of what she used to be, winking to you as she spoke.
>”Come now Anon, do you think me petty enough to shame those that shamed me in winters past? While I am in good company, away from them all, in peaceful seclusion with a tight lipped human? Of course I would never tell about how one cheated on his woman with someone else. Or how one could not cook worth a rotten eyeball on a stick! Or how one could not for the life of him even stalk the woods for food or keep a fire up somehow. I would never be so petty as to mention such things Anon.”
>You struggled to keep your face together, giving her a soft elbow nudge as you walked beside her, shaking your head to her tales. 
>”Heh. Of course you wouldn’t Arovska. Course you wouldn’t.”






>The rest of the walk across the trail was mostly an exercise in wasting time, walking around to look busier than what you two really were.
>Her insistence on being the backline for the group due to her duty meant that you were always going to be just far away enough to help, but never close enough to see anyone at all, like a safety net for stragglers and potential quitters.
>Maybe an hour in however, you both definitely heard something, her ears shooting up like a bolt of lightning and your face contorting into one of pure confusion.
>It sounded like some mad hybrid of a hyena and a lion, howling in laughter like it just heard an inappropriate joke at a fancy dinner party, its cackling echoing past you both down through the trail.
>You risked the rudeness and turned to Arovska, your eyebrow raising itself as you thought about the likeliest source of the noise, settling on the one person you suspected.
>”That’s Jack, ain’t it? Please, tell me that’s Jack and not some horror of the woods you guys got stocked around here.”
>She tries to hide her smile, nodding and looking towards the source, far away.
>”Correct, it is him. I do not blame you for assuming something worse, I too was confused about his screaming first time I heard it.”
>”First time?”
>”Oh, did I not tell you yet? He came around, about seven winters or so ago, screaming and running like an idiot from the woods, a boar close behind him. He was fine enough, a few scratches, a lack of air, but fine enough.”
>”Wait, he was being rushed by a boar? Never been there myself, but heard those things kill people easy enough. Kinda surprising to hear he was fine.”
>She sighs out, a shockingly honest scowl of disgust forming on her face.
>”Boar are rather disgusting creatures Anon. Heavy, aggressive, destructive, and sadistic. Our hunters could see Jack running as fast as he could, the beast seemingly content in harassing him into exhaustion before it struck. One of the reasons Jack wasn’t told to leave.”
>”Leave? I get a feeling you aren’t painting me the whole picture here Arvoska, I could use some more context.”
>She glanced at you, shaking her expression off her face and letting a drawn out sigh to nothing in particular.
>”Apologies, this was before any expedition or contact with your kind, at least since I was born. Things were different then, so for many, the first contact with one of your kind was something akin to hearing that sound, followed by the squeal of a boar. Hard to tell which screamed higher, truth be told.”
>You can’t help but let out a chuckle at her words, shaking your head to clear out the image of Jack yelling like a girl as he sprinted across the mountainside.
>”Okay, not to be mean, but that sounds kinda cold Arovska. Hilarious, I’ll give you that, but cold.”
>”Oh, Jack is more than fine with it. After our hunters rushed in and dealt with the filthy thing, there was a mutual gain in the dead boar, and he was thankful. We could not understand his thanks, but we could tell he was relieved.”
>”Shit, was it really so long ago you guys didn’t even know English?”
>”Before meeting him, none of us knew. That day was the spark for all of this, the light for the fire. You would not believe the amount of times I have heard the same story from him, over and over.”
>She raises a hand to the air, placing another to her heart, her voice filled to the brim with sarcasm, with just a hint of an eye roll too.
>”Thank you, for everything! For saving my life, for making my thesis on Anthropology possible, for all the work we have been able to do, for Sheila, for the fact the Sun rises up in the air every day, for the fact I do not die when relieving myself, for the fact I have two legs and not one, so on!”
>You couldn’t help but crack a smile as she went on, her eyes closing as she ended her venting, shoulders slumping to the unmistakable sound of a heavy sigh on the cold, crisp air. 
>”Forskarr. I know I sound cold, but once you heard his thanks fifteen times in less than a few days, then it becomes habit to nod, not to reply. I was not used to being thanked before, but it’s grown on me more akin to a tick than to a blessing. You must think lower of me for this, yes?”
>You felt confident enough in her comfort with you to pat her in the back, pointing ahead to the horizon, more or less an estimate at where the hellish laughter came from. 
>”Nah, I get it, and that guy? He probably gets it too, more than what you might think Arovska.”
>She seemed to become silent for a second after you patted her back, her eyes slowly trailing to where you were pointing them, only a simple sideways glance breaking her concentration.
>”Is that so Anon? Does he really understand?”
>”Hmm. He’s the kind of guy that will ask to sit with you, knows you are fresh meat and is more than ready to welcome you aboard this entire thing with a hearty handshake and a smile. Not a whole lot of people are like him, and I think he knows that too.”
>”How does that matter Anon? All you are saying is that he is a good person, not me.”
>”No, I’m saying that you aren’t like him, nor do you have to be. You’d rather say thanks once and be done with it, not to go ahead and say it over and over, right? But he is, and he gets you ain’t like him, so he gets it when you just nod.”
>”… Would it not be best if I was like him instead then? To be able to be so honest and forthcoming?”
>”Take it from the guy living in places with a hell of a lot of different people, if we were all the same, it’d be boring as hell. And yes, even with it being a lot of Jacks, it’d be duller than a… well, I was about to say sea pebble, but you guys never saw the sea, huh?”
>”The… sea? As in, I “sea” you?”
>”Looks like we got a new topic for the night then! But back to the other thing, think with me for a sec, would you?”
>Her eyes focused in on you, a shit eating smirk manifesting as she looked you up and down, taunting you with her tone.
>”Oh, what wondrous insight shall Anon give me now…”
>”Oh, save the snark for later and answer me, would you?”
>She drops her attempt at theatrics with a muffled “Stragapart”, ears propping up fully, a mildly annoyed huff at you stealing her thunder.
>”Fine, fine. Speak your mind freely then, I will listen.”
>”Can you honestly say you would you be having fun if I was so prim, proper and formal like you? Would you really be having fun, walking around with a copy of yourself, where you always agreed on everything?”
>”… Perhaps not.”
>”Would you have learnt how to wield the flames of the fabled teenage lavatories with a fellow of your tribe?”
>”… No, I admit I could not.”
>”Would you really, honestly say you’d have enjoyed having a Sister around over a human like me? Walking up and down the trail, not being able to shoot the proverbial shit with someone so different, spouting out confessions and mouthing off people you couldn’t otherwise?”
>She raises an eyebrow, her voice loaded with doubt.
>”So, you are saying it is because you are human that I can have fun with you?”
>The sudden sigh coming from you was something you tried to repress but couldn’t, giving her a simple shake of the head and pointing towards yourself, then her.
>”Close, but no. It’s because we are so different that we can have fun. Me being nowhere near from you, having no fucks left to give, living such a different life, all means I’m about as close to the absolute opposite of you as I can be. And that’s a good thing.”
>She stays silent for a moment, pondering what you said and looking all around you, eyes drifting from tree to tree, onwards to the distant sky and even the ground itself
>”Wouldn’t being so different mean we should dislike one another? Fire and water, the never moving cliffs and the breeze buffeting it, the calm and the storm? Nature itself seems to think in conflicts, does it not?”
>Right, you forgot.
>Even when you were back with the other wolf girl, and despite her complaints of the others tribesmen, they still clearly thought different from most other humans you met, more of a collective, primal thinking than anything else.
>It was easy enough to forget, seeing as how she acted so human like before, but you were determined to put your point across, even with the differences of mentality, you just had to find the right words to put it across.
>”Alright, new approach then. Why’d you pick me out of all of the crowd? Wasn’t it because I was different?”
>”No, I picked you because you seemed interesting enough and akin enough to me. I would not pick my complete opposite, I already have to endure it at my home.”
>”But you realized I *was* different, right? And you didn’t go away, even as I talked to you in a way nobody else did. You liked that difference, didn’t you?”
>She stops speaking for a few seconds, her brow furrowing in thought.
>”I was… amused, yes. It was something new that I was not used to.”
>”And you kept seeing I was different, yeah? You realized humans are weird, have weird stuff like Christmas, weird habits like storming off of tents when they see people naked, wearing clothes all the time, so on.”
>She cracks her pondering for a second as you mention the tent, flashing a smile, and letting out something resembling a chuckle, clearly restrained, nodding slowly as you finish.
>”And I did not hate it, did I?”
>”That you didn’t Arovska. Stuff like this is more complicated than fire and water, you can’t think like that. Gotta think more like a human, I guess.”
>”I see. Your point is made Anon, differences make this more fun. I assume the same is true for you?”
>”Oh, are you kidding me? Hearing gossip from a Guardian on her tribe, playing Truth or Dare with her, making dumb jokes or jabs to make her crack a smile? I don’t think you could bore me if you tried Arovska. Not that you would try, I assume?”
>That subtle twitch of an ear on her stoic face probably revealed more than what she would want to give out, but you managed to catch it before she hid it behind a sagely nod, looking onwards across the path.
>”We will see. We have a lot to walk still, and I’m sure I can bore you yet before we arrive at our destination.”
>”I’m sure we can work something out fun. Ever heard of 21 questions?”



>The two of you paused your walking for just a minute or two, your insistence on trying to get some “damn reception on this piece of shit phone” earning a good few laughs from Arovska.
>Hard not to make her smile, what with you grumbling curses and waving the little bit of plastic and glass around, trying to catch some damn reception in an isolated mountain.
>You manage to get a bar or two eventually, leaving your phone with the internet speed of about the average 1990’s modem, loading up a random page full of questions and taking a whopping minute or two to do it.
>You motion to keep walking and scan the road ahead for pebbles and other tripping hazards, your eyes returning to scroll across the now finished page, a frown blemishing your face.
>”Okay, fair warning Arovksa. This might just become 21 questions or less. That sound okay with you?”
>She looks at you and waves it off, looking into the horizon, further onto the trail.
>”As long as I get to ask back, more or less matter little. Maybe less can be more?”
>”Sounds fair. What do you mean less can be more though?”
>”You can do a hundred things before you perish, or you can do 3 things before you do. Which do you believe reveals more about someone?”
>”… Another fair point. I gotta stop underestimating you, you outwit people for a living.”
>That subtle, errant twitch of an ear, once again.
>”Compliment accepted. So, I assume one for one?”
>”Sure, I can deal with a back and forth. Don’t think the first question is any good though, not unless you guys got a school in here already.”
>”Ah. I cannot blame you for doubting, but no, we do not have a school yet. It is hard to implement something like this without the consent of others.”
>”Alright, fair enough. Uh, well this one’s interesting, might be usable. You guys use gravestones?”
>She looked at you with something resembling shock, surprise and a hint of something else you couldn’t quite pinpoint, her ears tilting sideways almost as much as her own head did.
>”Grave… stones. As in, to mark a grave? A place of death?”
>You blink, unsure of how to really act in a situation like this, defaulting for your usual method.
>Awkward, blunt honesty.
>”Uhh, yeah? We bury our dead, or burn ‘em to ash, really. When we burry ‘em, we usually leave an engraved stone by the place we did so on, so we can say who they were, who they fathered, mothered, y’know, that sorta deal, a special message too if they wanted it.”
>She seemed to want to take your words in with a pinch of salt, but the way you spoke made her doubt any intent to mess with her, instead a brief, but sincere “Interesting” being blurted out, before she talked again.
>”No, we do not have any burial stones. We preserve the spirit of freedom by burning the individual to ash, that their body become ethereal smoke, to become one with the Wind. Even those that cannot run with the breeze will have a chance to become one with their aspect, eventually.”
>You can’t help but to nod along with her, trying to make sense of her beliefs and the practice, as odd as they were.
>You could still see how they’d think that, what with helping one another be free and living in the woods. 
>Good old salvation at the end of your life, living free when you ain’t dead, a lot less scary afterlife as long as they burned you. 
>Odd, no doubt, but made enough sense.
>”Alright, that’s kind of neat, I’ll admit. Tell you what, I’ll count that as an answer, and you get to ask me what I was gonna ask you, deal?”
>”Of course I take a victory for no effort anon, I am no fool. But I still do not know what the question was.”
>”Shit, right. Full question is: What would you like to have written on your gravestone?”
>”Well then? What would you like?”
>”Heh, no Guardian flair? No grace in your speech? Figured you’d wanna ask in your own way instead of being blunt like me.”
>She waves you off, giving you only a smiling shake of her head.
>”Sometimes, the best knowledge comes in the worst looking books. And your parting words seem like they are knowledge worth forgoing the flair, as you say.”
“… Are you saying I’m ugly Arovska?”
>Oh, answer the question Anon, would you?
>You fake a surrender, your hands and arms raising themselves unto the skies, dropping down as quickly as you dropped the act.
>”Fine, fine. Probably something dumb like “I hope that everyone can achieve success, in life or death”. Maybe something like “A friend, who hopes he was as good as he thought himself to be”. I still got me a few good couple of “Winters” until I kick the curb and die anyways, so it’s a work in progress.”
>”Hmmm…”
>”Hmm?”
>”I find it interesting. No bragging about what you did in life or some kind of accomplishment. Some of our kin would probably pick to be known as the best at anything they did. Humility is rare to find here.”
>”Yeah, I’m a rare specimen sometimes. Alright, next questio- wait, scratch that, we are not touching on Zombies.”
>”Zombees? What?”
>”We can talk about it at night, maybe, but I am not looking forwards to that. Can’t do that one on favorite movies, nope on the planes and I don’t suppose you guys have money?”
>”I know what it means and represents, but no, we do not.”
>You couldn’t even try to hide your frown or the errant “Fuck” grumbled under your breath, your finger flicking downwards, eyes fixed to find anything worthwhile.
>Oh, now this one had potential.
>”Okay, all these weak questions got nothing on this one. Arovska, you ready?”
>”I was born to be ready.”
>”Alright, here goes. Let’s assume you got one of your tribe in danger, and you had a choice. They get away alright or ten random people far, far away die instead. What do you-“
>”Ten.”
>You blink and stay silent for a moment, the quickness of her answer catching you beyond off guard.
>You fake a cough and clear out your throat, nodding mostly to yourself.
>”Well, aren’t you a quickdraw. Most folks are asked this and at least pretend to take a while before they drop the hot opinion.”
>She seemed to note your tone and delay, the gears clicking in her head as she realized she might have screwed up.
>”I- apologies, you told me to be ready, so I assumed you meant I was to be fast in answering. I suppose you did not like the answer?”
>Told her to be ready, huh?
>As stunned as you were, you couldn’t help but sigh out and laugh at the silliness of the situation, such a serious question treated like a kid trying to raise his hand the fastest on a classroom.
>”Ah, so that’s why you were so quick. Well, thing is, I do agree. But damn, I was not expecting that blunt an answer, not so fast, y’know?”
>“I believe I “y’know”, yes. I am surprised you agree however, what with it being such a, as you say, “hot” opinion.”
>”Well, life taught me a few things. Always have a backup plan, always have pals to help out and never rely on the bad ones being the trifecta. The last piece is that a shitty friend is your worst enemy, so get rid of him as soon you can.
>”Hence the exchange, a good friend for ten terrible ones. A fair enough view.”
>”Yeah, life has a way to make you cruel sometimes. Lemme try to find out a better question, most of these kind of suck.”
>As you kept walking, staring down at your phone, you noted something was lacking as you walked.
>The sound of her footsteps was absent as you turned back to look at her, seeing her stare straight across the road behind you, into a point beyond it a good distance away, her hands clasped together by her stomach, a serious, dignified face blinking leisurely at the sight.
>”Hey, is everything okay?”
>Not a single emotion in her voice now, just the warmth fading away.
>”We are near where we are meant to reach. No more questions for now Anon. No more at all.”
>As you turned around, you saw the faint trail of smoke coming up from a hill, the vague shape of buildings on the horizon, and the sudden, much more noticeable noise of people, far away.
>A village.
>Her village.
>You must have been too focused on the chat and phone to notice, but now it seemed so obvious, the silence from her amplifying the chorus of voices, sporting in some new blood visiting for fun.
>You turn back to her and nod, forcing yourself to neither smile nor pout, asking simply instead.
>”I understand. Anything else you want me to do?”
>”Stop being yourself for a while, just as I will. Please.”
>”Of course Arovska. Of course.”
 


>Silent as you two were, it was easier to focus on what was ahead, the far away idea of a village up upon the slope slowly crawling into actual sight, the rhythm of your steps synching with her own, both of you walking without any rush, going only as fast as you wished.
>To anyone looking from the outside, they’d see a Guardian and a human, stone faced like royalty, moving with purpose and a seriousness to inspire respect, side by side like a pair of lords, making the rounds on their castle.
>On the inside however, only one was regal enough to really pull it off, the other merely pretending to the best of their ability, hands pulled behind their back, their “stoic” face tending more to looking like to a mildly angry father than a lord.
>Still, the disguise was convincing enough to please the more regal of the two, a solemn nod being the only signal given before you two came closer and closer still.
>It was odd to describe the village, even as you tried to ignore the melting pot of man and beast chatting to one another in the dirt streets.
>Something felt off overall: a mix of styles, an absence of something, an addition that didn’t need to be put in; all encompassed by an element of nature, present in everything.
>Medieval wouldn’t be a bad start, but it was more than that, the details coming in bit by bit as you observed it further, both confusing you and filling you with a sense of odd comfort.
>The seemingly beaten dirt of the path you were used to was replaced by roundish, weathered out stones, the kind you’d find in a stream, polished to perfection by the water and soft enough to be comfortably walked on, even by those without shoes.
>The odd blade of grass seemed to grow both on the sides and the center of this road, undeterred by the walking of everyone else, surviving everywhere it could.
>The buildings all looked akin to the middle ages, boxy, white-ish in color, but lacking in any wooden framing or glass windows most of those buildings had, instead replaced by some odd square-ish gaps, covered by a kind of bug net fabric, acting as window.
>Only one or two of the buildings ever seemed to reach a first floor, the top of these mostly covered by what looked to be a long hardened layer of clay for a roof, small runes and symbols carved onto it, a kind of decoration for the waterproofing.
>Beyond that, everything seemed to change to be utterly unrecognisable.
>A grey-ish wolf anthro, nodding off on what seemed to serve as a wooden porch, no blanket or bed, simply sleeping on the bare wood, oblivious to the commotion around him.
>Likewise, a random horned goat seemed to weave around the gatherings of people, caring not one bit, going to wherever it pleased, all the while ignored by everyone, either out of habit or the wish to not get rammed.
>The soft sounds of wooden wind chimes echoed out in the breeze, muffled by discussion and laughter, but adding in to the buzz, ever so slightly.
>A pack of anthro children, painting a newly made clay pot with pawprints and razor sharp runes, mixes of pink, yellow and blue paint by their sides, ready to be wasted all afternoon long, not a single adult to stop them or contain the artistic effort.
>Everything either just a bit too odd or a bit too familiar.
>Wasn’t long before Arovska snapped you out of your scouting with a soft tug on your shirt, her never changing face aimed solely at a stone built building, off to the less populous side of the village, right across the centre of town, to its left.
>It was inevitable that someone started to notice you two walking across, serious as you were, but you were expecting some level of subtlety from at least one side, instead getting it from neither.
>It was hard to ignore the frankly loud whispers of “Who is that guy?”, “Wait, wasn’t he sitting with Jack?” and “Oooh, wasn’t he the new blood?” that came from the gathering, not to mention the stares, but the wish to not disappoint Arosvka was above it all, letting you keep a cool face and ignore being the attraction.
>You still had half a mind to dunk a cop of molten coffee down the back of the fucker whispering about how you looked like a goose stepper, but kept the thought inwards for the most part.
>Past the whisper lane, you found a much quieter avenue, only a few people up ahead, letting Arovska breathe out and relax, even if for a moment, whispering to you.
>”You wear a good mask Anon. I am surprised.”
>”Likewise. I’m kind of shocked you were so hardfaced here, figured you’d be softer.”
>”I cannot afford to be. They are my kin but I must do my duty, even if I must be harsh. You understand, yes?”
>”I get it, don’t worry. Just a bit surprised myself, that’s all.”
>”Hmm. We can relax more when we are inside. But first, them.”
>You squinted to look at whoever she was pointing towards, seeing two familiar shapes, chatting below a tree.
>A short grey wolf, barely reaching your chest in height and pointing at you, and a familiar man, in brown shorts and a white t-shirt, turning back to spot you two, waving without a care in the world.
>The pamphlet girl and Jack.
>You turned to her and she read your question before you even moved your lips, a simple nod as to both acknowledge and silence you.
>”Do not speak until she leaves and is out of sight. A nod, at most, but otherwise, keep as you are. Please.”
>You resist the temptation to speak and hum in agreement instead, letting her take the lead, noticing a certain harshness to the rhythm of her steps as you both came close to your respite.
>Just this one more thing before you could rest.



>You felt bad, honestly.
>It was awkward enough to meet the one person that got you in here and be able to do nothing but nod in response to a smile, seeing her cheer fade a little as they saw your company refuse to do the same.
>It was even worse that Arovska seemed to never drop the stone cold attitude, speaking that odd language of her with an unusual coldness, or at least that was what it seemed to you, unable to understand it.
>Trying to evade the awkward staring and instead glancing at Jack proved to be a lost gambit, his former relaxation having given way to a polite calm and a more “educated” composure, his surprisingly solemn nod telling you all, without his lips ever speaking.
>”Weather the storm lad. Just a bit longer.”
>You were afraid of even sighing out, such as was your position, but fate seemed to be gracious for a moment or two, as the parting words were spoken quickly, first from the deer, then from the wolf.
>”Venk t’adj, Marksta.”
>”Venk m’adj, Arovska. Ey va.”
>Without any more decorum or wait, the wolf seemed to simply walk past, the not so subtle harshness left behind likely helping in the quick escape.
>You were tempted to speak or move, but a swift tug of your sleeve and the inordinately quick twitch of her ears killed that temptation quick, leaving you three silent for a few more moments, until the now much too familiar sound of a sigh ran out.
>”She is far enough now. We can speak.”
>”You mind if I ask what the purpose of that was? Kind of awkward to stand around like that.”
>”Let us go inside first. Jack, how is the expedition going?”
>He takes a moment to think, closing his eyes as if to recall, and reopening them with a more clear focus, listing off a myriad of things.
>”A couple more people than last year, no quitters yet, hopefully none to come. Still haven’t had to use any medical equipment, so no fights like last year. Food and the like are still up, water tanks full, everything going to plan. A lot more civil folks this year, still sorry about last-“
>She holds his excuses and throws them away with a dismissive wave, a much less cold, but still rather formal nod following it.
>”As I have said before, *they* were at fault, not you. You are doing an excellent job and surpassing expectations. You do this place a great favour, and I am sure Sheila will be proud.”
>”I- well, I sure hope so. Least I can do for her.”
>”You have done enough. Go to your people and enjoy your time Jack.”
>You see him picking up his phone from a pocket, checking the time and nodding, a long, drawn out breath leaving him, neither out of frustration or relief, but of tiredness.
>”Yeah. Yeah, I will. Thanks. And Anon?”
>”Hmm?”
>”I was about to think we lost you honestly. Glad you are still around, in the best damn hands I think I ever saw. Beginner’s luck?”
>You turn to look at Arovska and see her doing the same, both of you observing one another.
>One requesting permission, the other granting it with a smile.
>You turn back to Jack and relax a little, letting off a small shrug.
>”We are still a bit on the fence on who picked who at times, so it depends on who you’re calling the beginner. Glad to see you too, even if I think we could hear you about a mile away.”
>You see his face shift from bewildered confusion into a slowly morphing smirk, letting out a small “Heh” before loosening his posture a bit.
>”Well, I know a trap question when I hear it, and I ain’t fallin for the bait. I’ll see you around Anon, hell, you’ll probably hear me first, right?”
>”Damn right Jack.”
>”Hah! I love newcomers so much. Alright, catch you later. And thanks again Arovska.”
>”I have heard you fine enough the first fifty times. You do not need to repeat yourself.”
>”Yeah, I don’t need to. But I still do.”
>With that, he walks past the two of you, gifting you a heavy handed pat on the back before he was out there again, yelling out some guy’s name, out in the distance.
>”OI GREGGOR! Hope you saved me a spot!”
>Arovska seemed unimpressed, but you had to admit it, it was hard not to like a guy like that.



>Once you came closer to the stone building, you could feel things were different in a few little ways.
>Her face was still akin to stone, but her movements felt gentler, calmer, her stare less focused, and the way she opened the door was the most welcoming you’ve seen her be for a while.
>The way she hummed as she gripped the heavy wooden door and swung it open was a contrast if you’ve ever heard of one, a satisfied smile clearing out any and all tension still remaining in the air as you inspected your surroundings, given ample time to settle in.
>Stoney would be a word you could use, without a doubt, what with the very noticeable shift in style this place had compared to the rest of the village.
>If you were to call this place as a whole “medieval”, this would probably be the closest to a castle, as the only things here wooden would be the small bits of furniture, contrasting heavily to the greyish brown background.
>A few lounge-like chairs, covered with furs and leather to serve as a kind of cushioning on one side, a small kitchen like area on the other, racks filled with odd and ends, metallic and herbal.
>They even had kind of rug, even if it was less tapestry and more of a bear skin, complete with a small hallway into the back, a few doors closing off your view, likely leading to their bedrooms.
>Intrusive thoughts of bear attacks aside, this place felt… homely.
>A medieval kind of rustic, sure, but very clearly lived in, the faint smells of old meals hanging in the air, green and gamey, alongside a healthy dose of slight disarray here and there.
>Dropping her things besides one of the chairs, she slumped down and let herself be dropped by gravity, a long, drawn out breath leaving her mouth as she closed her eyes, a wide, wide smile covering her face, ears flattening against her head.
>Her arms seemed to protest being moved but she made a lazy gesturing towards the direction of another chair, clearly telling you to sit down across her without ever saying a word.
>You decided not to disturb her moment, dumping down your own pack and everything else as silently as you could, sitting down the bundle of furs and wood in a less… casual manner.
>Either she was trusting you a hell of a lot right now, or she was so tired of everyone’s shit she couldn’t care.
>Goodness knew you were smart enough not to ask.
>You risked disturbing her for just a moment however, mouthing off a small, innocent “So…” and gauging for a reaction, prodding for a follow up.
>You came out unharmed, thankfully, earning only a slight grumble and a groggy mouthing. 
>“Come now, a moment of respite. I gave you plenty, give me one as well.”
>You surrender to the honestly reasonable request, finding yourself immersed in fur as you leaned back unto the chair, reminding you of those fuzzy blankets you used to have, years and years ago.
>The only question that came to mind was why you ever get rid of those, as these chairs felt like Heaven itself.
>Warm, protective, enveloping, the pinnacle of an indulgent lazy afternoon, swimming in something comfortable and familiar, oblivious to the outside.
>And oblivious you became, as the two of you shared a moment of silence and peace.
>And then another moment.
>And… another one.
>Minutes passed, and it was only the start of a snore that woke you up from your lethargy, rising up and blinking out your quick nap as you watched her stare at the ground, a hand covering her mouth.
>Waking yourself up with your own snoring was one way to do it, but you weren’t hiding the smile on your face and she could tell, hiding her mouth either to conceal a smile or out of shame for the deed.
>”I- apologies. I must have slept in the comfort. The chairs always do this to me, but I required some rest.”
>”You already know you don’t gotta apologise to me Arovska. Besides, I can hardly blame you, these are damn comfy chairs. Did you guys make them or someone else?”
>She released the grip on her face with some reluctance, but gave in as you asked about whoever made them, clearly changing the subject.
>”Neither I or my Sisters have the talent. We have an… what is the word your kind had for these creators-“
>”Artisan?”
>”Yes, that. It is a kind of ‘art’ for us to embody nature, and much like the wind blows…”
>”It also calms. So, “art” for the work, “art” for the rest?”
>”You understand correctly. I am surprised.”
>”Everyone likes relaxing after a hard day Arovksa. Life ain’t worth living without good moments like these.”
>You see her eyes soften as they meet yours, no attempt or need to hide her obvious joy in your words, an odd warmth to your chest manifesting within.
>Only a glimmer of fear remained, as she laid herself back more and breathed out, a shiver in your spine arching lightning as she spoke, more solemn than usual.
>”I am glad you agree. But, you did ask me a question, of the purpose of the facade, and I would be a terrible host to forget it or simply not answer it. Thankfully, it relates to these moments we speak of, rarer than they should be.”
>You tried your best to ignore your instincts, nodding along and letting the furs aid you in your distraction.
>”Really? So, the stiff parade relates to this?”
>”I understand that it was difficult for you, but I assure you, it had a purpose. I do not ask people to become what they are not for fun.”
>”Not saying you do, far from it, I know you don’t. I just ain’t seeing how it’s connected, is all.”
>”Then I shall make it clear and simple. Tell me, why do people enjoy these moments of rest?”
>”Tiredness, exhaustion, wanting to shove a 9 iron up their bosses asshole, a mix of all the previous, boredom? A lot of reasons, really.”
>Nothing hidden now.
>That smile? Clear as day, same as her words, flowing like a river.
>”All burdens, are they not? Colourful burdens, as you describe them, varied too, but burdens indeed. And rest is a relief.”
>”So… the regal showoff was a burden, is that it?”
>”Correct. A burden someone has to carry every day. A burden *I* have to carry. I needed some help, and in exchange, we arrived here, in calm, peace and silence. Relief.”
>”I can understand that, I just don’t get why you had to be so serious out there. It almost felt like an intimidation attempt, yknow? Trying to scare people and whatnot. Almost.”
>She bites her lip as you spoke, but lessens it as you repeat the keyword, nodding with a more solemn look in her face, her hands folding onto her lap.
>”When a person cannot become one with the Wind, one becomes a Guardian instead, to aid those that can become akin to it. They are not the caretakers, they are not the leaders, and they are certainly not lesser, for they do an important job. But-“
>She inhales sharply, and to your surprise, grits her teeth, letting a little strip of white leave her mouth as she speaks.
>”- sometimes, your kind forgets their place. Sometimes they forget about all the days you have spent aiding them. Sometimes, your kind enjoys the Rest more than they ever enjoyed the Burden. And sometimes, they attempt to ridicule you, the confidant, the healer, the Guardian.”
>She looks you straight into the eye, her lips sealing themselves back to show no teeth, only a deep, melancholic frown.
>”And a motion with a tool is all one needs to establish order and respect once more, after it has been forgotten. To keep it, a stern face, unwavering, and a scar to mark them. I am sorry I had to pull you into it, but I hope that you can forgive me.”
>You try your best to wrap your head around what she just said, absorbing it all, but the more you thought about it, the more numerous the silent seconds became, the more tense the air seemed to feel.
>A scar? Motion with a tool? The way she talked about it, she seemed to imply she made a scar on someone for disrespecting her, or at least something close to that, or, you hoped, something lesser.
>You felt your gut turn and your spine tingle as you shut your eyes once again, thinking, nodding to yourself, letting it stir within you. 
>You never were one to judge too harshly, especially for life in a place like this where it was much harder, but hearing about something like that, from someone like her?
>It still felt…
>Odd?
>Shocking, maybe, but maybe not so much.
>Disturbing, in a way, but the little voice in your head, the ever slippery, curious bastard, said what you wished he didn’t, in his smooth, serpentine voice, so close to your own.
>The voice of your dreams.
>The voice you heard when you were alone, left with your thoughts.


>”You know you wanna know Anon. You know you don’t know.”
>”God fucking dammit, really? Now, with this of all things?”
>”Yes, really, yes now, yes this. Curiosity killed the cat, and you want to know who the Doe did in. Do you not?”
>”Yeah sure, but for fucks sake-“
>”To shit with your “but” and to shit with your “sake”! Don’t you get it? Are you *that* dense?”
>”The densest fucker this side of the state, and you know it. WE know it.”
>He- no, IT hisses back, a tone of venom and righteous truth to every word, a slow speech, filled with mocking, deliberately hanging on every syllable. 
>”She’s opening up, you idiot. She’s been opening up to you and you alone this entire fucking time. She’s letting you relax inside, in front of her, slumped in cosy fur chairs, what the FUCK else do you want, a backrub and a snuggle? A cup of warm tea and a biscuit?”
>”You done with your shit or do you actually have a point, you fucker?”
>”Hindsight is 20 20, but I’m speaking in the now. You know how rare that is, so quit the act and answer me, answer the feeling. Are you a hypocrite?”
>You bite your pride and your lip down for a moment, inhaling sharper than you should.
>”I try not to be. Why?”
>”Then, honour your word, and take this once in a lifetime opportunity, you moron. And give her a secret in return, so you are even and she gets that you get it.”
>”What kind of secret?”
>”You know the kind. The kind you don’t want to give her.”
>…


>Silence once more, a vacant mind devoid of any chatter or bickering, leaving you to open your eyes again, her slightly worried stare making you feel just a smidge too vulnerable despite her good intent.
>“Anon. Are you okay?”
>”Hmm, yeah. Just had a moment of thought.”
>”Like the sunrise?”
>”Yeah… yeah, kinda like that. You mind if I ask you something?”
>”You already know the answer, do you not?”
>”Gotta ask anyways, right?
>”No, you do not. But I suppose it is a human thing?”
>”Asking questions you already know the answer for, asking questions you don’t know the answer to, you always gotta ask. Politeness is a virtue, and curiosity-”
>”Curiosity is a curse.”
>”In a way. Mostly a blessing overall.”
>A lazy smile covered her face, her back somehow leaning even more towards her chair, nodding with purpose.
>One cup of herbal tea away from paradise.
>”Then let me bless and curse you Anon. What is it that you yearn for, that I may kill that duality, lead it to rest?”
>”Promise you won’t be mad?”
>”An odd question. But no, not unless you ask something very crass, which you should not.”
>”Alright. What did you mean by the scar, the motion? Did you stab someone?”
>She seems unfazed by the question, almost… happy you asked, her smile undisturbed, her answer quick, simple.
>”Yes. A thrust with my dagger of bone.”
>You were expecting *some* level of resistance or her playing coy, being left rather vulnerable, yet not dissuaded after her words, the curiosity burning brighter now. 
>”Who did you do it to then, if you don’t mind me asking?”
>”Louh-bu, a grey wolf known for being insolent. Would you like to hear why he was scarred? End your curiosity for good? Perhaps to justify what I did?”
>”I don’t think you need to, not to me. But, if you wouldn’t mind, sure.”
>”Oh, I love to talk about this Anon, more than what you might ever realize. It is no burden.”
>She takes a deep breath and lifts her right hand up, gesturing to her left and sweeping all the way to the right, passing right by stonework, chains, you and everything else, without a pause.
>”This place… it is not perfect. It rests on an ideal, its union on more than blood. It has been so many generations since the first one to venture the woods, the one who chose to never return. Entire bloodlines, entire families. All on the wilderness, all trying to become the Wind.”
>She pauses for a moment, letting her hand fall comfortably into the armrest, her smile solid like the mountain, not a single hint of sadness or fear.
>”It can be undone in a winter. You can never become akin to the Wind alone, but you cannot be accompanied forever. And in that endless contradiction, that path, some find a way to corrupt the intent. To try and ruin everything, while pretending to be free. So let me ask you, how vile can people be, back where you live?”
>You hesitate, then relax again, breathing out.
>”Honest answer?”
>”I do not appreciate lies, Anon.”
>”I know you don’t. It just feels like you won’t get the whole picture if I say “Holy shit, some people *do* deserve a shank between the ribs”, y’know? We have saints, same as we have sinners, same as everywhere else, I guess.”
>She takes a moment to process what you said and nods, gesturing towards you.
>”So, as you would put it… shit’s complex?”
>She was ready and prepared for you, her word choice precise, calculated.
>But you? 
>You were not ready for that one.
>Hearing her speak like you did was still hilarious beyond any reason you could find, leaving you to snort out in laughter, hearing a small, almost imperceptible “Even, now” from her.
>”Alright, alright, that was a good one. But yes, shit’s complex. So, why do you ask?”
>”Because it is like that here as well, unfortunately. I am no “saint”, but I am no sinner either. But I know one who was.”
>”The wolf?”
>”The wolf. A liar, a cheater, a drunkard, a failure. He claimed to be free of the bounds of truth, the bindings of relationships, the restraints of wine- I think you understand where I am going with, yes?”
>”An asshole with a sharp tongue and no shame to his name?”
>”Very much so. And one day, one day where I had just finished my work upon a new home, my hands aching from the placement of the walls, exhausted by the good work, he came to me as I walked to home. Boasting of his freedom, of his achievements, breath reeking of wine, body lacking in dignity. And he went on and on, for what felt as eternity.”
>”Why did you listen to him?”
>”He barred my way. I felt pity as I heard his delusions, but once he claimed to be above me?”
>A hint of anger seeps in her voice, a venom, slowly spreading to every syllable.
>”Above my Sisters? Above the Wind itself, that he should be idolized instead? Well, I had enough. So, as he spread his arms and yelled of his glory, eyes to the sky, I silenced him.”
>The venom faded as she uttered the final words, drained completely, leaving her tired but still smiling, waiting for you to respond.
>”Knife to the gut, I’m guessing?”
>”Hmm, anywhere else would be fatal. Beneath where the cord is cut, a bit to the right, is safest, assuming you do not mean to kill outright. It hurt him enough to make him silent as it went in. It hurt him plenty as it healed to a scar over the weeks.”
>“Well, shit. He had it coming to him, didn’t he?”
>”He did Anon, he did. I know your kind do not take such things lightly, but it takes a lot to make me brandish a knife.”
>Your spine jolts, and a thought comes up to you, spoken without a single second of hesitation or delay.
>”A lot huh? Like a game of Truth or Dare?”
>It was her turn to be off guard, her eyes closing on reflex to let out a barely muffled laugh, contained only by an immense force of will, the kind of someone who pretends to be serious for a living, for her life, ending in a toothy grin, modest but sincere.
>”Alright, I admit, I have some weaknesses Anon. We all do, do we not?”
>”I just had to do it Arovska.”
>“I know you did. I know.”
>A nagging absence prods at your head, but you pay it no mind as the both of you lean back unto the fur covered chairs once more, a feeling of peace and quiet filling the room, letting you breathe without any tension in the air or burning questions to ask.
>Just two people, trying to relax in the silence of the stonework.

>Both of you let the moment drag on for a while, content with simply being in quiet, closed eyed comfort.
>With no real reason or duty to stop either of your lazing about, your rest was interrupted only hours later, with the slow dragging of an entry door, the slight cough alerting you of her presence before you heard her voice, raspy and weary.
>”Forskarr humanski, tamante confusca! Urgh, Vent m’adj.” 
>You hear her groan as she moved on, stopping dead in her tracks as she seemed to spot you two, a modest hum being all she seemed to let out before coming in closer, her voice modulating into a much more polite and formal tone.
>”A guest. We did not plan for guests, did we?”
>Arovska seemed to roll her eyes before opening them, facing the voice alongside you, a stern look from her, and a much more curious one from your observer.
>You were greeted by a one eyed fox, face scarred and bearing a lack of fur on its mark, the remaining coat a shade of faded, grey-ish red, robes much akin to Arovskas, only tinted with red embroidery instead.
>Old, with that strange pride and guts only Elders that still “got it” seemed to have, earned and fought for, maintained by means kept secret until the grave and then forgotten.
>A veteran Guardian, if such a thing even existed at all.
>Arovska spoke before you had any chance to, polite but dry.
>”We did not. But that does not mean I cannot have them.”
>The fox seemed undisturbed by her comment, her slow blink showing neither rage, contempt or anything else of note, no tail movements or anything you could identify.
>Either she had the grandmother of all poker faces or she was someone that lacked any and all fucks to give.
>”Fair enough. Not often we get visitors. Especially visitors of a different kind.”
>Her single brown eye turns to you now, dragging itself along top to bottom, sizing you out like a predator.
>”Will our guest speak then? Or shall he remain silent, akin to the departed?”
>You remembered the words Arovska spoke of her Sisters, of her special care when speaking to them, and gave a cautionary glance, her nod giving you permission to act.
>You carefully raised yourself up from your comfortable rest, a few popped bones ruining the graceful rise as you offered a hand towards her, a polite smile on your face.
>”Name’s Anon. Pleasure to meet your acquaintance, Miss…”
>She stares at your hand for a few seconds before grasping it with little strength, her shake light at best, awkward and uncomfortable at worst.
>”Sahnt. You may call me Miss Sahnt.”
>”Nice to meet you Miss Sahnt. I was wondering if I was ever going to meet another Guardian of the mountain, but I guess this answers that. Anything else you’d like to know or ask about me?”
>You seemed to choose your words well enough, earning you a raised eyebrow and a twitch of a tail, a simple shake of her head sealing her intent.
>”I am fine not knowing. However, I would like to know what brings you here. Rare for us to invite anyone, and you do not seem troubled enough to merit the call.”
>Arovska seemed to begrudgingly raise herself from the chair, a weary grunt leaving her before she spoke again, in that cold simple way.
>”I needed some rest here after going outside. The expedition is still going on, and I could not afford to confront the people outside, tired and weak.”
>The fox seemed to merely blink at her explanation, giving you a sideways glance before responding.
>”So you brought a stranger inside our home?”
>”Anon is not a stranger. And you do not control who comes in or out. You never did.”
>Another blink, slow and careful, ending in a simple “Hmmm”.
>”Maybe I do not. But do warn us when visitors are here next time. Lips become loose once you get to my age, and I say things I should not at the door.”
>”I understand. Go rest inside, do not let us stop you.”
>”You could not stop me if you wished. But thank you, Arovska.”
>Unimpeded, the fox seemed to walk away without any rush or strings to stop her, taking a door down the hallway and disappearing within another room, not a single sound coming from inside.
>Your eyes met Arovska and as you gestured towards the room but she seemed to simply shrug it off, a non-verbal “don’t mind her” in its simplest form, leaning in further to whisper towards you.
>”Apologies for that. Not all of us are quite like me, as you can see.”
>”Yeah, I know. I remembered the talk about the other Sisters. Thank fuck too, otherwise I think she’d kick me out herself.”
>She seemed to nod in relief, her voice slowly filling itself with a less formal, more personal tone.
>”She would try. I would not let her Anon. This is our home, and in here, you are welcome by my will.”
>Her words hit you harder than you expected, finding yourself shaken for a moment or two, your gut clenching and, thankfully, releasing quick enough to not lose your composure.
>”Well… shit. Thanks Arovska, means a lot to hear that. But, are we staying here for much longer or do we have anywhere else to go today? I like this place, but people around kind of kill the talks you and I enjoy, yeah?”
>Her eyes trailed back towards the silent door and back, whispering even lower now.
>”Agreed. The expedition will remain with the tribe for all of today, and my plan was to rest here and talk, but I suppose we can simply go out there into the wild. Or back to our tents, if we really must.”
>”Sounds like you don’t want us to go back there, huh? Any reason why?”
>She lets out a barely hearable huff, minute in scale, but still more than enough to let her point across.
>”In truth, I wished to stay here for the night. Warmer for you, less sound from the tent rattling in the night, and well, it is home for me. Only felt right to rest where I belong and to aid you at the same time.”
>”Well, can’t argue against that, guess we sleep here. Any place in the “wild” you wanna go to? I assume there’s at least one nice place you know of and keep a secret from the others.”
>Her eyes sparked with a shine, that gleam, the kind you wield when you are either right or about to be, words slow and deliberate.
>”Oh, plenty of them. One better than the others, but I am not sure you would enjoy it.”
>You never were someone to back down from a test or a challenge, hell, half the reason you were even here was exactly that, both a challenge and a promise to keep.
>How could you ever have resisted taking the bait?
>”Go ahead and test me.”
>”Very well. How fond are you of water?”
>”I used to swim for fun, both in pools and in the sea. Good exercise, helped me keep my head clear, fun to challenge my brother to competitions too. Why?”
>A pleased smile spread itself across her face, her eyes wandering to somewhere beyond the walls behind the building. 
>”I will take that as “very fond of it” then. I know of a secluded spot I have been hiding for a good bit, even stored a few things in there. Willing to take a walk again?”
>”Anything’s fun with good company, and I couldn’t ask for better with you around. Lead the way then.”
>”Excellent then. Don your mask once more, and follow me.”



>The way to the mystery was thankfully less crowded than your way into her home, your stiff upper lip only facing a few people on your way before you headed out of the confines of the little village, leaving behind its chatter and people.
>You were never a man of the crowds yourself, but the relief that came from it was mostly out of not disappointing Arovska with your one job, even if you were probably doing better than what you wanted to admit.
>Regardless, the two of you soldiered on in silence onto a small trail, leaving the village up towards a split, one ascending, the other veering into the deeper woods, surrounded by trees and vegetation.
>She was the first one to speak, eyeing the road behind and in front, ears twitching before she spoke, urging you to move with her.
>”We will be going across this trail and descending into a small clearing below. There should not be anyone in the trail right now, but regardless, try to keep a good mask. You do them well.”
>You force yourself to give a half-hearted shrug as you moved alongside her across the path, trying not to sound too doubtful.
>”Well, if you say so Arovska.”
>”I do say so. I could not tell anything from your face back there, no matter how hard I tried.”
>”Really? Nothing at all?”
>”Really nothing. How does your kind manage to be so still and baffling, I will never understand. Your faces are nearly unreadable to me still, even after all these years of seeing your kind.”
>”Wait, what do you mean by unreadable? You can tell we smile and so on, right?”
>”Well…*you* are not too hard to read Anon, not in regards to that. But you do not move your ears, at all. Your kind never smell of… anything in particular or anything you want to hide, and you wear it so openly that you show you seem not to care what it means, if anything. Your faces seem like that of stone to us Anon and your postures are… subtle.”
>You eye her up and down, trying to find out if there was any hidden angle, your mind racing with doubt.
>You couldn’t find anything, nor were you expecting to, but you still had to ask.
>”You’re shitting me, right? You gotta be, no way is my shitty poker face unreadable.”
>The smile in her face was mild, but her words seemed honest, confessional even.
>”I wish I could say I was, but no. We can tell many of your intentions by voice, but we speak a different kind of language. For you, it would be hard to understand the truth if the subtle twitch of an ear, the suggestions in the flicker of a tail, or something more of a particular kind. At least, I hope it would be hard to understand, otherwise your kind have a rather large edge upon us.”
>You took her words to heart, nodding along as a idea sparks in your brain, a burning question.
>”Wait, then what do your kind have Arovska? Unless you were hiding a big tail very well, I don’t think I saw you with anything beyond the ears. Antlers don’t have some kind of code, I hope?”
>She seemed humoured by your line of questioning, giving you a playful nudge before straightening herself back into proper posture.
>”I assure you, I am not that odd myself, or hiding “codes” from you like that. Deer just use ears, smell and posture that is… a lot more blatant than your kind.”
>”Alright, when you mean more blatant, do you mean like-“
>She waved her hand out to the air, shaking her head with a closed eyed smile, letting her hand down, only to point towards your clothes.
>”Very blatant. Your kind seem to hide themselves in cocoons of fabric, following twenty different unwritten rules and stipulations, some simply inane. We prefer to be more honest and blunt, as you have seen, so our posture is very much clearer.”
>You took a second to laugh and recover from the cocoon comment, nodding along to everything else with a smile.
>”Well, I can’t argue that you guys are much simpler or that some rules are silly. But those fabric sheets are damn comfy when all you have is hair and skin however, don’t diss them too much, we humans get cold real easy.”
>”Excuses, excuses…”
>”Hey, I wish it was an excuse! This time of year, we’d freeze to death if we didn’t have our cloth and silk to save us. Blessed be the coats and parkas for those guys up north in the wastes, cocoons against the snow and frost.”
>”As long as those “coats” are better than your sleeping bag, they should be fine, yes.”
>”Really had to rub it in, huh?”
>”More of a poke than a rub, but of course I had to. You are not the only one to keep all the glory, nor should you ever be.”
>”Alright, ease it down Guardian, I don’t need the full blown scolding, I ain’t a cub.”
>”You are one in spirit Anon.”
>”The best kind of kid is the grown up one, eh?”
>”I suppose. Better a child man than a man child. But enough about that. We are close.”
>As you shifted your focus down into the dirt path, covered in trees and vegetation, you began to hear it, to feel it.
>The slowly rising moisture in the air, dampening your breath as you two came closer.
>The sound of rushing water, ceaseless and stronger with every step you took, splashing against rock and liquid alike. 
>At the end of your tunnel, you spot the unmistakable sight of a waterfall, small but beautiful, perched up high on mossy and weathered stones in a little hidden alcove, its remaining river flowing down into a place you couldn’t quite see, but flowing regardless, uncaring.
>You never really saw something like this in person, but it was just like how you’d imagine it from the pictures.
>Water rushing from high above, a steam like mist down below, a surprising amount of noise, even without it being something like the Falls.
>A basin beneath the waterfall itself, smooth and round by erosion, like a perfect crater.
>A small wooden “bridge” across the stream, the surrounding dirt and rock bare of any construction or touch, leaving only nature to decorate this place, in verdant green and greyish brown rocky ground.
>She was the first to break the silence and speak, a pleased hum to her voice as she observed you and the water, her stance calm and relaxed to an unusual degree.
>”Nobody upon the trail. Nobody here.”
>”Are you sure?”
>”There is no smell of them. No prints of passage left, no baskets or urns to collect water. We are alone.”
>”Guess that’s good for us then, huh?”
>”Good indeed Anon. Peace and Rest after the Burden, eased by the meeting of others such as you. We have earned this.”
>”Hey, I thought you said you wanted *me* to be poet a while back, yet you are going wilder than I have lately. Gotta give me my time to shine too, right?”
>Her ears twitched for a moment, up and down, letting out a small breath of air before nodding.
>”Of course, you will have your time to shine Anon. We merely need to go inside now.”
>You arched an eyebrow and looked around, your confusion mounting as you failed to see anything beyond the waterfall, your instincts failing you.
>”Wait, inside?”
>”Inside indeed. Hush for a moment, and allow me to show you a secret of the woods, in return for those few secrets you have shown me.”



>You may have always thought less of yourself than you should, but even you were wise enough to let her lead the way, keeping in silence as you walked around the flowing water.
>You weren’t even sure what “secrets” you were really being repaid for, be it the terrible pyromania you instilled in her, the nonsense of Christmas or some other bit of trivia you threw at her for fun or the sake of a conversation.
>Never look a gift deer in a mouth didn’t sound quite as good, but the spirit of it remained, your eyes following her as you were lead towards the side of the waterfall, her hands grasping at the stones until you heard a small, miniscule “Aaah, good.” rise up from her voice, turning back to you with a serious look.
>”What I am to show stays here, Anon. Is that clear?”
>”C’mon, you know I’m not a blabbermouth.”
>Her eyes seemed to focus in on you, not a look of anger, but of scrutiny, half lidded and aimed squarely at your face.
>”I do. But this is serious, and the risk of you saying what you should not exists. So I ask, no word to anyone. Not to my Sisters. Not to Jack. Not to Sheila. Not to Marksta.”
>You raised up your fist and bumped it against your chest, nodding to her look without breaking a stride. 
>”Not to my mother, father, sister, brother, possible pets or non-existent loved one. I’m no snitch Arovska, I’m not gonna tell anyone. Wouldn’t dream to.”
>Her eyes relaxed at your words, turning her head back onto the rocks, and nodding, even if it seemed more to herself than to you.
>”Good. Then you will be welcome here.”
>You were half way into asking before you saw her hands reach for a rock, dropping it by the ground, a seemingly rectangular piece of leather slowly forming itself as the “wall” loosened from the stone, pushed aside by a simple hand.
>Another stone removed, this one from the ground, the illusion broken, now moving with no resistance.
>A fake wall.
>Rather, a piece of leather, disguised as a wall, hiding a sort of inner cave crevice, the way forwards rather dark, but your thoughts were slower than your mouth, uttering your true reaction without filter.
>”What the fuck.”
>The brief laugh from her showed she wasn’t quite prepared for such an outburst, turning to face you with a nod, a hand motioning inside without any rush, just a small hint of pride on her voice.
>”It is my Sanctum. A home away from home, where we can talk like we haven’t yet before. Are these rare where you are from?”
>”No, I mean, it’s just- Look, we don’t usually have hidden doors to our special places, y’know? We just have like, a hangout spot outside, a locked door in our homes, not… this.”
>It was hard to tell, but something seemed to change as you said what you did, her eyes turning towards the entrance.
>Nothing like a sigh or a flicker of an ear, yet other things felt oddly restrained, her stare focused onto one single place upon the wall, her breathing controlled and perfected, calm.
>Her stance didn’t move, much akin to her face, stone like in appearance, yet her voice seemed to remain regal and soft, contrasting with everything else.
>”I see. Will it still be acceptable, despite it being so odd to your kind?”
>”I mean- yeah! Look, this just caught me the fuck off guard, stuff like this is the kind of shit we think of when we find something amazing, y’know? The kind we put in movies and mystery books, something forbidden or hidden. The usual guy never finds a hidden wall passage, not in their dreams.”
>A tidal wave of relief seemed to wash over her, a long drawn out breath aimed at the crevice, her posture gently shifting itself into the more casual form you enjoyed so much.
>”I understand then. A once in a lifetime opportunity, as you would put it, yes?”
>”Without a doubt. Guess telling you those secrets paid out, huh?”
>”I suppose they have. Yet, I have to warn you of one more thing.”
>”Alright, lay it on me, what do I gotta know?”
>”The way forwards is rather restrictive. I am going to have to remove my robes to pass without damaging or tarnishing them, so if you truly must, look away. But I will not damage them just for the sake of your human modesty. Is this acceptable?”
>”Hey, it’s your Sanctum, inviting me in is already humbling. Go and do what you need to do, I’ll just wait here till you’re done if you don’t mind.”
>”I do not. And thank you, Anon.”
>She turned her back towards you, hands reaching for her belt as you shifted your eyes away, seeing only her vague shape in the corner of your vision, leaving only the sound of rope and fabric to paint the picture.
>She gave you the opportunity to look away, and you were going to take it, eyeing out the waterfall to your right, the hanging mist and the beauty of the woods.
>It would have just been rude to look, right? She didn’t mind, not at all, but it would simply be impolite to do it.
>A little peek wouldn’t hurt though, right? You had already seen her before, not like it would be a big deal.
>In your little conflict of thoughts, you could practically hear it coming already, your body shivering in response.
>That deep, serpent like voice prodded your thoughts once more, slithering in, instinct and want, deep as the ocean, simple like a pond.
>Pervasive, but intrinsic, the whole world slowly focusing out as your thoughts coalesced, your vision becoming secondary to your mind.
>Words, feelings, images, all slowly made, and His voice to begin it all.


>”You want to do it, huh? Even after chewing her out that one time for such an honest mistake. Guess she didn’t get the curse of curiosity out of you. Might need an exorcism.”
>”Oh for God’s sake, not you and your shit again.”
>”No God’s here. Just You and You again.”
>”Why the fuck did I have to get cursed with a snarky ass self telling me to do stupid shit.”
>”No, brother. You know for a fact I am only here to say you fucked up. Or, to make you *not* fuck up.”
>”Yeah, because I really need the voice of instinct and want to go “Told ya so”, “Stare at that one chicks ass, just look at that Gift of God!” or worse. What else, want to tell me to go smoke a cig, down 3 cups of coffee and do blow off a hookers navel?”
>There was a moment of pause before it spoke once more, rolling a hum deep within itself, heavy, guttural, cocksure.
>Gloating like a victor.
>”Brother, I feel as if you are getting side tracked, if wishful. It wasn’t me that chose to stay silent that cold, cold night. I only have a mouth for you, nobody else, yet you could have escaped that embrace. You didn’t, did you?”
>”Yeah, alright, I didn’t. What the fuck about it?”
>”Dense as tungsten, stubborn like a bull, light as a feather when you don’t care. Blind. Eyes milky white, not a trace of the window to your Soul. You blocked it whole.”
>”I’m going to repeat, so quit being a fucking philosopher. What the fuck about it, huh?”
>The voice relented for a moment, ceasing its gloating to leave you waiting, moments passing without an answer.
>It arrived, quick and succinct, hitting you like a gunshot, the kick to your heart enough to carry the message without doubt.
>”You like her. And she likes you.”
>You spoke so fast that you didn’t even have to think, your body in the outside likely mimicking your own thoughts, hopefully without the sound to follow.
>”Bullshit. No fucking way.”
>”I am here, Anon. And you are not feeling the regret of failure. Do not make me say it out loud. Do not make me say “I told you so” again.”
>”I thought you enjoyed saying I fucked up? I thought you enjoyed the times you made me feel like shit?”
>It’s words became slow and heavy, every syllable hitting you akin to a hammer, pounding away at your brain.
>”No, brother. I never did. I just had to.”
>”… Why are you even here then? Just to fuck with me? Fucks sake, I’ll look! Just go away.”
>”Anon. We are beyond denial and anger. There will be no good deal when bartering with your own self. And we both know you do not want to feel like you have before.”
>”What then, you fucking tick? You want me to believe that shit?”
>”I want you to face reality, brother. Take a hint from your brain that you don’t know what you feel in your heart.”
>“Last time, you were a bit of a jackass, you know that? Hard to want to care about what you say.”
>”A jackass with a point is worth listening to, Anon. A jackass with a point is all you are right now. A jackass with a point I all *I* am. Will you listen, or will I have to speak later, in that same voice you hate to hear me use?”
>”… Fine. Fine! Fucking speak, I’ll listen if it’ll make you shut up.”
>You felt the voice relent for a few moments, its presence softer on your thoughts, lighter and simpler, returning with a much quieter, almost understanding tone.
>”Don’t ruin this for yourself Anon. Don’t waste an opportunity to find something new, something that makes you live.”
>”I wasn’t living before?”
>Its voice became solemn and heavy, soaked in the deep sadness of lonely nights and silent months.
>”No, brother. You were surviving. Every day, the same day. Every night, unfulfilling sleep. Every morning, the same routine. Every thought, used and abused until it had no more to give. That is not living. It never was.”
>”So… she’ll fix it? Is that it?”
>”Nobody is *the solution* Anon. There is no cure that is given by someone alone. But she will help you. And she wants to. And you want to be helped, deep down.”
>”Okay… okay, fine. You told me to give her a secret, right? What else do I do?”
>”Be willing to receive what you deserve, in return.”
>”But do I really deserve it?”
>”We all deserve it, brother. We all do.”


>The voice slinked away into nothingness, its presence fading as its words remained in your skull, burning like fire, your consciousness slowly returning to the real world, bit by bit.
>Your vision focused once more into the sight of the woods and the waterfall, the humidity of the air slowly seeping into your skin, the fresh, cool air flowing through your lungs, fingers twitching in your hands.
>You blinked, slowly, trying to readjust after your little episode, a bit disturbed by your lapse, but with an undeniable sense of calm washing over you.
>You looked to your left, the entrance to the cave empty, without a trace of her to be seen or found.
>Just how long were you out for?
>You mouthed off a silent “Goddamit” as you walked in closer, a familiar, if slightly echo-y voice greeting you.
>”Anon? You can come in already, I said it before!”
>A wave of embarrassment hit you like a damn truck, cheeks flustering against your will, your voice shouting back.
>”Shit, sorry! Just, had another episode happen, y’know?”
>”Like the sunset?”
>”Different, but yeah, kinda. Hold on, I’m coming, okay?”
>”Alright. I was starting to think you went away, to be honest…”
>”Hell no, wouldn’t dip out on you, even on a nightmare! Just, lemme squeeze through, this thing looks tight.”
>”I- very well. Cover the wall as you come in, we do not want the sound to escape, or for people to find us.”
>”Got it, rocks on the leather, don’t worry.”
>She might not have wanted that sigh of relief to echo out, but you heard it all the same, a wry little smile forming itself on your face as your blush faded, the way behind you closed, leaving you in the faint dark.



>It was a bitch and a half to actually squeeze through this place, especially wearing your pack, but with perseverance and the dandy help of a phone flashlight, you mostly managed to go past unscathed, only a few sharp edges ever scraping your skin.
>No wonder nobody ever kept this place, finding the crag was already hard, but getting in was probably such a pain nobody would bother living in it anyways.
>Inching yourself off the final bits, you finally found some semblance of light shining out to the front, an oddly familiar yellow tint to it.
>As your eyes shifted towards the source across the stone, you were halfway baffled to see it, a dangling yellow bulb shining bright, its wire spread across the walls and ending into a battery of sorts.
>Electric light was the last thing you were expecting, much less on a cave, the seemingly expensive hand cranked dynamo sitting right across a pile of old looking books, the source of the brightness.
>Everything else seemed just a bit off as you looked around, actually.
>A kind of stone desk, likely carved out of the wall itself, but with that odd polish you’d never expect from something they’d have, likely having taken days, if not weeks to make.
>Paper, pencils and pens, plastic and wood, leathery sheets, ink pots and feathers, all mingling together between plain and polished rock, notes and notes upon notes, a jumble of desk clutter.
>A few leather bags, clearly full, but tied up and shoved into the corners, likely filled with some kind of supplies, be it food, water or clothes.
>Even the bedding on the floor was peculiar, not due to it being furs and padding, that’s what you’d expect from a place like this.
>It was the fact it was in a state of disarray and mess that it reminded you of your own bedroom at its worst.
>Books strewn across the “sheets”, clothes set upon to its sides, clearly not folded, even a few balls of crunched up paper throw around, likely out of frustration and failure of her work. 
>It was odd, coming from someone of such authority, but it also felt… homely, in a sense.
>It was hers, and she was willing to show off even this part of her Sanctum, untidy and chaotic, like you remembered yours to be.
>You must have been silently staring for a while because you nearly damn shit yourself when she cleared her throat to your right, leaning by the wall, clearly amused.
>”Is it that fascinating to observe, Anon?”
>”Jesus fucking Christ, you nearly gave me a heart attack Arovska!”
>”Venk m’adj, you looked so focused I had to take you out of it. You make a girl feel self-conscious when you stare at her Sanctum like that, you know?”
>”Yeah, yeah I know. Did you mean to clean it up before I came along?”
>”No, I enjoy this little… mess of mine. No use keeping up a mask in my own little place, no use at all.”
>”I’m with you there. Kind of reminds me of my own bedroom, sort of looked like this too.”
>”Really? Is that so?”
>You gestured out to the mess as a whole, shrugging slightly.
>”Yep. A bit of a mess on top of the bed, a few spare papers around, a desk full of clutter, a few random bits and bobs. Feels familiar, y’know? Just like home sweet home.”
>The smile on her face was honest, warm and infectious, your words clearly resonating with her on a level you didn’t quite expect, her pleased hum deep.
>”Home sweet home, hmm? I like that. My Sisters always insisted on a more strict method, but I always preferred a more honest kind of lived in bed room. How can you call it a place of rest or a place of the heart, if you barely feel at home in it?”
>”You can’t. And that just blows, doesn’t it?”
>”In ways you would not believe Anon. Or maybe you would?”
>”I just might, actually. But uh, just one question if you don’t mind?”
>”Hmm?”
>”Where exactly do I sit? Just the ground?”
>”Ah, right. One moment.”
>You watched as she went into a darker corner of the cave, taking out a few folded furs and placing them down right by her own bedding, laying her backpack by it and sitting down as she cleared a space in her own spot, looking at you from below.
>”A simple enough solution. Better than the cold ground at the bonfire, yes?”
>You just give a quick shrug and plop yourself into it, leaving your backpack as a back rest, trying to get as comfortable as you could.

>I wasn’t the worst thing you ever sat on, the fluff added a good padding and being able to lie down was a nice bonus.
>Nowhere near as great as the chairs at the stone fort, but it’d do.
>”So, what’s the plan? Anything in particular you wanna talk about, because I think we still have a good few hours before we head on out to bed, yeah?”
>”Oh, plenty of time and plenty of things, yes. I still do have that big question, correct?”
>”Yep, the sword of Damocles upon this handsome little head. Got me by the balls with that one, won’t lie.”
>”Oh, no need to be so dramatic Anon. It is just a question.”
>”You forget how strong those little words are. I got you good with that one about the perfume, didn’t I?”
>She mimicked your little show of defeat to perfection, rising her own arms upwards, solemn face looking into the ground, the widest grin in her face, dropping the act as she spoke.
>”Oh, you did Anon, yes you did. And I got you to confess your little story of love, didn’t I?”
>”Mostly the lack of one, honestly.”
>”Silence speaks louder than words ever will Anon. It is what people aren’t willing to say, the lack of words, that hesitation before them that says it all.”
>”Can’t have a conversation without words however! That’s just empty air, isn’t it?”
>Her smile widened as she huffed out, breathing in deeply.
>”Oh no, Anon. Perhaps humans cannot speak in silence, but we can.”
>”C’mon, that’s just cheating! You just speak with ears, tails and everything else! That’s visual noise, isn’t it? Still talking, just through the eyes.”
>”It is silent anon. Besides, can you truly call it cheating, when surely even your kind dabbles in such a practice? Your faces are like stone to us, but for you, they would be akin to clay.”
>”A big wet mess of loamy ground?”
>”I meant to imply a lump of material with endless possibility, but yes, I admit, it is also that to the unskilled.”
>You knew what she wanted to say, humans could speak in just little face twitches, but the overwhelmingly numb “eh” and the shrug of your shoulders made your stance fairly clear.
>”You won’t find much skill in clay or faces here, honestly. I never was much of a diplomat or a people’s person, reading the mud was always hard.”
>”Really? I would have figured you as someone of that kind. Any reason why you never became like that?”
>You pull out your clenched fist and start numbering out the reasons, extending your fingers as you went on.
>”Well, for one, I never got the right kind of friends to even go near that, and without pals, you never go anywhere big. Two, I much prefer not to lie as a whole, and those guys lie as a job. Three, to cut it short, I was just never rich enough, and four, well, nobody else in the family was like that, so why bother?”
>She seemed to look at you oddly, taking a few moments of thought before she addressed what you said.
>”I am inclined to agree on friends, to a point, perhaps even on the family, but what do you mean “lie as a job”? You do not mean that in the real sense of it, yes?”
>You lean back further and close your eyes, nodding sagely just to mess with her.
>”Oh, more than what you’d believe Arovska. Some guys are paid to dress up in nice suits, make up big promises to people, barely deliver and be “friends” with one another, ruling over millions of us. It’s definitely something, but to a point, it kind of just works, I guess.”
>”Dare I ask if you jest again, after all these times you were not?”
>”Curiosity is a curse and blessing, using your own words Arovska. I think you already know the answer to that question, you might just not like it.”
>A smile from her, even if slightly tainted with sadness.
>”You are right, I do not. But I notice something of yours. A pattern, if you will?”
>”Hmm? What would that be?”
>”You almost never speak truly well of your home, only after the bad. Could you tell me more of the good things? The things that make it worth living on, despite all that nonsense?”
>”Ah, back to the poetic stuff, hmm? Alright, sure, I can give you a little taste of home, the less bitter stuff at least.”
>You leaned in back to your pack, closing your eyes and breathing out a sigh, trying to remember the best times, the little things.
>”Hot water was always good. You could just take a shower in your own little personal waterfall, be it winter or summer, water just flowing through you, never ending. Drinking tea and coffee as the rain plinked onto your home, feeling safe under a fuzzy blanket as you watched the storm rage on. The food, more than just survival, it became like art. Dishes, full plates of meat, fish, filler and sauce, the stuff to fuel dreams, to bring families together with.”
>You breathed out as you opened your eyes, a sad smile slowly spreading across your face, more bitter than you’d expect.
>”Yeah, there’s stuff there that keep you going, but you gotta realize that stuff only keeps you going because there is always something to put you down. Soul food only exists because sometimes you go hungry or you eat like a beast. You can only feel safe is you’ve felt in danger before, and in order to feel truly happy-“
>”You had to be truly sad. I understand Anon.”
>You nodded without taking your eyes off the ceiling, the yellow bulb still shining on like a little sun.
>”That’s the thing, even you admitted it. You always remember the bad, and tend to forget the good. We all do.”
>A huff is all you heard from her as she laid back even further, damn near horizontal with the ground and its furs.
>”And yet, we carry on. Because we must.”
>”Because we gotta. For family, for friends…”
>”For duty, for your tribe...”
>”They keep you going too, huh?”
>”Sometimes. Other times, they are the thing that makes me need this little Haven. This home sweet home, as you called it.”
>”You really like that saying, huh?”
>The small giggle from her caught you by surprise and warmed your heart, your cheeks flustering for a moment.
>”I do. Something about it feels perfect. But what about yours?”
>”Hmm? My what, exactly?”
>”Your own home sweet home. How was it like, back in that odd land of yours?”
>You chuckled to yourself, closing your eyes to breathe and admit the truth like you never could.
>”Hell. I made my lil Sanctum one of the worst places to be in, believe it or not.”
>She seemed to hesitate before asking, a hint of caution and curiosity to her tone.
>”In what way? How did you make it so?
>”I made it only relaxation since I had no work to do for months. And because I made it just relaxation, I never got into anything else due to habit. Rest with no Burden, and you fuck up your home.”
>”… I see. Was that why you came here?”
>”In a way? I needed a breath of fresh air. New people. A new place. Walking in new shoes, even if for a few days.”
>Her eyes seem to narrow a little, slowly traveling to face you.
>”Hmm. Would you judge me if I said I feel the same? That I needed a way away from here, even if just for a while?”
>You catch a glimpse of her staring, smiling by pure instinct, your eyes stuck to the ceiling, out of embarrassment and a need to focus.
>”Heh. Nah, everyone needs to take a breather from their home eventually. Why, thinking of bunking down and experiencing the big city for yourself one day?”
>She shifted a bit in her spot, eyes stuck to rock much like yourself, a small little smile slowly spreading across her face.
>”I was. I would need some help to do it, of someone I could trust, but if he was willing to host me, I would be delighted.”
>”Oh, that so? I’m sure he’d be up for it then.”
>”Truly? What makes you think he would?”
>The spark in your spine spoke to you, your brain sending you a clear message, honest and true.
>The moment was here.
>There was no voice now, however. 
>No silky smooth serpent with sickly poison.
>Just the heavy beat of your heart and all that was in it brought to light, your breath long, your words passionate as you spoke.
>”Who wouldn’t wanna be around you? You’re dignified, smart, a good worker, caring for your people, even have that insight that few ever have too. Only a moron wouldn’t wanna help you out and catch a break.”
>The silence after your words was palpable, the dead air growing with every second until she spoke, her words carefully chosen, cutting through the quiet like a knife.
>”… I see. And you think he knows it? That I am all of that? All of those wonderful things?”
>”He’d be an idiot not to, wouldn’t he? And you wouldn’t trust an idiot, would you Arovska?”
>Her breath shortened for just a moment, the sound of a nervous gulp clear as she held her hands together by her chest.
>”No… no, I would not. And you think he would be truly willing to put up with me? I am not perfect, far from it.”
>”Nobody is. You’ve heard so much shit from all of your tribe, you know it by heart, and he’d know it too. But you’d be worth having around. No doubt about it.”
>Her breathing was off now, shallow, fast, her eyes closed, fearing the answer to her question.
>”Even… even with the antlers? They wouldn’t bother him?”
>”They always looked cute on you. Like a crown on a princess. On a queen.”
>She kept still, leaving only her ragged breathing and your beating heart to sound out in the cave, a wide smile on your face as the burden lifted itself from you with every word you spoke, muttering only a few more before quieting down.
>”What about him, Arovska? What do you think about him?”
>She steadied herself, a deep, shaky breath slowly returning her composure, her classic calm shattered to pieces, leaving only something less trained, more primal. 
>”Well… he is odd. Happy and sad at the same time, but wiser than he thinks. But he can make me laugh. He can make me have fun, to relax. And- and he understands. I think he really does, otherwise I would not let the mask down around him.”
>You let that flood of warmth spread itself around you, top to bottom, your cheeks flushing red, warm and rosy, your heart having little more to say but a question you knew the answer to.
>”Does it matter, that he doesn’t have fur or anything else?”
>”I don’t think I ever cared about that. He’s warm, of person and body. That is what matters.”
>A bliss filled smile covered you ear to ear, the rising chuckle from you hearty, spreading even to her as you spoke, her own awkwardness shifting into a kind of calm, eyes stuck to the ceiling, afraid, but her voice smooth like honey. 
>“I just hope he likes me back.”
>”I think he does. I think he realises he does now.”
>”Ah… is that so?
>”Yeah. I think that’s so.”
>”Then… I have just one question to ask.”
>”Hmm?”
>”Why is he not here with me, under the blankets?”


>You blanked out while searching for an answer, an unfortunate “Uhhh” leaving your dumb lips before you felt the warm touch of her hands laid on your arm, your spine shocking you awake like an alarm.
>Your eyes travelled to its source, across her arm and into her face, finding her with that smile that warmed your heart, not a single sound from her mouth as she gently blinked.
>A gentle squeeze was all it took for you to stop trying to talk, watching in awe as her other hand gently slid towards her rope belt, pulling out at the knot that kept it together, her embroidered robe losing its grip on her waist, leaving only the slightest hint of what was beneath.
>You felt your arm be moved towards her, watching in stunned silence as she dragged your hand towards the open folds of her robe, letting it rest there.
>Taunting you with its warmth, the smoothness of her creamy brown fur, a glimpse, the feeling of a navel just beneath your fingers, the fabric warping around her legs, all of it leaving just enough to the imagination.
>You didn’t hesitate any longer.
>You started slow, letting your hand wander up and down, her face leaning back with a wide smile and closed eyes, letting you explore at your leisure, savouring the moment as you went on at your own gentle pace.
>Little things first, like spreading out your fingers to skim her fur, feeling it out as it thinned the higher you went and thickened the lower you got, letting the little window of her robe widen just a bit, revealing just the smallest glimpse of her breasts.
>You became a bit more daring after that, letting a hand slide into her chest beneath the silken sheet, a soft squeeze earning you a hearty hum of approval as she arched her back, clearly revelling in this little show of hers.
>It was hard not to indulge her, really.
>Were it anybody else, you’d have made your awkward apologies and left without looking back, but with someone like her, you had no choice but to give in. 
>How could you really deny someone like her, someone who understood?
>It didn’t help that she was easy on the eyes, something that surprised you, considering how… exotic she was.
>There was an appeal to her antlers, maybe something for someone in the hooves, but what did you in was her fur beneath the robes, the patterns it once hid from you now revealed as you delved deeper into this moment.
>Her stomach and below was a creamy beige, surrounded by a thicker coat of oak-like brown, six little bubbles of the softer cream adorning it, either painted or natural, spread out like numbers on a clock, surrounding her midsection.
>The fur itself was like silk, a feeling of primordial comfort overwhelming you as you traced your fingers around the contours of her body, feeling the light pudge of her belly, the surprisingly strong muscle of her legs, the up and down of her chest as she breathed in deep.
>You were enjoying this more than what you’d like to admit, but the soft squeeze of her hand on your arm was enough to snap you out of your trance, her lips stuck on that indulgent smile, her eyes scouring you up and down, honeyed words soon after.
>”You have seen me twice without my robe. My turn.”
>She shed off whatever shred of silk clang onto her as she rose, helping you stand, hands grasping at your clothing, prodding it for weaknesses as she traced her fingers across you.
>To say you were blushing was an understatement, your face redder than a tomato and hot like a stove, heart beating so damn fast it took her hugging you from behind to calm you down, feeling her arms embrace you tight, a soft “Easy now” disarming you of your nervousness, even if it worsened your redness.
>Her own heart pumped like mad, masked behind years of practiced speech but betrayed by her hug, the frantic beat being felt even across your layer of clothes, giving you a warm thought to anchor yourself on.
>She was as nervous as you were, or maybe even more.
>Not that it seemed to matter much, your jacket quickly disarmed from you and thrown in a random corner of the cave, her hands scouring your shirt for its weakness, fingers digging deep at your skin, skimming the waistband of your pants.
>You were both surprised and startled with how aggressive she was now, almost ripping your shirt as she pulled it upwards, her hands darting right down after she threw it, firmly grasping your pants, tugging away at them, stopped only by the belt you had on.
>You let your hands rest on top of her own as she tried to rip it off, her ragged breath shifting into a more embarrassed huff as she pulled them away for a moment, letting you remove and throw it into a corner, a delayed but pleased hum droning right by your ear.
>You didn’t like admitting it, but being so desired that someone would go on to try and rip off your belt felt… good.
>No, more than that, it felt amazing, the sheer rush of it filling you with that sweet adrenaline, flowing through your veins like ice, your breath long and deep as your muscles tensed, your confidence overflowing.
>She seemed to be enjoying herself as well as she unzipped and slid your pants off, casting them aside into another dark corner of the room, disappearing from sight.
>She paused for a few seconds, hands groping at your rear, feeling out the fabric of your boxers as you breathed out, her long indulgent squeezes triggering something in you, one of her hands gently cupping your length across the tissue, another guttural hum in your ear as she spoke.
>”Hmm. One final layer to remove. But first, just one last thing to do Anon.”
>The shiver down your spine was felt by more than just you, and the flood of warmth across your body was starting to become addictive, your tone halfway arrogant, confident, but trying to play along as well as you could.
>”Really, huh? What would that be? Squeeze my ass any harder and it’ll be tender enough to eat.”
>Her answer was quick, earning you another harsh grope, her mouth just besides your ear, whispering to you with its hot, ragged breath. 
>”Tempting. But I have to mark you first. And you are going to mark me.”
>Your attempts at talking were shushed as a single finger crept into your lips, her hands leaving you as she laid down unto the bedding, belly up, hungry eyes traveling up and down your frame savouring every detail.
>”Leave those on, for now. Come lay down with me, that we may begin.”
>You didn’t need a second request, lowering yourself down to her with her frame, hovering just a few inches off her face, propping yourself on your elbows as she spread her legs to hook you in, a hand slowly reaching for your cheek, grasping you softly.
>Feeling the warmth of her breath, the up and down of her chest as her heart beat, your own eyes staring deep into those hazel gems of hers, entranced in that beauty.
>”Indulge me one last time, won’t you Anon?”
>”You got 20 seconds before I start kissing you Arovska, so you better make it quick.”
>She simply smiled at your words, letting out a sigh as she closed her eyes, confessing to you in a tone she never used with you before.
>One of love and embarrassment, hiding away a deep hunger, a fantasy.
>One you could fulfil.
>”Embrace me. Embrace me thoroughly. Lay your head upon my chest, let me hold you there. Let me mark you with my scent, and let yours be marked in me. I want it. I… I need it. Please.”
>Your heart clenched as you saw her close her eyes and pull your face closer to her own, feeling her lips mesh in with yours, your eyes giving out to the dark, your body acting on instinct and want.
>Her legs seemed to lock you in like a vice, tightening you into this grip as you kissed her, feeling the softness of fur on your back as she pulled your once seating above you, blanketing you both beneath a layer of soft fur, encasing you in a cocoon.
>You refused to stand motionless, your hands traveling across her back and groping at everything they could, hips bucking back and forth as you rubbed your length across her groin, her leglock tightening every time you receded.
>The air itself felt hot, that intoxicating scent of strawberries and musk overwhelming you as Arovska slid her tongue into your mouth, inexperienced but passionate, wrestling yours with gusto as you grinded away, the thin strip of fabric between you two moistening with every thrust.
>The sweet taste of victory and passion was short lived however, her lips breaking off from yours for just a few moments, her reluctant look sideways hiding just how much she wanted to continue, wiping off the small trail of drool your union left.
>You were confused for a moment but stayed silent as she pushed your head down towards her neck, letting it rest into her shoulder, leglock still binding you in as she spoke, a tone of embarrassment and fear as her head laid back into the bedding.
>”I… I realize I must sound insane to you. But I have dreamt of this Anon. I have dreamt of every single detail, of every single caress. It is foolish, but I want this to be perfect. Even if it is just this once.”
>Your adrenaline filled brain processed her words slowly, giving out a sigh as you raised your heads upwards towards her cheek, planting a soft kiss and whispering into her ear, a dumb wide grin in your face.
>“Let’s make it special then. Tell me what you want me to do, I’ll play along.”
>Her breath of relief was a joy to your ears, feeling her shuffle up more towards you, a less nervous but still sheepish request leaving her.
>”Thank you. Kiss me then, gently. Take as long as you want, through the path you best choose. I trust your judgement.”
>Kissing, huh? 
>You kept yourself silent, grinning like an idiot on both the inside and the outside as you pecked her on the cheek, a soft hum in your throat.
>God, you always wanted to do this one day.
>You let your hand cup her left cheek as you kissed her once again, slower now, every single time going down just a bit, a flurry of small smooches all going across her neck, intent on going as low as she’d allow.
>By the time you went past it, her hands were pressing your head towards her chest, that intoxicating scent of musk and strawberries seeping into you as you went along, her leglock having long faded, letting you wander freely as she rested.
>It was downright hedonistic, your face gliding amidst all that soft fur, feeling her heart beat like a thunderstorm as you went along, smelling that sweet perfume and listening to her pleased hums as you went on and on, doing something you always dreamed to do.
>All of it under the covers of a bed’s sheet, just to please someone you loved, embraced in fur and warmth alike.
>If there was a divine, he wanted you to experience heaven on earth, and you were not one to refuse it, letting your kissing wander across her breasts, giving each a soft smooch before heading lower and lower still.
>As soon as you reached her navel, she stopped you, pressing your head towards her belly until you no longer tried to go any lower, feeling her ragged breath echo across the small cavern, shaking hands gripping at your scalp, a smug voice trying to hide away just how anxious she was.
>”Low enough, Anon. You would not wish to go lower, would you?”
>”Maybe I do. Guess you won’t let me, huh?”
>Her nervous giggle was enough to warm your heart, her long, shaky breath holding the tension in the air until she spoke again, smug once more.
>”Your lips are much, much better served up elsewhere. And I still have to open my little present, do I not?”
>You took the hint and rose up once again into her arms, feeling her hands latch onto your back and ass as she locked lips with you again, her gentle moaning as she wrestled your tongue fuelling your ego and hardening your member, grinding away at her once more with new gusto.
>She seemed to notice and doubled in her efforts, her hands now focused squarely onto you, one pushing your head towards her, mashing lips as she lost herself in the moment, the other squared away on your rear, groping away with wild abandon, indulging her more primal need.
>It was hard to keep yourself together like this, overwhelmed with so much, her taste never leaving your mouth as you were forced down, feeling her groping fuel you as you thrusted harder towards her, the soft fabric of your boxers already drenched in a mixture of your own fluids and hers.
>You began to lose yourself, her throaty moans only intensifying as your hands crept up towards her antlers, gripping them hard, fingers scouring the fuzzy velvet as her breathing become more and more ragged, arching her back and giving away all the control to you.
>You couldn’t tell if it was part of her plan or not, but you barely felt conscious, barely thought, letting instinct and hunger guide you as you became rougher, your thrusts more forceful, grinding away at her with a much more steady rhythm, the annoyance at your undergarments growing damn unbearable.
>You let go by pure need only, prolonging your kiss until you couldn’t any longer, hands darting away at your boxers, intent on ripping them off as fast as you could.
>The sudden push on your chest throwing you back stopped that quickly, your balance shattered as you stumbled, a final, forceful shove laying you prone on the bedding as she kneeled above your legs, a deep hunger in her eyes, a hint of lust and anger in her words.
>”You do not get to tease me such and then deny me my prize Anon. I will have it, by my will, on my hands, so help me the Wind.”
>You watched as she shoved you back once more, a harsh hand pressing down on your sternum before both went on to your boxers, gripping their sides and slowly dragging them across your legs.
> She seemed to take her sweet time doing so, eyeing your meat as it slid across the fabric, her breath ragged as she threw your poor undergarments away into a corner, feasting her eyes on your length.
>She seemed entranced by its shape, letting a soft hand slide its fingers across it, up and down, up and down, over and over again, another hand slowly inching towards her already wet lips, gently rubbing herself as she stared into your groin.
>It was hard for you to look away, your own eyes stuck to her form, beautiful and downright majestic as she kneeled by your manhood, pleasuring herself to how it felt alone, her eyes closing themselves as she rocked her hips back and forth, breasts bouncing alongside it.
>It was almost like she dreamed of how she wanted it to go, forgetting reality and indulging in her little fantasy, right as you were there.
>It felt wrong to stop her, not only because she asked to make it “special”, but because of just how out of it she was, picking up the speed both in how she was handling you, and how she was handling herself.
>A finger or two of hers seemed to slip to where you couldn’t see anymore, her hand gripping your length with a much firmer, stronger grasp, her thumb gently rubbing at your tip, teasing you with every circular motion. 
>It took you grunting in pleasure to snap her out of it, her eyes blinking away at nothing, a barely noticeable blush forming onto her face as she realized what she was doing, avoiding your eyes like the plague as she tried, in vain, to hide her wet fingers from sight.
>”Ah, I- apologies, you must think me an airhead, losing myself in a time like this.”
>You couldn’t help but to laugh a little, barely able to hide away your own rising chuckle as you propped yourself up on your elbows.
>Even while she was almost riding you, hand firmly on your junk, fingers in her own, she had the time to be regal and cautious, apologising for being “ungainly” at a time like this.
>The more you thought about it the more you couldn’t hold it in longer, letting your smile widen as much as it should, the laugh soon following track.
>Little by little, she seemed to bow her head down and smile as well, watching you barely hold it together as your hand crept up to her thigh, giving her a soft, caring squeeze, her own (thankfully) dry hand traveling towards your face, grasping you by the chin, your words faster than hers.
>”Thought I almost lost you up there in dreamland Arovska. You feeling good now?”
>”I suppose I am now. It is so easy to lose oneself to a dream.”
>”Was it a nice one?”
>”It was beautiful. Now, it is time to live it.”
>You watched as she let a finger slide across your lips, her wet hand giving your member one final caress as she laid herself back unto her bedding once again, soaked fingers spreading her lower lips, another hand gently groping her own breasts.
>Putting on a show just for you, letting her legs open just wide enough to be inviting, an embarrassed but smiling face staring at the ceiling, waiting for you to make your move.
>You didn’t take long appreciating the sight, gripping her knees and spreading her legs further apart, barely a touch needed.
>You let your hands travel across her thighs, feeling the fur between your fingers before you scooted forwards, resting your length atop her mound, letting it feel the heat from her, just how soaked she was.
>Just how much she wanted this.
>You were tempted to stop and ask if she was ready, your brain quickly firing that idea down as you gripped your length, lowering it towards her lips, her breath halting as you began rubbing it across her soaked, damn near glistening slit. 
>You let her lack of air fuel you as she closed her eyes, her left breast gently cupped by her own hand as she let her right grip onto your forearm, your mind focusing itself in one thing only.
>To make it special for her.
>You started slow and steady, letting your tip gently press in, rubbing her thighs as you rocked your hips back and forth, her grip on your forearm tightening every time you nudged yourself in, inch by inch.
>Her eyes seemed to focus inwards, eyelids closed as she arched her back, ragged breaths rising through gritted teeth, her other hand, once cupping her breast, now laid by the fur sheets, gripping at them as you picked up the pace.
>You began pulling back more before you thrusted, every time earning yourself some more ground, going deeper and deeper as she panted away, the unmistakeable feeling of nails digging into your arm triggering something primal within you, something raw.
>The echoing breathing in the cave, the unmistakeable shuffle of fur sheets, the wet, sloppy rhythm of love, and that smell, that view, God, that view.
>A deer, splayed across a fur sheet, gripping it in need, biting her lip as you thrusted away at her, the soft moans of your name as she arched her back, one she confessed to love but a minute or two ago.
>One that needed love.
>One you needed to love.
>You gritted your teeth and closed your eyes to the world, to that small sanctum, to the hidden alcove behind the waterfall and focused on what mattered the most.
>The sounds of love, of your name being whispered and moaned by your beloved.
>The feeling of fur upon your hands, the tightness she exerted in your length, the wetness you both had, thrusting into one another with wild abandon.
>The building pressure you felt on your manhood and the payoff, yet to come.
>It was instinct only that made you lower yourself to her once again, lined up to perfection, holding yourself up to your elbows as your lips mashed against hers, only a moment of shock in her before they gave back, her taste flooding your mouth once more, addictive beyond words.
>It was her instincts turn to grapple you as much as she could, arms and legs holding on for dear life as you grunted away, thrusting into her without a care in the world, following that tempo of love, echoed out across the cave, across your ears, your being.
>With every single thrust downwards, you came in closer to the end, one step closer to finishing, but it didn’t matter.
>You could feel her grip tighten with every single motion, her fingernails digging into your back and neck, her mouth mashing into yours without a moment to lose, without a single second to waste.
>Her end was coming as well, you could feel it.
>Without any words to say, unable to say them, you let your adrenaline rush across your veins like pure ice, your final burst of strength gone into those last few moments, gripping into her antlers as you felt the pressure become unbearable, uncontainable.
>You let your strength drain out as you thrusted in for the last time, grunting as you buried your manhood as deep as it could go, your brain overloading itself with pleasure, your muscles spasming, mashing your hips with hers as you buried your seed deep within.
>Every single twitch your body gave was given back in return, her insides gripping your length and pulling you in deeper as you flooded her, every motion you made earning you a squeezing grip, milking you for every single drop she could manage to take.
>It was like lightning has struck across her spine, every limb grappling onto you for dear life as the air seemed to drain off her chest, holding you like a treasure, twitching and moaning into your lips for dear life.
>You could barely think, your poor head a thunderstorm of electrochemical input, your sense of smell and taste, used and abused like a shoddy tool, still ending in the echoes of strawberries and spit, her tongue still wrestling yours, even if much slower now.
>Your sense of touch was no different, every single inch of your recovering, your now narcoleptic ass getting the same input, fur and comfort, warmth and safety, the primal brain yelling at you one simple command.
>To rest after the burden.
>You couldn’t do it to her however, refusing to be the kind of chump that just loved her and snoozed on top like a sandbag, urging your sore, overused muscles to at least lift yourself by the elbows, to let the pain wake you up.
>You let the grip on her antlers rest, moving your hands away from the fuzzy velvet and to feel the fur beneath you instead, your body barely able to answer your requests, your arm more so dragged rather than moved.
>Your attempts at pushing yourself upwards were met with grunts from both you and her, your poor arms screeching in pain as you pushed yourself off the ground, her leglock keeping your lower back from escaping as your head barely managed to rise a few inches, still dangerously close to her own.
>You tried to speak, but what came out was anything but coherent, more of a pained grumble than words, your brain still trying to reboot itself as she mumbled into your ear, dropping any pretense of royalty in her tired, yet endlessly happy voice.
>”Aurgh, forskarr humanski… Do you want to roll over Anon?”
>It wasn’t ideal, but you figured that was as good as you’d get, nodding and grunting as you shifted yourself to the side, her own push helping you tumble to the right, Arovska now laying on top of you, her head nestled by your neck, antlers thankfully out of your face.
>You opened your eyes as slow as you could, letting the yellow light permeate your eyes as you stared into the rocky ceiling, her weight settling onto you as you wrapped your arms around her torso, soft and welcoming.
>Even as you stared up above, a wide, full smile on your face, you knew you couldn’t stay awake for much longer, in this heavenly embrace, in this comfort.
>You wished you could have said something, anything, to have a final loving word of comfort ready, a final confession to her ears in this special moment, but you were simply too tired to speak, too tired to think.
>You let your hands push her closer as your eyes closed themselves one final time, the last inch of strength in you fading away as you let your body rest, the tides of sleep washing you away into unconsciousness.


>A calm, sleepless night.
>A dryness in your mouth, with the aftertaste of something else, of something personal, clinging onto you.
>That familiar ache in your arms, in your legs and back, a headache strong enough to split a mountain in two.
>That unmistakeable cold of a winter morning, carried by a slippery, bastard breeze.
>And a feeling of warmth like you never felt before, weighing down on you with a faint, clingy grip.
>It took you longer than what you’d like to admit for you to remember everything that happened the day before, but without a doubt, it happened alright.
>Your lack of any clothes was obvious, as if the naked deer atop you already wasn’t, holding onto you like a pillow, head nestled to your neck, content to just lay there amidst all the furs that covered you two.
>Your poor back was outright killing you, what with the sleeping in a stone floor, covered in a heavy furred rug, sure, but it was everything else that showed you didn’t just hallucinate it all.
>Every single fibre of your being felt like it was going through withdrawal, or more appropriately, the serious cost of your passionate excess.
>You weren’t a stranger to the adrenaline rush, you got in a good few fights over the years, but epinephrine was a Sunday friend at the heart, leaving you with a headache whenever shit wasn’t just right enough to visit, but she did her job.
>You just wished it wasn’t quite so painful as a payment once the bill came around.
>As you looked around, your hopes of finding your phone were quickly smashed, your poor pair of pants throw across the cave in the heat of the moment, far, far away from your reach, reduced to almost nothing by the deer atop you.
>You tried your best to enjoy the view and the feeling, but as amazing as it was to see a sleeping deer grip onto you like that, you were just too out of it to be able to enjoy it fully, your head pulsating in pain every few seconds. 
>Turning your eyes to the right, you spotted a small hint of natural light coming across from the jagged entrance of the cave, nodding to yourself before doing a needed cruelty, one you could barely forgive yourself for.
>Waking up your new beloved from her peaceful slumber.
>You raised your poor right hand above her, patting her back while whispering into her ear as softly as you could, making sure to do it as gently as possible.
>”Arovska? C’mon, wake up honey. Time to rise and shine.”
>It took some insistence and a few more back rubs, but she eventually came to, her eyes fluttering open for a second before closing once again, arms quickly gripping onto you harder, her own lips whispering by your ear, forgoing any royalty her tone.
>”Jae matin? Forskarr, m’deja descan.” 
>”In English, honey?”
>She took a second or two to respond, loosening the grip on you as if she needed the strength to think, her words coming in a much more understandable but still informal way.
>”Is it already morning Anon? We can sleep in, enjoy our time. They will not not move until later.”
>You rub your temples and breathe in, trying to calm down your headache and think straight for a minute.
>Sheila and Jack were still a thing alongside the expedition, and it made sense they wouldn’t march everyone at sunbreak, they’d kill ‘em dead.
>You probably still had a lot of time to make up for, now that you really thought about it.
>It was morning right now, but by the time you two had your lights turned off, it wasn’t exactly dusk yet, late in the afternoon, sure, but nowhere near nightfall or pitch black.
>You let your eyes wander into the small spear of natural light and nodded, wrapping your arms around her as you huffed up into the air, a wide smile in your lips.
>”Yeah, yeah you’re right. Sorry, my head’s just killing me, can’t really think straight.”
>”Do you need some help Anon? I have some herbs in my pouch, they help with the pain.”
>”Nah, I’ll just drink some water, got a bottle in my pack. I’ll be fine, don’t worry about me.”
>”Are you sure?”
>You breathed in, laying your head back and you snuggled her closer, burying your face in her neck, holding her in as you planted a small kiss on her cheek.
>”I’m fine, trust me. I ain’t a stranger to a shitty wakeup, I’ll be right as rain in a few. Thought you wanted to sleep in a bit more anyways?”
>Your kiss seemed to soften her up well enough, earning you a tighter squeeze and a weary sigh, her body shifting into a more comfortable position above you as she spoke, a tinge of sadness in her voice.
>”It is a force of habit, I suppose. I am so used to waking up earlier to help another, I barely get any mornings where I do not rise early. You are right, best to enjoy the moment.”
>She shifted herself again, her breathing slowing down for a moment, a second of hesitation before she spoke again, slower, much more carefully now.
>”I merely have a question, if I may?”
>You couldn’t help but laugh despite the pain, your muscles tensing as you let out a small chuckle, turning your head to her once more, or at least as much as you could.
>”If you may? Did I dream up everything we did yesterday or something? Because if you just beat me up to serve as a body pillow, you are one cruel woman Arovska.”
>A quick and decisive elbow strike to your ribs cut your smile short, earning you a grunt of pain and a small giggle from her before she spoke, a tone of sincere longing and calm in her voice.
>You couldn’t blame her too much, you honestly did deserve it.
>”I assure you, it was real and beautiful, something I never wish to forget. But I wish to know if I dreamt this, or if I simply misheard.”
>”Heh. What did you mishear?”
>”You called me “honey” as you woke me, yes? Twice, even?”
>”Oh, that. Yeah, I did, you don’t like it?”
>”I don’t understand. Why honey? I am anything but that.”
>You breathed in, massaging your poor temples once more as you thought out an explanation.
>You *were* still dealing with an entirely different society, one with different habits, a different language and all kinds of quirks.
>It was easy to forget that, with how “civilized” Arovska was, but you should have seen this coming, headache or not.
>”It’s… something humans do. We call our partners stuff like sweetheart, pumpkin, cutie, or, well, honey. It’s an endearing thing, since they like you so much, they call you stuff like that. Guess it sounds weird to you, huh?”
>She stayed silent for a moment or two, closing her eyes as she mumbled the words to herself in silence, grinning all the while.
>”I… think I like it. Odd, but I can get used to being called such a thing. Yes, I think I can.”
>”Sounds good to me then. Anything else you wanna ask?”
>”Grant me just a little while longer here. I do not want to leave yet.”
>”Whenever you are ready honey. Not like I can even get up with you atop me…”
>”Oh shush.”
>You simply laughed as she scolded you, holding her into that embrace, feeling her return it despite her words, her arms gripping onto your shoulders as she pulled herself downwards, face nuzzling your neck.
>Despite all the pain in your body, you still felt like a blessed idiot as she held onto you, your own hands and body covered in that warm, silken fur, and that scent.
>That damn strawberry perfume still hitting you like a truck, laced with that hint of something else as it flooded your senses, instilling you with a sense of serenity and calm.
>You laid your head back and closed your eyes again, letting your body relax and heal, even if just for a little while more, your eyelids growing heavier by the moment.





>You awoke to that familiar ringing of an alarm, that annoying electronic jingle piercing your ears as it echoed within the cave, your poor eyes opening themselves out of need, not out of will, death glaring the damn phone with a passion.
>You slept for maybe just an hour or two more, but being woken up like that still sucked beyond belief, the grunt from Arovska mimicking your thoughts down to perfection, better than you ever could.
>You breathed in, hugging her back as you stared into the corner of the cave, that damn noise machine still working its ass off to ruin your little moment as best as it could, your stare getting worse by the moment as you whispered to her.
>”Guess that’s our wakeup call. You want me to get it?”
>”Please. It already ruined one moment, I do not want it ruining another one.”
>You nodded in silence, planting a small kiss on her forehead before shifting over, being careful enough to lay her on her side, her face scrunching itself into a closed eyed grimace as the sound rang and echoed across the cave, again and again.
>You stumbled onto your feet before finding your pair of pants, its right pocket shining with the phones light across the fabric.
>You quickly silenced it with a finger swipe, going the extra mile to disable its alarm fully with a few more angry taps, grumbling to yourself as you went along.
>Damn thing had been useless for a while, but at the very least now you could finally check what time it was, your eyes glazing over the screen as you pressed the back button, earning you a sight of your screen, its white numbers clear as day.
>09:40 of the morning, ticking into 09:41 sharp.
>You breathed out a sigh and toggled on its flashlight as panned around the floor, looking for your poor boxers as you went along, picking up pieces of clothing and hauling them in your arm.
>Arovska seemed to pull herself up from the sheets, sitting under them as she watched you scour the floor, a lazy smile planted on her face as she spoke aloud, rubbing the sand from her eyes.
>”I believe you look better without those Anon. Are you sure you require them?”
>”I ain’t ready to go full tribal yet Arovska, much less in front of my lads, gotta give me a few more months for that. You also said it best, who here enjoys a cold breeze on their privates?”
>You flashed her a smile, earning you a closed eyed sigh, nodding at you in return.
>”Nobody at all. True enough, but I still believe in the first.”
>”I don’t doubt it honey, but it’s still damn cold outside. If you want me like this here, I can do that, but I’m not built for the winter Arovska, more so for the summer.”
>She seemed to relent, mimicking your little surrender pose as she raised her hands to the air, letting them drop as she stared at the ground, sighing out as she looked up at you again, eyes filled with a growing sorrow.
>”I have been thinking of something, Anon. Something important I think I have to ask.”
>You stopped picking up your clothes as she spoke, nodding and sitting down beside her, doing your best not to smile or laugh.
>”Alright, I’ll be serious for once. What’s on your mind?”
>You just watched as she closed her eyes, leaning into you as she spoke, her face curdling into a pensive frown.
>”How is this to work? Surely you cannot stay here long, and while I need a breath of fresh air, I do not know if I can adapt to your home. I want to make this work, but I do not see answers Anon, only questions. I don’t want to lose this. I don’t want to lose you.”
>Those last words hit you the hardest, your own arms hugging her by instinct alone, nuzzling your own head against her as you breathed out, your head scrambling to think of an answer, the most obvious one springing to your mind.
>”I… before I came here, I sent a few messages out to the guys. They mentioned a three day ticket back, if you changed your mind. I don’t know about the paperwork, but if you want to try, I’ll do my best. I don’t wanna lose you either Arovska. It would be a nightmare for me.”
>Your own words seemed to leave a crater in her, a small, minuscule smile breaking out of that frown, letting out a soft, almost silent hum as she tried to think, letting her mind wander and travel.
>”Three days. The first one at the tent, where you awoke to me. The second one, where you loved me, amidst the calm. The third one, where we can awake in your own sanctum, together.”
>You smiled and let your mind wander like she did, closing your eyes as you imagined it all, the scents and sounds manifesting in your mind.
>”I could make you some breakfast in bed. Get you some fried eggs and bacon, teach you what we eat. Show you around the neighbourhood, give you a tour of every place I know. We could stay inside and relax as the rain plinks outside, safe and warm, a hot cup of tea by our hands.”
>Her smile widened as you spoke, her face burying itself deeper in your neck, breathing out a longing sigh, threatening to turn into something more. 
>”Can we stay until late to talk, like we did here? To wake up in each other’s arms, to feel the sun shining upon us both and watch it go by?”
>”We can Arovska. We will. If I have a single say in the matter, we will.”
>She stayed still for a while, silent in your arms until she shifted herself forwards, her breath deepening as her eyes focused themselves on onto a single satchel in the corner, surrounded by a sparse few leather bags.
>”I want to leave. I want to leave this place behind, Anon. But I need to know something. I need to hear you say it. Please.”
>You opened your eyes as you felt her grip on you tighten, her chest beating like a drum as you pulled her closer towards you, her body shifting unto your lap without a single complaint, leaning in without a care.
>”Anything you want Arovska. Anything.”
>”Say… say that I am yours. Say that you are mine. Say you want to leave this place with me, that you want me close, that you want me there. That’s all I want, Anon.”
>You let your body relax as you savoured every word, sweet as honey, letting her hold you in close as you spoke, whispering ever so slowly into her ear, letting that feeling of comfort and warmth flood you.
>”I am yours, Arovska. And you are mine. I want to wake up right next to you, in a cold winter night, and to stay right there in bed with you. I want to hold you close, far away from here, to feel your heart beat as you sleep, to kiss you good night. Won’t you please come home with me?” 
>You felt her melt bit by bit as she listened to your whispering, every word softening her body further towards yours, leaving only a sappy, smiling mess leaning against your chest by the end, her chin buried deep into your neck as she savoured it all.
>You were almost afraid you lost her midway, her silence and breathing all but stopping as she seemed to wander off into her own little land of dreams, a short huff breaking her pondering, a determined, almost stern voice giving you a simple command.
>”Let us make the dream real. Get dressed Anon, for I am coming with you.”




>To say the two of you hauled ass would honestly have been the understatement of the century, considering how quickly you rushed out of that cave.
>With your sweet moment gone, both of you were beyond determined to get to that damn bus on time, your crumpled clothes placed back together faster than you took ‘em off, shabby looking, but better than nothing against the morning cold.
>Arovska’s weren’t much better, having taken her robe off before you loved her, mostly staying beneath you two through the whole time, a few folded ends staining the once immaculate silk with some fairly obvious wrinkles.
>Neither of you seemed to even remotely care however, letting your crumpled selves march down the path into the village, arms interlocked as you searched for Jack and Sheila, either one working well enough for what you needed.
>You did your best to don that mask again, your face rock solid like a statue’s, stuck on a furrowed brow and a tight lipped glared as you stomped all the way to this place, your eyes scouring for any sign of that dynamic duo amidst the village.
>The few anthros around you barely hid their shock, stares lasting longer and longer the more they realized every detail, a few barely sniffing the air before their eyes widened open, speaking amidst themselves in whispered tones.
>Arovska didn’t even spare them a single look, walking right across them all with you locked in her arms, your mask threatening to crack with a wide grin, kept together only by your wish to get the hell inside that bus and back home.
>You looked around as you kept marching on, your eyes turning wide as you heard it, that damn Hyena-like laughter in the distance, long-winded and hearty.
>Unmistakeably his.
>Arovska’s ears kept twitching as she heard it, swivelling back and forth until they locked themselves into place, a quick sideways glance earning you a short nod, your marching continuing without a single moment of rest, gritting your teeth as you looked onwards.
>It wasn’t that you had forgotten how much pain you were in just a few hours ago, it was that it didn’t matter.
>Every single step hurt, every marching sound you two synchronized together marked another pained jolt in your legs, but it would be worth it.
>It had to be.
>As two of you rushed besides the entrance of the village, your marching steps announced your presence much before you managed to spot the duo, turning a small corner and facing them both, each donning a different face.
>Jack was above all confused, his eyes scouring you two top to bottom in the little time you gave him, a furrowed brow being all he managed to don.
>Sheila was a completely different story, her sense of smell able to tell the whole thing in just a few seconds, her eyes traveling across you two once before settling to Jack, the voice of your beloved interrupting whatever she wished to say, regal and demanding.
>”We are to depart today. Will there be any complications or shall we be able to go soon?”
>Jack didn’t even pretend to understand, his eyes turning once again to inspect you two, facing two stone like faces, leaving only Sheila’s impromptu coughing to remind him to speak.
>”I’m sorry, what? I didn’t have anything to depart you today, not that I remember. Did we put something like that in this year’s Sheila?”
>She didn’t even try to put on a mask or beat the bush, grinning like she won a bet to settle her for life, one final look at you two before smirking like a mad woman, breathing in the crisp morning air, either to confirm her theory or just to gloat.
>”Oh bloody hell, I think I know what this is all about. I bloody knew it, freshest meat off the sardine can tends to be the most tender.”
>”Sheila, I love you very much, but I could really use a hint over here that doesn’t include food.”
>”You two boys got to have a talk. I think me and Arovska have something to discuss. Together, not with you two around.”
>You glanced back at your beloved, her eyes settling into yours as she laid her hand on your interlocked arm, a small nod being all you got before she let your arm go, rather reluctantly.
>You kept your poker face up as best as you could, motioning Jack to follow you as you backtracked the road a decent enough distance, looking around for any stragglers or eavesdroppers before you turned back to face him.
>Not that he was in the best of moods, his foot tapping the ground as his arms crossed themselves across his chest, a raised eyebrow meeting you before he spoke, a rather miffed tone to his voice.
>”Look lad, I don’t dig the mystery stuff, and this is just silly right now. The hell was she talking about?”
>You bring out a hand to your temples, lowering it as you pinched the bridge of your nose, talking as softly and clearly, trying your best to defuse the situation.
>”Look, I emailed you guys a load of questions Jack, you even mentioned it back at the bus. You happen to remember what you said about the duration of the expedition?”
>”Course I bloody do Anon, you think I don’t know all the paperwork I had to shuffle?! Two to three weeks tops allowed by municipal mandate, three days of leeway for anyone who wanted out.”
>You let the hand escape your nose and gesture forwards, pointing off towards where you guessed the expedition base was, off to your north.
>”Exactly. Three days tops, with a bus for those who got cold feet to go back home. You didn’t lie about that, did you?”
>”I keep my goddamn word, especially when the cops would beat my kneecaps backwards if I didn’t Anon. Real question is why are you leaving? Hell, why is *she* leaving? She’s been the best help I could ask for in the expedition.”
>Your hand went back to gripping at your temples, rubbing them in as you breathed in.
>You were not expecting him to be quite this dense but you decided to cut him some slack, answering as plainly as you could and about as bluntly as you could manage.
>”Things happened Jack, plans change. She’s coming with me, and she might not be coming back. But I need to know if I actually have a spot in that bus, or if it already left and I am shit out of luck.”
>He stayed motionless for a second, staring at you with an ever growing grin on his face, nodding along as he spoke.
>”Things *happened*? Plans changed? Oh hohohoh, you have got to be kidding with me Anon, I didn’t expect this outta YOU!”
>”Jack-“
>He didn’t even seem to register you calling him, his eyes stuck to the skies, striking a pose and gesturing toward the heavens like an idiot.
>”Of every single man and woman in that goddamn bus, HAD to be the newcomer! Had to be the freshest meat I met all year long, the guy who asked all the questions! POETIC! DOWNRIGHT POETIC!”
>“Jack…”
>He either didn’t hear or chose not to, slapping his forehead as the realization struck him, eyes veering off to the side.
>”Oh fuck me, you are even bringing her back in with you, right? Just how far did you two go for her to abandon this place? Just how well did you fuck-”
>You resisted the temptation to sucker punch the living daylights out of him by an inch and an inch only, choosing instead to breathe in and yell back, your glaring eyes burning a hole across his skull as you berated him. 
>”JACK, FOR FUCKS SAKE, ARE YOU GOING TO HELP ME OR NOT? I GOT NO CLUE IF I CAN STILL GO HOME TODAY, AND I MADE A FUCKING PROMISE. SO EITHER QUIT GLOATING AND HELP, OR I’LL GO TO SHEILA INSTEAD!”
>As harsh as your yelling was, it seemed to flip a switch on him almost immediately, his stance and voice shifting to a much more serious, respectable tone, just a hint of shame as he spoke, staring out to the side still.
>”Right. Sorry, it just… brought back memories of my own. Sheila and I, we kind of had something like that happen ourselves, way back when. Guess she just saw it right away on you two.”
>He smacked his lips and stared out to the path, giving a quick glance to the village before settling on you, crossing his arms.
>”So, you want to ride the bus back with her today? We got one in about four more days y’know, you aren’t going to be stuck here for much longer.”
>”I made a promise to her Jack, one I wanna keep. Any chance I can still make it?
>He dug out a phone from his cargo shorts, typing out some kind of sequence before swiping it up, a few more taps before he placed it by the side of his head, a few more seconds of silence before he spoke into it.
>”Oi, Jack here. We got another guy, packing an extra for delivery for the last stationed pickup. Delay your exit until they get there, you got it? Can’t miss the deer with the antlers and her go-along. Alright, that’s all, Jack out.”
>He slips the phone back into his pocket, breathing out as he looked you in the eye, outstretching a hand.
>”As good a parting gift as I can give, I think. I’ll be sad to see you two go, but guess it’s for the best. Don’t delay that bus too long or he’ll start giving me shit about overtime, you hear me?”
>You met his hand and squeezed it down, his grip still crushing the hell out of your poor fingers, but it was softer than before, with you able to fake out the pain a lot better this time.
>”I won’t, trust me. Thanks for the help Jack, I owe you one.”
>”You’re damn welcome. See you next year?”
>”Maybe, depends on her. You got my number anyways, you can hassle me till I come, right?”
>He just shook his head, checking the time before staring out into the village, his eyes stuck to it now, loosening his stance and voice back to his usual.
>”Maybe I will. Now go ahead and do your promise before they start calling me twelve times an hour complaining about the wait, I can’t manage this and the bus pooftas at the same time!”
>You laughed just a little, settling your eyes onto the road before you marched, saying out your final words before you marched onwards to Arovska once more.
>”See you around Jack. Thanks for everything.”
>This time he didn’t even answer, giving you only a quick nod before you left, grinning and whispering as you were gone.
>”Man, they better not take over an hour. Gus is gonna grill the shit outta me if they do.”




>Marching down to Arovska barely took you a minute, both her and Sheila standing silently by the path, leaning against a railing as they waited for you.
>As boisterous as Sheila showed herself to be back at the bus, she was also much quicker to deal than Jack, giving you two a faint smile before slipping you a piece of paper, a few numbers splattered across it in blue pen ink.
>Her words were quick, concise, but still having that thick accent you knew her for, slipping in some of that snark and warmness.
>”Here, contacts for people who know about this deal. Some are just wankers as people, but they know how to get her the papers, even a little subsidy. You’d be surprised what kinda stuff you can sign up to sometimes.”
>You took it and folded it onto an inner pocket within your jacket, nodding and outstretching a hand, her own meeting yours without any delay.
>”Thanks. Didn’t do too shabby for the freshest meat in the can, huh?”
>She furrowed her brow at you a little, nodding with some reluctance.
>”You didn’t start a fight with the others, so I can’t complain. Didn’t chew with your mouth open, or you wouldn’t be here with her. Made pals with Jack enough to get him to help you, I’m guessing. You did okay in my books.”
>”Took your lessons to heart Miss Sheila. Guess they worked?”
>”Call me Miss again and I’ll get the damn bus to go off right now. Guess I’ll see you next year?”
>Arovska couldn’t even try to hide her glare, her right ear twitching like mad before you came close to her, patting her arm as she locked it with yours, huffing out a long breath.
>Sheila didn’t seem to mind at all, either knowing she wouldn’t apologise or just not caring about getting one, her eyebrow raising as she looked at you, expecting an answer.
>You gave her the most honest one you could, shrugging as you looked to your beloved.
>”Maybe next year, honey?”
>Arovska didn’t seem too bothered by the idea, offering a mild nod in return, tightening her grip on you.
>”Perhaps. We have time to decide, and we have the means to inform them later, correct?”
>”Correct indeed. Guess that’s a maybe for now Sheila.”
>She just stared at you two, a growing smile as she shook her head, closing her eyes as she whispered to herself, just a bit too loud to ignore.
>”Fuckin’ calling her honey. Goddamn newcomers and their bullshit.”
>She reopened her eyes quick enough, giving you two a wave as she headed towards Jack, muttering her final words as she went.
>”See you two around. Good luck out there, and give us a call one day, we’ll catch up.”
>Leaving you two alone, it barely took a moment to set your spirits up once more, a soft squeeze in your arm prompting you to set up the pace, eyes looking out to the distance, aimed down below.
>It was surprising how easily you trekked across the path, the incline and your rhythm making it a breeze as you blitzed across all this familiar terrain, looking in as you sped across it all.
>The spot you two met right before going inside the village, the now fully camped out site you two were on, the blue tent still hung up without anyone in it, the table you played truth or dare now occupied by a few others, human and anthro alike.
>You gave a little wave to the few that stopped to stare, the unsubtle ones straight up chatting amidst themselves, the more cautious ones settling for a whisper or two, trying to meddle into what they had no business in.
>Arovska didn’t even pretend to hide her smirk as you two passed away, detailing in all the whispers her twitching ears managed to pick up, most of them hitting it right on the jackpot.
>With everyone worth caring behind you, she relaxed a little too, her eyes wandering around as she took in a final gaze at the woods, readying herself for what was to come.
>You two talked as you went along the trail, with you trying to gauge just how much she really knew of what was to happen, while she merely asked more and more questions about a bit of everything.
>She knew what a “busse” was, same as a “kahrr”, she just didn’t know how they worked, never having been inside either of them.
>Likewise for most technology, with the battery, hand crank and light on her cave being a kind of favour she asked out of the dynamic duo rather than something she managed to make herself, the rest remaining a mystery she insisted you were to solve later.
>The more you spoke to her, the more it dawned on you how much she was trusting you to guide her now, your little arm interlock tightening as you reached the final ramp to the mountains base, overlooking everything.
>The same white tents you remembered at the start, just one or two poor guys still carrying around the crates, and above all, the same old bus you came in with, its orange sign dormant, no destination marked as the few visible passengers tapped away at their phones, bored out of their minds.
>You felt her momentum die as she stared at it, ears twitching as she looked around, a drawn out breath leaving her before she smiled, a regal tone once again masking her nervousness.
>”Back at the beginning, and yet we are here to end it. Are you ready to depart Anon?”
>You let her stare on as you pulled her closer to you, patting her arm as it interlocked with yours, a faint smile on both your lips.
>”I am, yeah. I think you’ll do well at my place, once you get used to it.”
>”Do you mean your home sweet home?”
>”It’s gonna be our home sweet home now, Arovska. Our little sanctum, out there, where nobody can disturb us. Where we can take a nice, hot bath, eat a warm meal, sleep together for hours on end.”
>She let her mind wander, her smile widening as she seemed to think of everything you were going to do, a drawn out hum breaking the silence.
>”The Wind has lead me this far. The Wind has shown me the dreams. It shall guide me forwards still. Let us go and fulfil the promise, to make the dream come true.”
>You couldn’t resist laughing just a smidge, even in her final moments, she couldn’t resist being poetic, downright prophetic even, talking like she had already seem this all play out somehow.
>You ignored it for the most part, letting her words do your job at lifting her spirits, her march setting the pace as you finally crossed the last threshold this mountain had to give, crossing that base in record speed.
>You slowed down as you came closer to the bus, your entry marked by the impatient glare of the bus driver, eyeing you two as you came along, arms crossed and clearly unimpressed.
>You ignored it as best you could, figuring any apology wouldn’t matter at this point, focusing instead on helping Arovska board inside as she ducked her head.
>As beautiful as her antlers were, they still had a few setbacks, the only real seat with enough space for you two being, as dreadful as it sounded, the back of the bus, thankfully left alone and without anyone to occupy it.
>It didn’t really matter in the end.
>As the two of you sat down and settled in, hearing the rev of an engine as Arovska stared out the window, you could feel something stir in you that hadn’t in ages, her hand gripping yours as you laid back into the your seat, with you returning her gentle squeeze.
>Either by chance, luck or God giving you a break, you came here for a breath of fresh air, and now, you had a chance to give back, to truly live after so much time surviving.
>To be together with someone who cared, and someone who wished you well, to help them and be helped in return.
>The serpentine voice kept itself quiet as you closed your eyes, the inertia of the bus bouncing you two back and forth as it started to move, the unmistakeable hiss of pneumatics ringing in your ears as you felt the motor whirr beneath you.
>Arovska stayed quiet through it all, merely gazing out as she saw the horizon, the views shifting from that mountain range to the maze of asphalt and steel, eyes glued to every new detail she found, holding in every question she had till later.
>You kept a careful eye on her, occasionally glaring at whoever insisted on staring at you two for long enough, a few grumbles and whispers from the front ends of the bus annoying you more than they should.
>Time was on your side however, every few minutes another stop emptying out the snoopers, the final hiss marking your own little stop, right in the middle of the early afternoon rush, greeted by a few more folks as you hopped on out.
>Arovska was much more graceful in her exit, grabbing onto the bus as she let herself drop, hooves clashing with the concrete as her eyes glued to the building in front of her, staring up to the skies.
>She hummed to herself, a small smile flashing in her lips as she spoke to you as, a tone of warmth and care, ignoring everyone else that gazed at her from the sidewalk.
>”Is this where your sanctum is? I admit, I did not think your kind build things quite like this.”
>”Yeah, architecture is an odd thing. Just gotta go up a few stairs to get to my place.” 
>”Living a little closer to the sky… I think I like it.”
>”Wait till you go to the balcony. Watching all the people go, feeling the breeze on your face, just never gets old.”
>”Hmm. Shall we then?”
>”Yeah. Let’s go honey.”



>The weeks that followed you two settling in felt more like months, the calm only lasting a little while before the dreaded paperwork and bureaucracy reared its ugly head to meet you two head on.
>You didn’t even imagine how much legal shenanigans you were going to be faced up when you brought her in, ranging from identification papers to medical records, licenses and whatever else they could manage to make up.
>The “integration” subsidy they offered was a decent compensation at least, letting you splurge a little on her as you got the essentials for a normal life settled, even if doing so was an enormous pain.
>Clothes were a tricky business, both due to your beloved being not only an extremely picky customer but an old fashioned one to boot, having to scour everywhere for something that didn’t look out of the 70’s or worse.
>Shoes were a bust, same with most kinds of socks due to the hooves, but at the very least she took to the concept of underwear quite well, even if her insistence on you “coming along to choose” extended to the dressing room, something you found hard to talk her out of.
>Teaching her social customs was also a difficult task, with her causing a scene more than a few times, your ass having to apologise profusely over Arovska asking certain someone’s if they “Felt ill, as their skin looked off”.
>Money and the rest made sense enough to her and beyond a few scattered incidents, you never really had any kind of issues, thankfully.
>It was all worth it in the end however, when the dust settled down and you could finally relax.
>Being able to cook something up beyond just carbs and tv dinners, something special and filling, soul food for you two as you explored some recipes, some from her home even, wasting afternoons thinking of what to make.
>Being able to vegetate out on the couch as she flipped the channels, settling in on some documentary or news show, just letting the time go by as you rested out amidst the storms, zoning out by the flashing screen, sound muted as you snoozed.
>Even sharing interests, afternoons swapped around as you read whatever books she bought or loaned, while she slowly learnt how to operate a computer, still scouring the entire laptop for each key before she pressed it.
>What really sold you however, were the lazy mornings you two shared.
>Lazing around beneath the sheets as time went by, warm with each other’s touch as you refused to move, simply holding one another together as the hours passed on by.
>One of you two getting up and preparing breakfast for the other, readying a cup of coffee or tea to get you going, to face the day.
>Looking out the window and feeling safe as the cold never managed to reach you two, your arms wrapping themselves around her waist, pulling her closer as you looked outside, to hear her breathing slow down, to have her relax in your embrace.
>Things weren’t perfect, and chances were they never would be.
>But for now, you had your own little slice of heaven, and you were going to enjoy it.
>Together at last.


(Many, many thanks to Comfy, IDWT and Akella for feedback and error combing, which helped to improve it's quality and iron out any mistakes pre-release. Hopefully I managed to make an enjoyable story for you lads, despite my absence.)